{"Thyroid nodule": {"Symptoms": ["Goiter or an enlarged thyroid gland or lump(s) in the neck", "Hoarseness or changing voice", "Pain in the neck", "Problems breathing,\u00a0especially when lying down flat", "Problems swallowing\u00a0food", "Warm, sweaty skin", "Fast pulse", "Increased appetite", "Nervousness", "Restlessness", "Skin blushing or flushing", "Weight loss", "Irregular menstrual periods", "Dry skin", "Face swelling", "Fatigue", "Hair loss", "Feeling cold when other people do not", "Weight gain ", "Irregular menstrual periods"], "description": "A thyroid nodule is a growth (lump) in the thyroid gland. The thyroid gland is located in the neck, just above where your collarbones meet in the middle.", "Causes": "Thyroid nodules are growths of cells in the thyroid gland. These growths can be: Not cancer (benign) or\u00a0thyroid cancer, Fluid-filled (cysts), One nodule or a group of small nodules, Producing thyroid hormones (hot) or not making thyroid hormones (cold). Thyroid nodules are more common in women than in men. A person's chance of getting\u00a0a thyroid nodule increases with age.Only a few thyroid nodules are due to thyroid cancer.\u00a0A thyroid nodule is more likely to be cancer if you:Have\u00a0a hard nodule, Have a nodule that is stuck to nearby structures, Have a\u00a0family history of thyroid cancer, Have\u00a0noticed a change in your\u00a0voice, Are younger than 20 or older than 70, Have a history of radiation exposure to the head or neck, Are male . Causes of thyroid nodules are not always found, but can include:Hashimoto's disease, Lack of iodine in the diet . ", "Treatment": "Your health care provider may recommend surgery to remove all or part of your thyroid gland if the nodule is:Due to thyroid cancer, Causing symptoms such as swallowing or breathing problems, Not able to be diagnosed as cancer or not cancer, Believe to be making too much thyroid hormone. Patients with nodules that are making too much thyroid hormone may be treated with radioactive iodine. This treatment reduces the size and activity of the nodule. Pregnant women are not given this treatment. Both surgery to remove thyroid gland tissue and radioactive iodine treatment can cause lifelong hypothyroidism (underactive thyroid), which needs to be treated with thyroid hormone replacement.For noncancerous nodules that do not cause symptoms and are not growing, the best treatment may be:Careful follow-up with a physical exam and ultrasound, A thyroid biopsy repeated 6\u00a0to 12 months after diagnosis, especially if the nodule has grown . Another possible treatment\u00a0is\u00a0ethanol (alcohol) injection into the nodule to shrink it."}, "TBG - blood test": {"description": "The TBG blood test measures the level of a protein that moves thyroid hormone throughout your body. The protein is called thyroxine binding globulin (TBG)."}, "Transillumination": {"description": "Transillumination is the shining of a light through a body area or organ to check for abnormalities."}, "Toxoplasmosis": {"description": "Toxoplasmosis is an infection due to the parasite Toxoplasma gondii.", "Possible Complications": "The disease may return. In people with a weakened immune system, the infection may spread throughout the body, leading to death. ", "Symptoms": ["Enlarged lymph nodes in the head and neck", "Headache", "Fever", "Mild illness similar to mononucleosis", "Muscle pain", "Sore throat ", "Confusion", "Fever", "Headache", "Blurred vision due to inflammation of the retina", "Seizures"], "Exams and Tests": "The doctor or nurse will perform a physical exam. Tests that may be done include:Antibody titers for toxoplasmosis, Cranial CT scan, MRI of head, Slit lamp exam, Brain biopsy. ", "Treatment": "Persons without symptoms usually do not need treatment.Medicines to treat the infection include an antimalarial drug and antibiotics. AIDS patients should continue treatment for as long as their immune system is weak to prevent the disease from reactivating.", "Prevention": "Tips for preventing this condition:Do not eat undercooked meat. , Wash hands after handling raw meat., Keep children's play areas free from cat and dog feces., Wash your hands thoroughly after touching\u00a0soil that may be contaminated with animal feces.. Pregnant women and those with weakened immune systems should take the following precautions:Do not\u00a0clean cat litter boxes , Do not touch anything that may contain\u00a0cat feces, Do not touch anything that\u00a0could be contaminated by insects exposed to cat feces (cockroaches, flies, etc.). Pregnant women and those with HIV should be screened for toxoplasmosis. A blood test can be done. ", "Causes": "Toxoplasmosis is found in humans worldwide and in many kinds of animals and birds. The parasite lives in cats.Human infection may result from:Blood transfusions or solid organ transplants, Handling cat litter, Eating contaminated soil, Eating raw or undercooked meat (lamb, pork, and beef). Toxoplasmosis also affects people who have weakened immune systems.The infection may also be passed from an infected mother to her baby through the placenta.\u00a0This results in congenital toxoplasmosis. "}, "Tonsillectomy": {"description": "The tonsils are glands at the back of your throat. The tonsils are often removed along with the adenoid glands. That surgery is called adenoidectomy and most often done in children."}, "Thioridazine overdose": {"Symptoms": ["Bladder and kidneysInability to completely empty the bladder. ", "Inability to completely empty the bladder", "Ear, nose, and throatBlurred vision, Drooling, Dry mouth, Nasal congestion, Swallowing difficulties, Ulcers in the mouth, on the tongue, or in the throat, Vision color changes (brown tinge), Yellow eyes. ", "Blurred vision", "Drooling", "Dry mouth", "Nasal congestion", "Swallowing difficulties", "Ulcers in the mouth, on the tongue, or in the throat", "Vision color changes (brown tinge)", "Yellow eyes", "Heart and bloodHeartbeat - rapid, High or severely low blood pressure. ", "Heartbeat - rapid", "High or severely low blood pressure", "Mouth, stomach, and intestinal tractConstipation, Loss of appetite, Nausea. ", "Constipation", "Loss of appetite", "Nausea", "Muscles and bonesMuscle spasms, Muscle stiffness, Stiff neck or face. ", "Muscle spasms", "Muscle stiffness", "Stiff neck or face", "Nervous systemComa, Difficulty walking, Dizziness, Drowsiness, Fever, Hypothermia (body temperature is lower than normal), Seizures, Tremor, Incoordination, Weakness. ", "Coma", "Difficulty walking", "Dizziness", "Drowsiness", "Fever", "Hypothermia (body temperature is lower than normal)", "Seizures", "Tremor", "Incoordination", "Weakness", "OtherMenstrual changes. ", "Menstrual changes", "SkinSkin discoloration, bluish (changing to a purplish color). ", "Skin discoloration, bluish (changing to a purplish color)"], "description": "See also: Phenothiazine overdose", "Prevention": "Keep all medicines in child-proof containers and out of reach of children. Read all medicine labels and take only medicines that have been prescribed for you."}, "Traveling with children": {"description": "Traveling with children presents special challenges. It disrupts familiar routines and imposes new demands. Planning ahead -- and involving children in the planning -- may lessen the stress of travel."}, "Thyroid preparation overdose": {"Symptoms": ["Changes in menstrual pattern", "Chest pain", "Confusion", "Convulsions", "Dilated pupils", "Excessive sweating", "Fever", "Headache", "High blood pressure", "Irritability", "Muscle weakness", "Nausea and vomiting", "Nervousness", "Rapid heartbeat", "Shock", "Skin flushing"], "description": "This is for information only and not for use in the treatment or management of an actual poison exposure. If you have an exposure, you should call your local emergency number (such as 911) or the National Poison Control Center at 1-800-222-1222.", "Prevention": "Keep all medications in child-proof bottles and out of the reach of children."}, "Toxic synovitis": {"description": "Toxic synovitis is a condition affecting children that causes hip pain and limping.", "Possible Complications": "Toxic synovitis goes away on its own. There are no expected long-term complications.", "Symptoms": ["Hip pain (on one side only)", "Limp", "Thigh pain, in front and toward the middle of the thigh", "Knee pain", "Low-grade fever, less than 101\u00b0 Fahrenheit"], "Exams and Tests": "Toxic synovitis is diagnosed when other, more serious conditions have been ruled out, such as:Septic hip, Slipped capital femoral epiphysis, Legg-Calve-Perthes disease. Tests used to diagnose toxic synovitis include:Ultrasound of the hip, X-ray of the hip, ESR, C-reactive protein (CRP), Complete blood count (CBC). Other tests that may be done to rule out other causes of hip pain:Aspiration of fluid from the hip joint, Bone scan, MRI. ", "Treatment": "Treatment often includes limiting activity to make the child more comfortable. However, there is no danger with performing normal activities. The health care provider may prescribe nonsteroidal anti-inflammatory medications (NSAIDS) to reduce pain.", "Causes": "Toxic synovitis occurs in children before puberty begins. It is a type of arthritis of the hip. Its cause is not known, but boys are affected more often than girls (approximately 4 to 1)."}, "Thoracentesis": {"description": "Thoracentesis is a procedure to remove fluid from the space between the lining of the outside of the lungs (pleura) and the wall of the chest."}, "Talking to your teen about drinking": {"description": "The best time to begin talking with your teen about drugs and alcohol is now. Children as young as 9 years old may become curious about drinking, and they may try alcohol. "}, "Type 2 diabetes - self-care": {"description": "Everyone with diabetes should receive proper education and support about the best ways to manage their diabetes. Ask your healthcare provider about seeing a diabetes educator."}, "Tricuspid regurgitation": {"description": "Tricuspid regurgitation is a disorder in which this valve does not close tight enough. This problem causes blood to flow backward into the right upper heart chamber (atrium) when the right lower heart chamber (ventricle) contracts.", "Symptoms": ["Active pulsing in the neck veins", "Decreased urine output", "Fatigue, tiredness", "General swelling", "Swelling of the abdomen", "Swelling of the feet and ankles", "Weakness"], "Exams and Tests": "The health care provider may find abnormalities when gently pressing with the hand (palpating) on your chest. The doctor may also feel a pulse over your liver. The physical exam may show liver and spleen swelling.Listening to the heart with a stethoscope may reveal a murmur or other abnormal sounds. There may be signs of fluid buildup in the abdomen.An ECG or echocardiogram may show enlargement of the right side of the heart. Doppler echocardiography or right-sided cardiac catheterization\u00a0may be used to measure blood pressure inside the heart and lungs.Other tests, such as CT scan or MRI of the chest (heart), may reveal enlargement of the right side of the heart and other changes.", "Causes": "An increase in size of the right ventricle is the most common cause of this condition. The right ventricle pumps blood to the lungs where it picks up oxygen. Any condition that puts extra strain on this chamber can cause it to enlarge.Abnormally high blood pressure in the arteries of the lungs, COPD, Problem with the other valve on the right side of the heart. Tricuspid regurgitation may also be caused or worsened by infections, such as:Rheumatic fever, Infection of the tricuspid heart valve, which causes damage . Less common causes of tricuspid regurgitation include:A type of heart defect present at birth called Ebstein anomaly, Carcinoid tumors, which release a hormone that damages the valve, Marfan syndrome, Rheumatoid arthritis, Radiation therapy, Past use of a diet pill called \"Fen-Phen\" (phentermine and fenfluramine) or dexfenfluramine. The drug was removed from the market in 1997.. ", "Prevention": "People with abnormal or damaged heart valves are at risk for an infection called endocarditis. Anything that causes bacteria to get into your bloodstream may lead to this infection. Steps to avoid this problem include:Avoid unclean injections., Treat strep infections promptly to prevent rheumatic fever., Always tell your health care provider and dentist if you have a history of heart valve disease or congenital heart disease before treatment. Some people may need to take antibiotics before having a procedure. . Prompt treatment of disorders that can cause valve disease reduces your risk of tricuspid regurgitation. ", "Treatment": "Treatment may not be needed if there are few or no symptoms. You may need to go to the hospital to diagnose and treat severe symptoms.Swelling may be managed with medicines that help remove fluids from the body (diuretics).Some people may be able to have surgery to repair or replace the tricuspid valve. Surgery is usually done as part of another procedure.Treatment of certain conditions may correct this disorder. These include:High blood pressure in the lungs, Swelling of the right lower heart chamber. "}, "Type 1 diabetes": {"description": "Type 1 diabetes is a lifelong (chronic) disease in which there is a high level of sugar (glucose) in the blood.", "Possible Complications": "After many years, diabetes can lead to other serious problems:You could have eye problems, including trouble seeing (especially at night) and sensitivity to light. You could become blind., Your feet and skin could develop sores and infections. If you have these sores for too long, your foot or leg may need to be amputated. Infection can also cause pain and itching., Diabetes may make it harder to control your blood pressure and cholesterol. This can lead to heart attack, stroke, and other problems. It can become harder for blood to flow to the legs and feet., Nerves in the body can become damaged, causing pain, tingling, and numbness., Because of nerve damage, you could have problems digesting the food you eat. You could feel weakness or have trouble going to the bathroom. Nerve damage can also make it harder for men to have an erection., High blood sugar and other problems can lead to kidney damage. The kidneys may not work as well as they used to. They may even stop working, so that you would need dialysis or a kidney transplant.. ", "Symptoms": ["Being very thirsty", "Feeling hungry", "Feeling tired all the time", "Having blurry eyesight", "Feeling numbness or tingling in your feet", "Losing weight without trying", "Urinating more often (including urinating at night or bedwetting in children who were dry overnight before)\u00a0", "Deep, rapid breathing", "Dry skin and mouth", "Flushed face", "Fruity breath odor", "Nausea or vomiting; inability to keep down fluids", "Stomach pain ", "Headache", "Hunger", "Nervousness", "Rapid heartbeat (palpitations)", "Shaking", "Sweating", "Weakness "], "Exams and Tests": "Diabetes is diagnosed with the following blood tests:Fasting blood glucose level: Diabetes is diagnosed if it is higher than 126 mg/dL two different \u00a0times., Random (non-fasting) blood glucose level. You may have diabetes if it is higher than 200 mg/dL, and you have symptoms such as increased thirst, urination, and fatigue. (This must be confirmed with a fasting test.), Oral glucose tolerance test: Diabetes is diagnosed if the glucose level is higher than 200 mg/dL 2 hours after\u00a0you drink\u00a0a special sugar drink., Hemoglobin A1c (A1C) test: Diabetes is diagnosed if the result of the test is 6.5% or higher. . Ketone testing is also used sometimes. The ketone test is done using a urine sample or blood sample. Ketone testing may be done:When the blood sugar is higher than 240 mg/dL, During an illness such as pneumonia, heart attack, or stroke, When nausea or vomiting occur, During pregnancy . The following tests or exams will help you and your doctor monitor your diabetes and prevent problems caused by diabetes:Check the skin and bones on your feet and legs., Check if your feet are getting numb (diabetic nerve disease)., Have your blood pressure checked at least\u00a0once a\u00a0year. The goal should be 140/80 mm Hg or lower., Have\u00a0an A1C test done every 6 months if your diabetes is well controlled. Have the test done every 3 months if your diabetes is not well controlled., Have your cholesterol and triglyceride levels checked once a year., Get tests once a year\u00a0to make sure your kidneys are working well (microalbuminuria and serum creatinine)., Visit your eye doctor at least once a year, or more often if you have signs of diabetic eye disease., See the dentist every 6 months for a thorough dental cleaning and exam. Make sure your dentist and hygienist know that you have diabetes. . ", "Treatment": "Because type 1 diabetes can start quickly and the symptoms can be severe, people who have just been diagnosed may need to stay in the hospital.If you have just been diagnosed with type 1 diabetes, you may need to have a checkup each week until you have good control over your blood sugar. Your doctor will review the results of your home blood sugar monitoring and urine testing. Your doctor will also look at your diary of meals, snacks, and insulin injections. It may take a few weeks to match the insulin doses to your meal and activity schedules.As your diabetes becomes more stable, you will have fewer follow-up visits. Visiting your doctor is very important so you can monitor any long-term problems from diabetes.You are the most important person in managing your diabetes. You should know the basic steps of diabetes management, including:How to recognize and treat low blood sugar (hypoglycemia), How to recognize and treat high blood sugar (hyperglycemia), How to plan meals, including carbohydrate (carb) counting, How to give insulin, How to check blood glucose and urine ketones, How to adjust insulin and food when you exercise, How to handle sick days, Where to buy diabetes supplies and how to store them . INSULINInsulin lowers blood sugar by allowing it to leave the bloodstream and enter cells. Everyone with type 1 diabetes must take insulin every day.Insulin must be injected under the skin using a syringe, insulin pen, or insulin pump. It cannot be taken by mouth because the acid in the stomach destroys insulin.Insulin types differ in how fast they start to work and how long they last. Your doctor will choose the best type of insulin for you and will tell you at what time of day to use it. Some types of insulin may be mixed together in an injection to get the best blood glucose control. Other types of insulin should never be mixed. You may need insulin shots 1 to 4 times a day.Your doctor or diabetes nurse educator will teach you how to give insulin injections. At first, a child's injections may be given by a parent or another adult. By age 14, most children can give themselves their\u00a0own injections.People with diabetes need to know how to adjust the amount of insulin they are taking:When they exercise, When they are sick, When they will be eating more or less food and calories, When they are traveling . HEALTHY EATING AND EXERCISEBy testing your blood sugar level, you can learn which foods and activities raise or lower your blood sugar level the most. This helps you adjust your insulin doses to specific meals or activities to prevent blood sugar from becoming too high or too low.The American Diabetes Association and the American Dietetic Association have information for planning healthy, balanced meals. It also helps to talk to a registered dietitian or nutrition counselor.Regular exercise helps control the amount of sugar in the blood. It also helps burn extra calories and fat to reach and maintain a healthy weight.Talk to your doctor before starting any exercise program. People with type 1 diabetes must take special steps before, during, and after physical activity or exercise.MANAGING YOUR BLOOD SUGARChecking your blood sugar level yourself and writing down the results tells you how well you are managing your diabetes. Talk to your doctor and diabetes educator about how often to check.To check your blood sugar level, you use a device called a glucose meter. Usually, you prick your finger with a small needle called a lancet to get a tiny drop of blood. You place the blood on a test strip and put the strip into the meter. The meter gives you a reading that tells you the level of your blood sugar.Keep a record of your blood sugar for yourself and your health care team. These numbers will help if you have problems managing your diabetes. You and your doctor should set a target goal for your blood sugar level at different times during the day. You should also plan what to do when your blood sugar is too low or high.Talk to your doctor about your target for the A1C test. This lab test shows\u00a0your\u00a0average blood sugar level over the past 3 months. It shows how well you are controlling your diabetes. For most persons with type 1 diabetes, the A1C target should be 7.5% or lower.Low blood sugar is called hypoglycemia. A blood sugar level below 70 mg/dL\u00a0is too low and can harm you.FOOT CAREPeople with diabetes are more likely than those without diabetes to have foot problems. Diabetes damages the nerves. This can make you less able to feel pressure on the foot. You may not notice a foot injury until you get a severe infection.Diabetes can also damage blood vessels. Small sores or breaks in the skin may become deeper skin sores (ulcers). The affected limb may need to be amputated if these skin ulcers do not heal or become larger, deeper, or infected.To prevent problems with your feet:Stop smoking if you smoke., Improve control of your blood sugar., Get a foot exam at least twice a year with your doctor, and learn whether you have nerve damage., Check and care for your feet every day. This is very important when you already have nerve or blood vessel damage or foot problems., Treat minor infections, such as athlete's foot, right away., Use moisturizing lotion on dry skin., Make sure you wear the right kind of shoes. Ask your doctor what kind is\u00a0right for you. . PREVENTING COMPLICATIONSYour doctor may prescribe medicines or other treatments to reduce your chances of developing common complications of diabetes, including:Eye disease, Kidney disease, Heart disease and stroke. With type 1 diabetes, you are also at risk of developing conditions such as hearing loss, gum disease, or yeast infections (in women). Keeping your blood sugar under good control can help prevent these conditions.Talk with your health care team about other things you can do to lower your chances of developing diabetes.", "Prevention": "Type 1 diabetes cannot be prevented. There is no screening test for type 1 diabetes in people who have no symptoms.", "Causes": "Type 1 diabetes can occur at any age. It is most often diagnosed in children, adolescents, or young adults.Insulin is a hormone produced in the pancreas by special cells called beta cells. The pancreas is below and behind the stomach. Insulin is needed to move blood sugar (glucose) into cells. Inside the cells, glucose is stored and later used for energy. With type 1 diabetes, beta cells produce little or no insulin.Without enough insulin, glucose builds up in the bloodstream instead of going into the cells. This buildup of glucose in the blood is called hyperglycemia. The body is unable to use the glucose for energy. This leads to the symptoms of type 1 diabetes.The exact cause of type 1 diabetes is unknown. Most likely it is an autoimmune disorder. This is a condition that occurs when the immune system mistakenly attacks and destroys healthy body tissue. With type 1 diabetes, an infection or another trigger causes the body to mistakenly attack the cells in the pancreas that make insulin. The tendency to develop autoimmune diseases, including type 1 diabetes, can be passed down through families."}, "Trazodone hydrochloride overdose": {"Symptoms": ["Difficulty breathing (breathing may stop completely)", "Chest pain", "Irregular heartbeat", "Low blood pressure, sometimes leading to fainting", "Slow heart rate", "Coma", "Dizziness", "Drowsiness", "Headache", "Insomnia", "Seizures", "Uncoordination", "Priapism (erection that lasts for more than 4 hours without stimulation)"], "description": "This is for information only and not for use in the treatment or management of an actual poison exposure. If you have an exposure, you should call your local emergency number (such as 911) or the National Poison Control Center at 1-800-222-1222.", "Prevention": "Keep all medications in child-proof containers and out of reach of children. Read all medication labels and take only medications which have been prescribed for you."}, "Testicular torsion": {"description": "Testicular torsion is the twisting of the spermatic cord, which supports the testes in the scrotum. When this occurs, blood supply is cut off to the testicles and nearby tissue in the scrotum. ", "Possible Complications": "The testicle may shrink if blood supply is cut off for an extended time. It may need to be surgically removed. Shrinkage of the testicle may occur days to months after the torsion has been corrected. Severe infection of the testicle and scrotum is also possible if the blood flow is restricted for an extended period.", "Symptoms": ["Sudden severe pain in one testicle. The pain may occur without a clear reason.", "Swelling within one side of the scrotum (scrotal swelling)", "Nausea or vomiting", "Lightheadedness", "Testicle lump", "Blood in the semen"], "Exams and Tests": "The health care provider will examine you. The exam may show:Extreme tenderness and swelling in the testicle area, The testicle on the affected side is higher. You may have a Doppler ultrasound of the testicle to check the blood flow. There will be no blood flowing through the area if you have complete torsion. Blood flow may be reduced if the cord is partially twisted. ", "Treatment": "Most of the time, surgery is needed to correct the problem. Surgery should be done as soon as possible after symptoms begin. If it is performed within 6 hours, most testicles can be saved.During surgery, the testicle on the other side is often secured into place as well. This is because the unaffected testicle is at risk of testicular torsion in the future.", "Prevention": "Take steps to avoid injury to the scrotum. Many cases cannot be prevented. ", "Causes": "Some men are more prone to this condition because of defects in the connective tissue within the scrotum. The problem may also occur after an injury to the scrotum that results in a lot of swelling or following heavy exercise. In some cases, there is no clear cause. The condition is more common during the first year of life and at the beginning of adolescence (puberty). However, it may happen in older men."}, "Temporal arteritis": {"description": "If the inflammation affects the arteries in your neck, upper body and arms, it is called giant cell arteritis.", "Symptoms": ["Throbbing headache on one side of the head or the back of the head", "Tenderness when touching the scalp", "Excessive sweating", "Fever", "General ill feeling", "Jaw pain that comes and goes or occurs when chewing", "Loss of appetite", "Muscle aches", "Pain and stiffness in the neck, upper arms, shoulder, and hips", "Weakness, excessive tiredness", "Blurred vision", "Double vision", "Reduced vision (blindness in one or both eyes)", "Bleeding gums", "Face pain", "Hearing loss", "Joint stiffness"], "Exams and Tests": "The doctor will examine your head. The scalp is often sensitive to touch , There may be a tender, thick artery on one side of the head, most often over one or both temples.. Blood tests may include:Hemoglobin or hematocrit, Liver function tests, Sedimentation rate and C-reactive protein. Blood tests alone cannot provide a diagnosis. You will need to have a biopsy (tissue sample) from the involved artery.\u00a0 The biopsy is done on an outpatient basis.You may also have other tests, including:Duplex ultrasound, MRI, PET scan. ", "Causes": "Temporal, giant cell, and cranial arteritis occur when one or more arteries become inflamed, swollen, and tender.Temporal arteritis commonly occurs in the the arteries around the temples (temporal arteries). These vessels branch off from the carotid artery in the neck. However, the condition can occur in medium-to-large arteries in other places in the body.The cause of the condition is unknown. It is believed to be due in part to a faulty immune response. The disorder has been linked to severe infections and the use of high doses of antibiotics.The problem may develop with or following another inflammatory disorder known as polymyalgia rheumatica. Giant cell arteritis almost always occurs in people over age 50. It is rare in people of African descent. The condition may run in families.", "Prevention": "There is no known prevention.", "Treatment": "Receiving treatment right away is key to preventing severe problems such as blindness or even stroke.Most of the time, you will receive corticosteroids medicines you take by mouth. These medicines are often started even before a biopsy is done. Your doctor may also tell you to take aspirin.Most people begin to feel better within a few days after starting treatment. However, you will need to take medicine for 1 - 2 years. The dose of corticosteroids will be cut back very slowly.Long-term treatment with corticosteroid medicines can make bones thinner and increase your chance of a fracture. You will need to take the following steps to protect your bone strength.Avoid smoking and excess alcohol intake, Take extra calcium and vitamin D (based on your health care provider's advice), Start walking or other forms of weight-bearing exercises, Have your bones checked with a bone mineral density (BMD) test or DEXA scan. You may also need to take other medications that suppress the immune system."}, "Turner syndrome": {"description": "Turner syndrome is a rare genetic condition in which a female does not have the usual pair of two X chromosomes.", "Possible Complications": "Abnormal aortic valve or narrowing of the aorta in an infant, and widening of the aorta\u00a0in an adult, Arthritis, Cataracts, Diabetes, Hashimoto's thyroiditis, Heart defects, High blood pressure, Kidney problems, Middle ear infections, Obesity, Scoliosis (in adolescence). ", "Symptoms": ["Swollen hands and feet", "Wide and webbed neck", "Absent or incomplete development at puberty, including sparse pubic hair and small breasts", "Broad, flat chest shaped like a shield", "Drooping eyelids", "Dry eyes", "Infertility", "No periods (absent menstruation)", "Short height", "Vaginal dryness, can lead to painful intercourse"], "Exams and Tests": "Turner syndrome can be diagnosed at any stage of life. It may be diagnosed before birth if a chromosome analysis is done during prenatal testing.The doctor will perform a physical exam and look for signs of poor development. Infants with Turner syndrome often have swollen hands and feet.The following tests may be performed:Blood hormone levels (luteinizing hormone and follicle stimulating hormone), Echocardiogram, Karyotyping, MRI of the chest, Ultrasound of reproductive organs and kidneys, Pelvic exam. Turner syndrome may also change estrogen levels in the blood and urine.", "Treatment": "Growth hormone may help a child with Turner syndrome grow taller. Estrogen replacement therapy is often started when the girl is 12 or 13 years old. This helps trigger the growth of breasts, pubic hair, and other sexual characteristics.Women with Turner syndrome who wish to become pregnant may consider using a donor egg.", "Prevention": "There is no known way to prevent Turner syndrome.", "Causes": "The normal amount of human chromosomes is 46. Chromosomes contain all of your genes and DNA, the building blocks of the body. Two of these chromosomes, the sex chromosomes, determine if you become a boy or a girl. Females normally have two of the same sex chromosomes, written as XX. Males have an X and a Y chromosome (written as XY).In Turner syndrome, cells are missing all or part of an X chromosome. The condition only occurs in females. Most commonly, the female patient has only one X chromosome. Others may have two X chromosomes, but one of them is incomplete. Sometimes, a female has some cells with two X chromosomes, but other cells have only one."}, "Tooth extraction": {"description": "A tooth extraction is a procedure to remove a tooth from the gum socket. It is usually done by a general dentist, an oral surgeon, or a periodontist."}, "Taking care of your vascular access for hemodialysis": {"description": "\r\n\r\n \r\nBefore your hemodialysis can start, an opening has to be made in your body so your blood can be accessed by the hemodialysis nurse and made to flow out and go back in. This opening is called a vascular access.\r\n"}, "Truncus arteriosus": {"description": "There are different types of truncus arteriosus.", "Possible Complications": "Heart failure, High blood pressure in the lungs (pulmonary hypertension). ", "Symptoms": ["Bluish skin (cyanosis)", "Delayed growth or growth failure", "Fatigue", "Lethargy", "Poor feeding", "Rapid breathing (tachypnea)", "Shortness of breath (dyspnea)", "Widening of the finger tips (clubbing)"], "Exams and Tests": "A murmur is usually heard when listening to the heart with a stethoscope.Tests include:ECG, Echocardiogram, Heart catheterization (only needed in rare cases to help with the diagnosis or in planning a treatment strategy), MRI of the heart, X-ray of the chest. ", "Treatment": "Surgery is needed to treat this condition. The surgery creates two separate arteries. Usually the truncal vessel is kept as the new aorta. A new pulmonary artery is created using tissue from another source or using a man-made tube. The branch pulmonary arteries are sewn to this new artery. The hole between the ventricles is closed.", "Prevention": "There is no known prevention, but early treatment can often prevent serious complications.", "Causes": "In normal circulation, the pulmonary artery comes out of the right ventricle and the aorta comes out of the left ventricle, which are separate from each other.With\u00a0truncus arteriosus, a single artery comes out of the ventricles. There is usually also a large hole between the two ventricles (ventricular septal defect). As a result, the blue (without oxygen) and red (oxygen-rich) blood mix.Some of this mixed blood goes to the lungs, and some goes to the rest goes\u00a0of the body. Often, more blood than usual ends up going to the lungs.If this condition is not treated, two problems occur:Too much blood circulation in the lungs may cause extra fluid to build up in and around them, making it difficult to breathe., If left untreated and\u00a0more than normal blood flows to the lungs for a long time, the blood vessels to the lungs become permanently damaged. Over time, it becomes very hard for the heart to force blood to them. This is called pulmonary hypertension, which can be life-threatening.. "}, "Tonsillectomies and children": {"description": "You and your child\u2019s doctor may consider a tonsillectomy if:"}, "Tooth anatomy": {"description": "The jaw bone is attached to all of the teeth and provides stability and mobility for the mouth and teeth for chewing. The lower jaw bone is called the mandible and the upper jaw bone is called the maxilla."}, "Tubal ligation - discharge ": {"description": "Your surgeon probably made 1 or 2 small cuts in the area around your belly button. Then your surgeon inserted a laparoscope (a narrow tube with a tiny camera on the end) and other instruments into your pelvic area. Your tubes were either cauterized (burned shut) or clamped off with a small clip, a ring, or rubber bands."}, "Tremor": {"description": "A tremor is a type of shaking movement. A tremor is most often noticed in your hands and arms. It may affect any body part, including your head or vocal cords.", "Causes": "Tremor may be caused by:Certain medicines, Brain, nerve, or movement disorders, including uncontrolled muscle movements (dystonia), Brain tumor, Excessive alcohol consumption, alcoholism, or alcohol withdrawal, Multiple sclerosis, Muscle tiredness or weakness, Normal aging, Overactive thyroid, Parkinson's disease, Stress, anxiety, or fatigue (can cause a postural tremor), Stroke, Too much coffee or other caffeinated drink. "}, "Tolmetin overdose": {"Symptoms": ["Breathing - rapid", "Breathing - slow", "Wheezing ", "Blurred vision", "Ringing in the ears", "\r\n  Kidney failure ", "Coma", "Confusion", "Convulsions", "Dizziness", "Drowsiness", "Incoherence (not understandable)", "Unsteadiness", "Abdominal pain", "Blood in the stomach and intestinal areas", "Diarrhea", "Heartburn", "Nausea", "Vomiting ", "Rash "], "description": "This is for information only and not for use in the treatment or management of an actual poison exposure. If you have an exposure, you should call your local emergency number (such as 911) or the National Poison Control Center at 1-800-222-1222.", "Prevention": "Keep all medications in child-proof containers and out of reach of children. Read all medication labels and take only medications which have been prescribed for you."}, "T3RU test": {"description": "Because the free T4 blood test and TBG blood tests are available, the T3RU test is rarely used now."}, "The day of your surgery - adult": {"description": "The doctor\u2019s office will let you know what time you should arrive on the day of surgery. Expect the time to arrive may be early in the morning."}, "Trigger finger": {"description": "Digital stenosing tenosynovitis; Trigger digit; Trigger finger release "}, "Thyroid cancer": {"description": "Thyroid cancer is a cancer that starts in the thyroid gland. The thyroid gland is located inside the front of your lower neck.", "Possible Complications": "Complications of thyroid cancer may include:Injury to the voice box and hoarseness after thyroid surgery, Low calcium level from accidental removal of the parathyroid glands during surgery, Spread of the cancer to the lungs, bones, or other parts of the body . ", "Symptoms": ["Cough", "Difficulty swallowing", "Enlargement of the thyroid gland", "Hoarseness or changing voice", "Neck swelling", "Thyroid lump (nodule)"], "Exams and Tests": "Your health care provider will perform a physical exam. This may reveal a lump in the thyroid, or swollen lymph nodes in the neck.The following tests may be done:Calcitonin blood test to check for medullary thyroid cancer, Laryngoscopy (looking inside the throat using a mirror or flexible tube called a laryngoscope placed through the mouth), Thyroid biopsy, Thyroid scan, TSH, free T4 (blood tests for thyroid function), Ultrasound of the thyroid. ", "Treatment": "Treatment depends on the type of thyroid cancer. Surgery is most often done. The entire thyroid gland is usually removed. If the doctor suspects that the cancer has spread to lymph nodes in the neck, these will also be removed.Radiation therapy may be done with or without surgery. It may be performed by:Aiming external beam (x-ray) radiation at the thyroid, Taking radioactive iodine by mouth . After treatment for thyroid cancer, you must take thyroid hormone pills for the rest of your life. The dosage is usually slightly higher than what your body needs. This helps keep the cancer from coming back. The pills also replace the thyroid hormone your body needs to function normally.If the cancer does not respond to surgery or radiation, and has spread to other parts of the body, chemotherapy may be used. This is only effective for a small number of patients.", "Prevention": "There is no known prevention. Awareness of risk (such as previous radiation therapy to the neck) can allow earlier diagnosis and treatment.Sometimes, people with family histories and genetic mutations related to thyroid cancer will have their thyroid gland removed to prevent cancer.", "Causes": "Thyroid cancer can occur in all age groups.Radiation increases the risk of developing thyroid cancer. Exposure may occur from:Radiation therapy to the neck (especially in childhood), Radiation exposure from nuclear plant disasters . Other risk factors are a family history of thyroid cancer and chronic goiter.There are several types of thyroid cancer:Anaplastic carcinoma (also called giant and spindle cell cancer) is the most dangerous form of thyroid cancer. It is rare, and spreads quickly., Follicular carcinoma is more likely to come back and spread., Medullary carcinoma is a cancer of non-thyroid cells that are normally present in the thyroid gland. This form of thyroid cancer tends to occur in families., Papillary carcinoma is the most common type, and it usually affects women of childbearing age. It spreads slowly and is the least dangerous type of thyroid cancer. . "}, "Television watching": {"description": "Below are some tips for setting up appropriate television watching by your children:"}, "Thiazide overdose": {"Symptoms": ["Coma (unresponsiveness)", "Confusion", "Dizziness", "Drowsiness", "Fainting", "Fever", "Frequent urination", "Low blood pressure", "Muscle cramps", "Nausea", "Pale-colored urine", "Rash", "Seizures", "Skin sensitivity to sunlight (photosensitivity)", "Slow breathing", "Vision problems (vision appears yellow)", "Weakness", "Yellow skin", "Vomiting "], "description": "This is for information only and not for use in the treatment or management of an actual poison exposure. If you have an exposure, you should call your local emergency number (such as 911) or the National Poison Control Center at 1-800-222-1222."}, "Thalassemia": {"description": "Thalassemia is a blood disorder passed down through families (inherited) in which the body makes an abnormal form of hemoglobin. Hemoglobin is the protein in red blood cells that carries oxygen. The disorder results in large numbers of red blood cells being destroyed, which leads to anemia.", "Possible Complications": "Untreated, thalassemia major leads to heart failure and liver problems. It also makes a person more likely to develop infections. Blood transfusions can help control some symptoms, but carry a risk of side effects from too much iron.", "Symptoms": ["Bone deformities in the face", "Fatigue", "Growth failure", "Shortness of breath", "Yellow skin (jaundice) "], "Exams and Tests": "Your doctor will do a physical exam to look for an enlarged spleen.A blood sample will be sent to a laboratory to be tested.Red blood cells will appear small and abnormally shaped when looked at under a microscope., A complete blood count (CBC) reveals anemia., A test called hemoglobin electrophoresis shows the presence of an abnormal form of hemoglobin., A test called mutational analysis can help detect alpha thalassemia. . ", "Treatment": "Treatment for thalassemia major often involves regular blood transfusions and folate supplements.If you receive blood transfusions, you should not take iron supplements. Doing so can cause a high amount of iron to build up in the body, which can be harmful.Persons who receive a lot of blood transfusions need a treatment called chelation therapy. This is done to remove excess iron from the body.A bone marrow transplant may help treat the disease in some patients, especially children.", "Causes": "Hemoglobin is made of two proteins: Alpha globin and beta globin. Thalassemia occurs when there is a defect in a gene that helps control production of one of these proteins.There are two main types of thalassemia:Alpha thalassemia occurs when a gene or genes related to the alpha globin protein are missing or changed (mutated)., Beta thalassemia occurs when similar gene defects affect production of the beta globin protein. . Alpha thalassemias occur most often in persons from Southeast Asia, the Middle East, China, and in those of African descent.Beta thalassemias occur most often in persons of Mediterranean origin. To a lesser extent, Chinese, other Asians, and African Americans can be affected.There are many forms of thalassemia. Each type has many different subtypes. Both alpha and beta thalassemia include the following two forms:Thalassemia major, Thalassemia minor . You must inherit the gene defect from both parents to develop thalassemia major.Thalassemia minor occurs if you receive the faulty gene from only one parent. Persons with this form of the disorder are carriers of the disease. Most of the time, they do not have symptoms.Beta thalassemia major is also called Cooley's anemia.Risk factors for thalassemia include:Asian, Chinese, Mediterranean, or African American ethnicity, Family history of the disorder . "}, "Teenage pregnancy ": {"description": "\r\n\r\n\r\n \r\nMost pregnant teenage girls did not plan to get pregnant. If you are a pregnant teen, it is very important to get health care during your pregnancy. Know that there are extra health risks for both you and your baby.\r\n\r\n"}, "Tdap (tetanus, diphtheria and pertussis) vaccine - what you need to know": {"description": "Content source: National Center for Immunization and Respiratory Diseases"}, "Total colectomy or proctocolectomy - discharge": {"description": "You had surgery to remove your large intestine. Your anus and rectum also may have been removed. You also may have had an ileostomy."}, "Tooth decay - early childhood": {"description": "Tooth decay is a serious problem for some children. Decay in the upper and lower front teeth are the most common problems."}, "Tardive dyskinesia": {"Symptoms": ["Facial grimacing", "Finger movement", "Jaw swinging", "Repetitive chewing", "Tongue thrusting"], "description": "Tardive dyskinesia is a disorder that involves involuntary movements. Most commonly, the movements\u00a0affect the lower face. Tardive means delayed and dyskinesia means abnormal movement.", "Causes": "Tardive dyskinesia is a serious side effect that occurs when you take medications called neuroleptics. Most often, it occurs when you take the medication for many months or years. In some cases, it occurs after you take them for as little as 6 weeks.The drugs that most commonly cause this disorder are older antipsychotic drugs, including:Chlorpromazine, Fluphenazine, Haloperidol, Trifluoperazine. Other drugs, similar to these antipsychotic drugs, that can cause tardive dyskinesia include:Flunarizine, Metoclopramide, Prochlorperazine. Newer antipsychotic drugs seem less likely to cause tardive dyskinesia, but they are not entirely without risk.", "Treatment": "When the drug is stopped early enough, the movements may stop.Medications to reduce the severity of the movements may also help. Botulinum toxin (Botox) injections may be effective."}, "Thyroid ultrasound": {"description": "A thyroid ultrasound is an imaging method to view the thyroid, a gland in the neck that regulates metabolism."}, "Traumatic events ": {"description": "A traumatic event may involve:"}, "TMJ disorders": {"description": "Temporomandibular joint and muscle disorders (TMJ disorders) are problems that affect the chewing muscles and joints that connect your lower jaw to your skull.", "Possible Complications": "Chronic face pain, Chronic headaches. ", "Symptoms": ["Biting or chewing difficulty or discomfort", "Clicking, popping, or grating sound when opening or closing the mouth", "Dull, aching pain in the face", "Earache", "Headache", "Jaw pain or tenderness of the jaw", "Locking of the jaw", "Difficulty opening or closing the mouth "], "Exams and Tests": "You may need to see more than one medical specialist for your TMJ pain and symptoms. This may include a primary care provider, a dentist, or an ear, nose, and throat (ENT) doctor, depending on your symptoms.You will need a thorough exam that involves:A dental exam to show if you have poor bite alignment, Feeling the joint and muscles for tenderness, Pressing around the head to locate areas that are sensitive or painful, Sliding the teeth from side to side, Watching, feeling, and listening to the jaw open and shut, X-rays or MRI of the jaw . Sometimes, the results of the physical exam may appear normal.Your doctor will also need to consider other conditions, such as infections, ear infections, or nerve-related problems and headaches that may be causing your symptoms.", "Treatment": "Simple, gentle therapies are recommended first.Learn how to gently stretch, relax, or massage the muscles around your jaw. Your doctor, dentist, or physical therapist can help you with these., Avoid actions that cause your symptoms, such as yawning, singing, and chewing gum., Try moist heat or cold packs on your face., Learn stress-reducing techniques., Exercising several times each week may help you increase your ability to handle pain. . Read as much as you can, as opinion varies widely on how to treat TMJ disorders. Get the opinions of several doctors. The good news is that most people eventually find something that helps.Ask your doctor or dentist about medications you can use:Short-term use of acetaminophen (Tylenol) or ibuprofen (Advil, Motrin), naproxen (Aleve, Naprosyn), or other nonsteroidal anti-inflammatory drugs, Muscle relaxant medicines or antidepressants, Muscle relaxant injections like toxin botulinum, Rarely, corticosteroid shots in the TMJ to treat inflammation . Mouth or bite guards, also called splints or appliances, have long been used to treat teeth grinding, clenching, and TMJ disorders.While many people have found them to be useful, the benefits vary widely. The guard may lose its effectiveness over time, or when you stop wearing it. Other people may feel worse pain when they wear one., There are different types of splints. Some fit over the top teeth, while others fit over the bottom teeth., Permanent use of these items may not be recommended. You should also stop if they cause any changes in your bite. . If conservative treatments do not work, it does not automatically mean you need more aggressive treatment. Use caution when considering nonreversible treatment method, such as orthodontics or surgery that permanently changes your bite.Reconstructive surgery of the jaw, or joint replacement, is rarely required. In fact, studies have shown that the results are often worse than before surgery.", "Prevention": "Many of the home-care steps to treat TMJ problems can also help prevent the condition. These steps include: Avoid eating hard foods and chewing gum., Learn relaxation techniques to reduce overall stress and muscle tension., Maintain good posture, especially if you work all day at a computer. Pause often to change position, rest your hands and arms, and relieve stressed muscles., Use safety measures to reduce the risk of fractures and dislocations. . ", "Causes": "There are two matching temporomandibular joints on each side of your head. They are located just in front of your ears. The abbreviation \"TMJ\" refers to the name of the joint but is often used to mean any disorders or symptoms of this region.Many TMJ-related symptoms are caused by the effects of physical stress on the structures around the joint. These structures include:Cartilage disk at the joint, Muscles of the jaw, face, and neck, Nearby ligaments, blood vessels, and nerves, Teeth . For many people with temporomandibular joint disorders, the cause is unknown. Some causes given for this condition are not well proven. These include:A bad bite or orthodontic braces, Stress and tooth grinding. Many people with TMJ problems do not grind their teeth, and many who have been grinding their teeth for a long time do not have problems with their TMJ joint. For some people, the stress associated with this disorder may be caused by the pain, as opposed to being the cause of the problem. . Poor posture can also be an important factor in TMJ symptoms. For example, holding the head forward while looking at a computer all day strains the muscles of the face and neck.Other factors that may make TMJ symptoms worse include stress, poor diet, and lack of sleep.Many people end up having \"trigger points.\" These are contracted muscles in your jaw, head, and neck. Trigger points can refer pain to other areas, causing a headache, earache, or toothache.Other possible causes of TMJ-related symptoms include arthritis, fractures, dislocations, and structural problems present since birth."}, "Transient familial hyperbilirubinemia": {"description": "Transient familial hyperbilirubinemia is a metabolic disorder that is passed down through families. Babies with this disorder are born with severe jaundice.", "Possible Complications": "Death or severe brain and nervous system (neurological) problems can occur if the condition is not treated.", "Symptoms": ["Yellow skin (jaundice)", "Yellow eyes (icterus)", "Lethargy"], "Exams and Tests": "Blood tests for bilirubin levels can identify the severity of the jaundice.", "Treatment": "Phototherapy with blue light is used to treat the high level of bilirubin. An exchange transfusion is sometimes necessary.", "Prevention": "Phototherapy can help prevent the potentially serious complications of this disorder.", "Causes": "Transient familial hyperbilirubinemia is an inherited disorder. It occurs when the body does not properly break down (metabolize) a certain form of bilirubin. Bilirubin levels rapidly build up in the body. The high levels are poisonous to the brain and can cause death."}, "Toilet bowl cleaners and deodorizers poisoning": {"Symptoms": ["Severe change in blood acid level (can lead to organ damage) ", "Loss of vision", "Severe pain in the throat", "Severe pain or burning in the nose, eyes, ears, lips, or tongue ", "Blood in the stool", "Burns of the food pipe (esophagus)", "Severe abdominal pain", "Vomiting", "Vomiting blood", "Collapse", "Low blood pressure that develops rapidly", "Breathing difficulty (from breathing in poison)", "Throat swelling (which may also cause breathing difficulty)", "Burns", "Holes (necrosis) in the skin or tissues underneath", "Irritation", "Coma (decreased level of consciousness and lack of consciousness)", "Headache", "Seizures"], "description": "This is for information only and not for use in the treatment or management of an actual poison exposure. If you have an exposure, you should call your local emergency number (such as 911) or the National Poison Control Center at 1-800-222-1222."}, "Toothaches": {"description": "Toothache is pain in or around a tooth.", "Causes": "Abscessed tooth, Earache, Injury to the jaw or mouth, Heart attack (can include jaw pain, neck pain, or toothache), Sinusitis, Tooth decay. "}, "Trisomy 18": {"description": "Trisomy 18 is a genetic disorder in which a person has a third copy of material from chromosome 18, instead of the usual two copies.", "Possible Complications": "Complications depend on the specific defects and symptoms.", "Symptoms": ["Clenched hands", "Crossed legs", "Feet with a rounded bottom (rocker-bottom feet)", "Low birth weight", "Low-set ears", "Mental delay", "Poorly developed fingernails", "Small head (microcephaly)", "Small jaw (micrognathia)", "Undescended testicle", "Unusual shaped chest (pectus carinatum) "], "Exams and Tests": "An exam during pregnancy may show an unusually large uterus and extra amniotic fluid. There may be an unusually small placenta when the baby is born.A physical exam of the infant may show unusual fingerprint patterns. X-rays may show a short breast bone. Chromosome studies will show trisomy 18, partial trisomy, or translocation.Other signs include:Hole, split, or cleft in the iris of the eye (coloboma), Separation between the left and right side of the abdominal muscle (diastasis recti), Umbilical hernia or inguinal hernia. There are often signs of congenital heart disease, such as:Atrial septal defect (ASD), Patent ductus arteriosus (PDA), Ventricular septal defect (VSD) . Tests may also show kidney problems, including:Horseshoe kidney, Hydronephrosis, Polycystic kidney. ", "Treatment": "There are no specific treatments for trisomy 18. Which treatments are used depend on the patient's individual condition.", "Prevention": "Tests can be done during pregnancy to find out if the child has this syndrome.Genetic testing is recommended for parents who have a child with this syndrome and who want to have more children.", "Causes": "Trisomy 18 occurs in 1 in 6,000 live births. It is three times more common in girls than boys. The syndrome occurs when there is extra material from chromosome 18. The extra material affects normal development."}, "Type 2 Diabetes": {"description": "Type 2 diabetes is a lifelong (chronic) disease in which there is a high level of sugar (glucose) in the blood. Type 2 diabetes is the most common form of diabetes.", "Possible Complications": "After many years, diabetes can lead to serious problems:You could have eye problems, including trouble seeing (especially at night), and light sensitivity. You could become blind., Your feet and skin can develop sores and infections. After a long time, your foot or leg may need to be amputated. Infection can also cause pain and itching in other parts of the body., Diabetes may make it harder to control your blood pressure and cholesterol. This can lead to a heart attack, stroke, and other problems. It can become harder for blood to flow to your legs and feet., Nerves in your body can get damaged, causing pain, tingling, and numbness., Because of nerve damage, you could have problems digesting the food you eat. You could feel weakness or have trouble going to the bathroom. Nerve damage can make it harder for men to have an erection., High blood sugar and other problems can lead to kidney damage. Your kidneys may not work as well as they used to. They may even stop working so that you need dialysis or a kidney transplant.. ", "Symptoms": ["Bladder, kidney, skin, or other infections that are more frequent or heal slowly", "Fatigue", "Hunger", "Increased thirst", "Increased urination", "Blurred vision", "Erectile dysfunction", "Pain or numbness in the feet or hands"], "Exams and Tests": "Your doctor may suspect that you have diabetes if your blood sugar level is higher than 200 mg/dL. To confirm the diagnosis, one or more of the following tests must be done.Diabetes blood tests:Fasting blood glucose level. Diabetes is diagnosed if it is higher than 126 mg/dL two different\u00a0times., Hemoglobin A1c (A1C) test. Diabetes is diagnosed if the test result is 6.5% or higher., Oral glucose tolerance test. Diabetes is diagnosed if the glucose level is higher than 200 mg/dL 2 hours after drinking a special sugar drink. . Diabetes screening is recommended for:Overweight children who have other risk factors for diabetes, starting at age 10 and repeated every 2 years, Overweight adults (BMI of 25 or higher) who have other risk factors, Adults starting at age 45 every 3 years, or at a younger age if the person has risk factors\u00a0. If you have been diagnosed with type 2 diabetes, you need to work closely with your doctor. You will likely need to see your doctor every 3 months. At these visits, you can expect your doctor to:Check your blood pressure, Check the skin and bones on your feet and legs, Check if your feet are becoming numb, Examine the back part of the eye with a special lighted instrument . The following tests will help you and your doctor monitor your diabetes and prevent problems.Check the skin and bones on your feet and legs., Check if your feet are getting numb (diabetic nerve disease)., Have your blood pressure checked at least\u00a0once a\u00a0year (blood pressure goals should be 140/80 mmHg or lower)., Have your A1C test every 6 months if your diabetes is well controlled. Have the test every 3 months if your diabetes is not well controlled., Have your cholesterol and triglyceride levels checked yearly., Get tests once a year\u00a0to make sure your kidneys are working well (microalbuminuria and serum creatinine)., Visit your eye doctor at least once a year, or more often if you have signs of diabetic eye disease., See the dentist every 6 months for a thorough dental cleaning and exam. Make sure your dentist and hygienist know that you have diabetes. . ", "Treatment": "The goal of treatment at first is to lower your high blood glucose levels. Long-term goals are to prevent problems from diabetes.The most important way to treat and manage type 2 diabetes is with activity and healthy eating.Everyone with diabetes should receive proper education and support about the best ways to manage their diabetes. Ask your healthcare provider about seeing a diabetes educator. \r\n LEARN THESE SKILLSLearning diabetes management skills will help you live well with diabetes. These skills help prevent health problems and the need for medical care. Skills include:How to test and record your blood glucose, What and when to eat, How to safely increase your activity and control your weight, How to take medications, if needed, How to recognize and treat low and high blood sugar, How to handle sick days, Where to buy diabetes supplies and how to store them . It may take several months to learn these skills. Keep learning about diabetes, its complications, and how to control and live well\u00a0with the disease. Stay up-to-date on new research and treatments.MANAGING YOUR BLOOD SUGARChecking your blood sugar levels yourself and writing down the results tells you how well you are managing your diabetes. Talk to your doctor and diabetes educator about how often to check.To check your blood sugar level, you use a device called a glucose meter. Usually, you prick your finger with a small needle called a lancet. This gives you a tiny drop of blood. You place the blood on a test strip and put the strip into the meter. The meter gives you a reading that tells you the level of your blood sugar.Your doctor or diabetes educator will help set up a testing schedule for you. Your doctor will help you set a target range for your blood sugar numbers. Keep these factors in mind:Most people with type 2 diabetes only need to check their blood sugar once or twice a day., If your blood sugar level is under control, you may only need to check it a few times a week., You may test yourself when you wake up, before meals, and at bedtime., You may need to test more often when you are sick or under stress. . Keep a record of your blood sugar for yourself and your doctor. Based on your numbers, you may need to make changes to your meals, activity, or medicines to keep your blood sugar level in the right range. HEALTHY EATING AND WEIGHT CONTROLWork closely with your doctor, nurse, and dietitian to learn how much fat, protein, and carbohydrates you need in your diet. Your meal plans should fit your lifestyle and habits and should include foods that you like.Managing your weight and having a well-balanced diet are important. Some people with type 2 diabetes can stop taking medicines after losing weight. This does not mean that their diabetes is cured. They still have diabetes.Very obese patients whose diabetes is not well managed with diet and medicine may consider weight loss (bariatric) surgery.REGULAR PHYSICAL ACTIVITYRegular activity is important for everyone. It is even more important when you have diabetes. Exercise is good for your health because it:Lowers your blood sugar level without medicine, Burns extra calories and fat to help manage your weight, Improves blood flow and blood pressure, Increases your energy level, Improves your ability to handle stress . Talk to your doctor before starting any exercise program. People with type 2 diabetes may need to take special steps before, during, and after physical activity or exercise.MEDICATIONS TO TREAT DIABETESIf diet and exercise do not help keep your blood sugar at normal or near-normal levels, your doctor may prescribe medication. Since these drugs help lower your blood sugar levels in different ways, your doctor may have you take more than one drug.Some of the most common types of medication are listed below. They are taken by mouth or injection.Alpha-glucosidase inhibitors, Biguanides, DPP IV inhibitors, Injectable medicines (GLP-1 analogs), Meglitinides, SGL T2 inhibitors, Sulfonylureas, Thiazolidinediones . You may need to take insulin if your blood sugar cannot be controlled with any of the above medicines. Insulin must be injected under the skin using a syringe, insulin pen, or pump. It cannot be taken by mouth because the acid in the stomach destroys insulin.PREVENTING COMPLICATIONSYour doctor may prescribe medicines or other treatments to reduce your chance of developing some of the more common complications of diabetes, including: Eye disease, Kidney disease, Heart disease and stroke. FOOT CAREPeople with diabetes are more likely than those without diabetes to have foot problems. Diabetes damages the nerves. This can make you less able to feel pressure on the foot. You many not notice a foot injury until you get a severe infection.Diabetes can also damage blood vessels. Small sores or breaks in the skin may become deeper skin sores (ulcers). The affected limb may need to be amputated if these skin ulcers do not heal or become larger, deeper, or infected.To prevent problems with your feet:Stop smoking if you smoke., Improve control of your blood sugar., Get a foot exam by your doctor at least twice a year and learn if you have nerve damage., Check and care for your feet every day. This is very important when you already have nerve or blood vessel damage or foot problems., Treat minor infections, such as athlete's foot, right away., Use moisturizing lotion on dry skin., Make sure you wear the right kind of shoes. Ask your doctor what type of shoe is right for you. . ", "Prevention": "You can help prevent type 2 diabetes by staying at a healthy body weight. You can get to a healthy weight by eating healthy foods, controlling your portion sizes, and leading an active lifestyle.", "Causes": "Insulin is a hormone produced in the pancreas by special cells, called beta cells. The pancreas is below and\u00a0behind the stomach. Insulin is needed to move blood sugar (glucose) into cells. Inside the cells, glucose is stored and later used for energy. When you have type 2 diabetes, your fat, liver, and muscle cells do not respond correctly to insulin. This is called insulin resistance. As a result, blood sugar does not get into these cells to be stored for energy.When sugar cannot enter cells, a high level of sugar builds up in the blood. This is called hyperglycemia.Type 2 diabetes usually occurs slowly over time. Most people with the disease are overweight or obese when they are diagnosed. Increased fat makes it harder for your body to use insulin the correct way.Type 2 diabetes can also develop in people who are thin. This is more common in the elderly.Family history and genes play a role in type 2 diabetes. Low activity level, poor diet, and excess body weight around the waist increase your chance of getting the disease. "}, "Trichorrhexis nodosa": {"description": "Trichorrhexis nodosa is a problem in which thickened or weak points (nodes) along the hair shaft cause your hair to break off easily. ", "Symptoms": [], "Exams and Tests": "Examination of the hair shafts with a microscope may reveal changes that indicate trichorrhexis nodosa.", "Causes": "Your genes may play a role in whether or not you develop trichorrhexis nodosa.Certain things you do to your hair such as blow-drying, over-brushing, perming, or excessive chemical use, appear to trigger the condition.In some cases, trichorrhexis nodosa is caused be an underlying disorder such as hypothyroidism, argininosuccinicaciduria, Menkes' kinky hair syndrome, ectodermal dyspalsia, Netherton syndrome, or trichothiodystrophy.", "Prevention": "Avoid aggressive brushing and grooming, strong chemicals, permanents, straightening, and similar hair-damaging habits.", "Treatment": "Any underlying metabolic disorders will be treated.Improving environmental factors will reduce damage to the hair.Your doctor may recommend gentle brushing with a soft brush instead of aggressive brushing, ratting, or other procedures.Other things that may help improve the condition include:\u00a0\u00a0\u00a0\u00a0\u2022\u00a0\u00a0\u00a0\u00a0Avoid harsh chemicals such as those used in straightening compounds and permanents.\u00a0\u00a0\u00a0\u00a0\u2022\u00a0\u00a0\u00a0\u00a0Do not use a very hot hair dryer for long periods of time. Do not iron the hair.\u00a0\u00a0\u00a0\u2022\u00a0\u00a0\u00a0\u00a0Do not use a harsh shampoo, and always use hair conditioner."}, "Trypsin and chymotrypsin in stool": {"description": "This article discusses the test to measure trypsin and chymotrypsin in stool."}, "Tennis elbow surgery - discharge": {"description": "\r\nYou have had surgery to repair a tendon in your elbow. The surgeon made a cut (incision) over the tendon, then scraped away (excise) the unhealthy part of your tendon, leaving the healthy part alone.\r\n"}, "Tubercle": {"description": "The term \"tubercle\" is less commonly used to refer to skin irritation resulting from a tuberculosis (TB) infection."}, "Typhus": {"description": "Typhus is a bacterial disease spread by lice or fleas.", "Possible Complications": "Typhus may cause these complications: Renal insufficiency\u00a0(kidneys cannot function normally), Pneumonia, Central nervous system damage . ", "Symptoms": ["Abdominal pain", "Backache", "Dull red rash that begins on the middle of the body and spreads", "Fever (can be extremely high 105\u00b0F to 106\u00b0F, 40.6\u00b0C to 41.1\u00b0C) that may last up to 2 weeks", "Hacking, dry cough", "Headache", "Joint and muscle pain", "Nausea", "Vomiting ", "Chills", "Confusion", "Cough", "Delirium", "High fever", "Joint pain", "Lights that appear very bright; light may hurt the eyes", "Low blood pressure", "Rash that begins on the chest and spreads to the rest of the body (except the palms of the hands and soles of the feet)", "Severe headache", "Severe muscle pain", "Stupor"], "Exams and Tests": "A complete blood count (CBC) may show a low white blood cell count, anemia, and low platelets. Other blood tests for typhus may show:High levels of typhus antibodies, Low levels of albumin, Low sodium level, Mildly high liver enzymes . ", "Treatment": "Treatment includes the following antibiotics:Doxycycline, Tetracycline, Chloramphenicol (less common) . Tetracycline taken by mouth can permanently stain teeth that are still forming. It is usually not prescribed for children until after all of their permanent teeth have grown.People with epidemic typhus may need oxygen and intravenous (IV) fluids.", "Prevention": "Avoid being in areas where you might encounter rat fleas or lice. Good sanitation and public health measures reduce the rat population.Measures to get rid of lice when an infection has been found include:Bathing, Boiling clothes or avoiding infested clothing for at least 5 days (lice will die without feeding on blood), Using insecticides (10% DDT, 1% malathion, or 1% permethrin). ", "Causes": "Typhus is caused by 2 types of bacteria: Rickettsia typhi or Rickettsia prowazekii. Rickettsia typhi causes endemic or murine typhus. Endemic typhus is uncommon in the United States. It is usually seen in areas where hygiene is poor and the temperature is cold. Endemic typhus is sometimes called \"jail fever.\" The bacteria that causes this type is usually spread from rats to fleas to humans., Murine typhus occurs in the southern United States, particularly California and Texas. It is often seen during the summer and fall. It is rarely deadly. You are more likely to get this type of typhus if you are around rat feces or fleas, and other animals such as cats, possums, raccoons, and skunks. . Rickettsia prowazekii causes epidemic typhus. It is spread by lice. Brill-Zinsser disease is a mild form of epidemic typhus. It occurs when the bacteria becomes active again in a person who was previously infected. It is more common in the elderly. "}, "Traveler\u2019s diarrhea diet": {"description": "This article tells you what you should eat or drink if you have traveler's diarrhea."}, "Tremor - self-care": {"description": "Shaking - self-care"}, "Thoracic aortic aneurysm": {"description": "A thoracic aortic aneurysm occurs in the part of the body's largest artery (the aorta) that passes through the chest.", "Possible Complications": "Serious complications after aortic surgery can include:Bleeding, Graft infection, Heart attack, Irregular heartbeat, Kidney damage, Paralysis, Stroke. Death soon after the operation occurs in 5 - 10% of patients.Complications after aneurysm stenting include damage to the blood vessels supplying the leg, which may require another operation.", "Symptoms": ["The aneurysm grows quickly", "The aneurysm tears open (called a rupture)", "Blood leaks along the wall of the aorta (aortic dissection)", "Hoarseness", "Swallowing problems", "High-pitched breathing (stridor)", "Swelling in the neck", "Chest or upper back pain", "Clammy skin", "Nausea and vomiting", "Rapid heart rate", "Sense of impending doom"], "Exams and Tests": "The physical exam is often normal unless a rupture or leak has occurred. Most thoracic aortic aneurysms are detected on imaging tests performed for other reasons. These tests include chest x-ray, echocardiogram, or chest CT scan or MRI. A chest CT scan shows the size of the aorta and the exact location of the aneurysm.An aortogram (a special set of x-ray images made when dye is injected into the aorta) can identify the aneurysm and any branches of the aorta that may be involved.", "Treatment": "There is a risk that the aneurysm may open up (rupture) if you do not have surgery to repair it.The treatment depends on the location of the aneurysm. The aorta is made of three parts:The first part moves upward toward the head. It is called the ascending aorta., The middle part is curved. It is called the aortic arch., The last part moves downward, toward the feet. It is called the descending aorta. . For patients with aneurysms of the ascending aorta or aortic arch:Surgery to replace the aorta is recommended if an aneurysm is larger than 5 - 6 centimeters., A cut is made in the middle of the chest bone., The aorta is replaced with a plastic or fabric graft., This is major surgery that requires a heart-lung machine. . For patients with aneurysms of the descending thoracic aorta:Major surgery is done to replace the aorta with a fabric graft if the aneurysm is larger than 6 centimeters., This surgery is done through a cut on the left side of the chest, which may reach to the abdomen., Endovascular stenting is a less invasive option. A stent is a tiny metal or plastic tube that is used to hold an artery open. Stents can be placed into the body without cutting the chest. Not all people with descending thoracic aneurysms are candidates for stenting, however. . ", "Prevention": "To prevent atherosclerosis:Control your blood pressure and blood lipid levels., Do not smoke., Eat a healthy diet., Exercise regularly.. ", "Causes": "The most common cause of a thoracic aortic aneurysm is hardening of the arteries (atherosclerosis). This condition is more common in people with high cholesterol, long-term high blood pressure, or who smoke.Other risk factors for a thoracic aneurysm include:Changes caused by age, Connective tissue disorders such as Marfan or Ehlers-Danlos syndrome, Inflammation of the aorta, Injury from falls or motor vehicle accidents, Syphilis. "}, "Tick removal": {"description": "Ticks can be fairly large -- about the size of a pencil eraser. They can also be so small that they are very hard to see. Ticks can cause a number of health conditions. Some of these can be serious.", "Prevention": "Wear long pants and long sleeves when walking through heavy brush, tall grass, and thickly wooded areas., Pull your socks over the outside of your pants to prevent ticks from crawling up your leg., Keep your shirt tucked into your pants., Wear light-colored clothes so that ticks can be spotted easily., Spray your clothes with insect repellant., Check your clothes and skin often while in the woods.. After returning home:Remove your clothes. Look closely at all your skin surfaces, including your scalp. Ticks can quickly climb up the length of your body., Some ticks are large and easy to locate. Other ticks can be quite small, so carefully\u00a0look at\u00a0all black or brown spots on the skin., If possible, ask someone to help you examine your body for ticks., An adult should examine children carefully.. "}, "TSI test": {"description": "TSI stands for thyroid stimulating immunoglobulin. A TSI test measures the amount of thyroid stimulating immunoglobulin in your blood. TSIs are antibodies that\u00a0tell the thyroid gland to swell and release excess amounts of thyroid hormone into the blood."}, "Transfusion reaction - hemolytic": {"description": "There are other types of allergic transfusion reactions that do not cause hemolysis.", "Possible Complications": "Acute kidney failure, Anemia, Lung problems, Shock. ", "Symptoms": ["Back pain", "Bloody urine", "Chills", "Fainting or dizziness", "Fever", "Flank pain", "Flushing of the skin "], "Exams and Tests": "This disease may change the results of these tests:CBC, Coombs' test, direct, Coombs' test, indirect, Fibrin degradation products, Haptoglobin, Partial thromboplastin time, Prothrombin time, Serum bilirubin, Serum creatinine, Serum hemoglobin, Urinalysis, Urine hemoglobin. ", "Treatment": "Therapy can prevent or treat the severe effects of a hemolytic transfusion reaction. If symptoms occur during the transfusion, the transfusion must be stopped immediately. Blood samples from the person getting the transfusion and from the donor may be tested to tell whether symptoms are being caused by a transfusion reaction.Mild symptoms may be treated with:\r\nAcetaminophen, a pain reliever to reduce fever and discomfort\r\n  , Fluids given through a vein (intravenous) and other medicines to treat or prevent kidney failure and shock.\r\n  . ", "Prevention": "Donated blood is put into ABO and Rh groups to reduce the risk of transfusion reaction.Before a transfusion, patient and donor blood are tested (crossmatched) to see if they are compatible with each other. A small amount of donor blood is mixed with a small amount of patient blood. The mixture is checked under a microscope for signs of antibody reaction.Before the transfusion is given, the health care provider will usually check again to make sure you are receiving the right unit of blood.", "Causes": "Blood is classified into different blood types called A, B, AB, and O.Your immune system can usually tell its own blood cells from blood cells from those of another person. If other blood cells enter your body, your immune system may already have antibodies against them. These antibodies will work to destroy the blood cells that your immune system does not recognize.Another way blood cells may be classified is by Rh factors. People who have Rh factors in their blood are called \"Rh positive.\" People without these factors are called \"Rh negative.\" Rh negative people form antibodies against Rh factor if they receive Rh positive blood.There are also other factors to identify blood cells, in addition to ABO and Rh.Blood that you receive in a transfusion must be compatible with your own blood. This means that your body does not have antibodies against the blood you receive.Most of the time, blood transfusion between compatible groups (such as O+ to O+) does not cause a problem. Blood transfusion between incompatible groups (such as A+ to O-) causes an immune response. This can lead to a serious transfusion reaction. The immune system attacks the donated blood cells, causing them to burst.Today, all blood is carefully screened. Transfusion reactions very rare."}, "Titer": {"description": "A titer is a measurement of the amount or concentration of a substance in a solution. It usually refers to the amount of\u00a0antibodies found in a patient's blood."}, "Taking warfarin (Coumadin)": {"description": "Changing how you take your warfarin, taking other medicines, and eating certain foods all can change the way warfarin works in your body. If this happens, you may be more likely to form a clot or have bleeding problems."}, "Teenagers and drugs": {"description": "While you cannot control everything your teen does, you can take steps to help your child stay away from drugs. Start by learning all you can about drugs and drug abuse. Learn the signs of drug use so that you can be alert. Then use these tips to help prevent drug use in your teen."}, "Tularemia": {"description": "Tularemia is an infection common in wild rodents. It is passed to humans through contact with tissue from the infected animal. It can also be passed by ticks, biting flies, and mosquitoes.", "Possible Complications": "Bone infection (osteomyelitis), Infection of the sac around the heart (pericarditis), Meningitis, Pneumonia. ", "Symptoms": ["Chills", "Eye irritation (conjunctivitis -- if the infection began in the eye)", "Fever", "Headache", "Joint stiffness", "Muscle pains", "Red spot on the skin, growing to become a sore (ulcer)", "Shortness of breath", "Sweating", "Weight loss"], "Exams and Tests": "Tests for the condition include:Blood culture for tularemia bacteria, Blood test measuring the body's immune response to the infection (serology for tularemia), Chest x-ray, Polymerase chain reaction (PCR) test of a sample from an ulcer. This disease may also affect the results of febrile agglutinins and some tests for infectious mononucleosis.", "Treatment": "The goal of treatment is to cure the infection with antibiotics.Streptomycin and tetracycline are commonly used to treat this infection. Once daily gentamicin treatment has been tried with as an alternative to streptomycin. This medicine appears to be very effective but it has been studied in only a few cases because this is a rare disease. Tetracycline and chloramphenicol can be used alone but not used as a first choice.Note: Oral tetracycline is usually not prescribed for children until after all their permanent teeth have come in. It can permanently discolor teeth that are still forming.", "Prevention": "Preventative measures include skinning or dressing wild animals with gloves and avoiding sick or dead animals.", "Causes": "Tularemia is caused by the bacterium Francisella tularensis.Humans can get the disease through:A bite from an infected tick, horsefly, or mosquito, Breathing in infected dirt or plant material, Direct contact, through a break in the skin, with an infected animal or its dead body (most often a rabbit, muskrat, beaver, or squirrel), Eating infected meat (rare). The disorder most commonly occurs in North America and parts of Europe and Asia. In the US, this disease is found more often in Missouri, South Dakota, Oklahoma and Arkansas. Although outbreaks can occur in the United States, they are rare.Some people may develop pneumonia after breathing in infected dirt or plant material. This is known to occur on Martha's Vineyard, where bacteria are present in rabbits, raccoons, and skunks."}, "Timing of breastfeeding": {"description": "Breastfeeding a baby on demand is full-time and exhausting work. Your body needs energy to produce enough milk. Be sure to eat well, rest, and sleep. Take good care of yourself so you can take good care of your baby.\r\n"}, "Tetrahydrozoline poisoning": {"Symptoms": ["Coma", "Difficulty breathing or no breathing", "Blurred vision", "Blue lips and fingernails", "Change in pupil size", "Changes in blood pressure (high at first, low later)", "Fast heartbeat", "Headache", "Irritability", "Low body temperature", "Nausea and vomiting", "Nervousness", "Seizures", "Tremors"], "description": "This is for information only and not for use in the treatment or management of an actual poison exposure. If you have an exposure, you should call your local emergency number (such as 911) or a local poison control center at 1-800-222-1222."}, "Talcum powder poisoning": {"Symptoms": ["Urine output, decreased significantly (or none)", "Cough", "Eye irritation", "Throat irritation ", "Diarrhea", "Vomiting ", "Collapse", "Convulsions", "Low blood pressure", "Chest pain", "Cough", "Difficulty breathing", "Lung failure", "Rapid, shallow breathing", "Wheezing", "Coma (decreased level of consciousness and lack of responsiveness)", "Drowsiness", "Fever", "Lack of desire to do anything (lethargy)", "Twitching of arms, hands, legs, or feet", "Twitching of the facial muscles", "Blisters", "Blue skin, lips, and fingernails "], "description": "This is for information only and not for use in the treatment or management of an actual poison exposure. If you have an exposure, you should call your local emergency number (such as 911) or the National Poison Control Center at 1-800-222-1222."}, "Tropical sprue": {"description": "Tropical sprue is a condition that occurs in people who live in or visit tropical areas. It impairs nutrients from being absorbed from the intestines. This causes malabsorption.", "Possible Complications": "Vitamin and mineral deficiencies are common.In children, sprue leads to:Delay in the maturing of bones (skeletal maturation), Growth failure. ", "Symptoms": ["Abdominal cramps", "Diarrhea, worse on high-fat diet", "Excessive gas (flatus)", "Indigestion", "Irritability", "Muscle cramps", "Numbness", "Paleness", "Weight loss"], "Exams and Tests": "Bone density test, Complete blood count (CBC), Comprehensive metabolic panel, Enteroscopy, Folate level (serum), Iron level (serum), Stool examination for bacteria and parasites, Upper endoscopy, Upper GI series, Vitamin B12 level (serum), Vitamin D level. ", "Treatment": "Treatment begins with plenty of fluids and electrolytes. Replacement of folate, iron, vitamin B12, and other nutrients may also be needed. Antibiotic therapy with tetracycline or Bactrim is typically given for 3 to 6 months.In most cases, oral tetracycline is not prescribed for children until after all the permanent teeth have come in. This medicine can permanently discolor teeth that are still forming. However, other antibiotics can be used.", "Prevention": "Other than avoiding living in or traveling to tropical climates, there is no known prevention for tropical sprue.", "Causes": "This disease is caused by inflammation of, and damage to the small intestine. It comes from having too much of certain types of bacteria in the intestines.Risk factors are:Living in the tropics, Long periods of travel to tropical destinations . "}, "Taking antacids": {"description": "All antacids work equally as well, but they can cause different side effects. If you use antacids often and have problems with side effects, talk with your doctor."}, "Thiamin": {"description": "Thiamin is one of the B vitamins, a group of water-soluble vitamins that are part of many of the chemical reactions in the body."}, "T4 test": {"description": "T4 (thyroxine) is\u00a0the main\u00a0hormone produced by the thyroid gland. A laboratory test can be done to measure the amount of T4 in your blood."}, "Throat swab culture": {"description": "A throat swab culture is a laboratory test that is done to identify germs that may cause infection in the throat. It is most often used to diagnose strep throat."}, "Thrombolytic drugs for heart attack": {"description": "Other treatments to open blocked or narrowed vessels that may be done in place of or along with thrombolytic therapy include:"}, "Thyroid function tests": {"description": "Other thyroid tests include:"}, "Tennis elbow surgery": {"description": "This article discusses surgery to repair tennis elbow. "}, "Trypsinogen test": {"description": "A test can be done to measure the amount of trypsinogen in your blood."}, "Tetralogy of Fallot": {"description": "Tetralogy of Fallot is a type of congenital heart defect. Congenital means that it is\u00a0present at birth.", "Possible Complications": "Delayed growth and development, Irregular heart rhythms (arrhythmias), Seizures during periods when there is not enough oxygen, Death. ", "Symptoms": ["Blue color to the skin (cyanosis), which gets worse when the baby is upset", "Clubbing of fingers (skin or bone enlargement around the fingernails)\r\n\u00a0\u00a0\u00a0 ", "Difficulty feeding (poor feeding habits)", "Failure to gain weight", "Passing out", "Poor development", "Squatting during episodes of cyanosis"], "Exams and Tests": "A physical examination with a stethoscope almost always reveals a heart murmur.Tests may include:Chest x-ray, Complete blood count (CBC), Echocardiogram, Electrocardiogram (EKG), MRI of the heart (generally after surgery). ", "Treatment": "Surgery to repair tetralogy of Fallot is done when the infant is very young. Sometimes more than one surgery is needed. When more than one surgery is used, the first surgery is done to help increase blood flow to the lungs.Surgery to correct the problem may be done at a later time. Often only one corrective surgery is performed in the first few months of life. Corrective surgery is done to widen part of the narrowed pulmonary tract and close the ventricular septal defect.", "Prevention": "There is no known prevention.", "Causes": "Tetralogy of Fallot causes low oxygen levels in the blood. This leads to cyanosis (a bluish-purple color to the skin).The classic form includes four defects of the heart and its major blood vessels:Ventricular septal defect (hole between the right and left ventricles), Narrowing of the pulmonary outflow tract (the valve and artery that connect the heart with the lungs), Overriding aorta (the artery that carries oxygen-rich blood to the body) that is shifted over the right ventricle and ventricular septal defect, instead of coming out only from the left ventricle, Thickened wall of the right ventricle (right ventricular hypertrophy). Tetralogy of Fallot is rare, but it is the most common form of cyanotic congenital heart disease. Patients with tetralogy of Fallot are more likely to also have other congenital defects.The cause of most congenital heart defects is unknown. Many factors seem to be involved.Factors that increase the risk for this condition during pregnancy include:Alcoholism in the mother, Diabetes, Mother who is over 40 years old, Poor nutrition during pregnancy, Rubella or other viral illnesses during pregnancy. Children with tetralogy of Fallot are more likely to have chromosome disorders, such as Down syndrome and DiGeorge syndrome (a condition that causes heart defects, low calcium levels, and poor immune function)."}, "Traumatic injury of the bladder and urethra": {"description": "Traumatic injury of the bladder and urethra involves damage caused by an outside force.", "Possible Complications": " \r\n Acute bilateral obstructive uropathy \r\n , Bleeding, hemorrhage, shock,  \r\n Chronic bilateral obstructive uropathy \r\n , Peritonitis, Scar formation, blockage of the urethra, Urinary retention. ", "Symptoms": ["Abdominal pain, lower", "Blood in the urine", "Bloody discharge\u00a0", "Difficulty beginning to urinate or inability to empty the bladder", "Loss of fluids", "Painful urination", "Pelvic pain", "Severe bleeding", "Small, weak urine stream ", "Decreased alertness, drowsiness, coma", "Increased heart rate", "Pale skin", "Sweating", "Skin that is cool to the touch "], "Exams and Tests": "An exam of the genitals may show injury to the urethra. An x-ray of the urethra using dye (retrograde urethrogram) should be done if the health care provider suspects an injury.The exam may also show:\r\n  Bladder injury or swollen (distended) bladder\r\n  , \r\n  Other signs of pelvic injury, such as bruising over the penis, scrotum, and perineum\r\n  , \r\n  Signs of hemorrhage or shock, including decreased blood pressure -- especially in cases of pelvic fracture\r\n  , \r\n  Tenderness and bladder fullness when touched (caused by urine retention)\r\n  , \r\n  Tender and unstable pelvic bones\r\n  , \r\n  Urine in the abdominal cavity\r\n  . A catheter (tube that drains urine from the body) may be inserted once an injury of the urethra\u00a0has been ruled out. An x-ray of the bladder using dye to highlight any damage can then be done.", "Treatment": "The goals of treatment are to:Control symptoms, Repair the injury, Prevent complications . Emergency treatment of bleeding or shock may include:Blood transfusions, Intravenous (IV) fluids, Monitoring in the hospital . You may need emergency surgery to repair the injury and drain the urine from the abdominal cavity in the case of peritonitis (inflammation of the abdominal cavity). The injury can be successfully repaired with surgery in most cases. The bladder may be drained by a catheter through the urethra or the abdominal wall over a period of days to weeks. This will prevent urine from building up in the bladder. It will also allow the injured bladder or urethra to heal and prevent swelling in the urethra from blocking urine flow.If the urethra has been cut, a urological specialist can put a catheter in place. If this cannot be done, a tube will be inserted through the abdominal wall directly into the bladder. This is called a suprapubic tube. It will be left in place until the swelling goes away and the urethra can be repaired with surgery. This takes 3 - 6 months.", "Prevention": "Prevent outside injury to the bladder and urethra by following these\u00a0safety steps:Do not insert objects into the urethra., If you need self-catheterization, follow the instructions of your health care provider., Use safety equipment during work and play. . ", "Causes": "Types of bladder injuries include: Blunt trauma (such as a blow to the body), Penetrating wounds (such as bullet or stab wounds). The amount of injury to the bladder depends on how full the bladder was at the time of injury and what caused the injury.Traumatic injury to the bladder is uncommon. The bladder is located within the bony structures of the pelvis. This protects it from most outside forces. Injury may occur if there is a blow to the pelvis severe enough to break the bones. In this case, bone fragments may penetrate the bladder wall. Less than 1 in 10 pelvic fractures lead to bladder injury.Other causes of bladder or urethra injury include:Surgeries of the pelvis or groin (including hernia repair and hysterectomy), Tears, cuts, bruises, and other injuries to the urethra (the tube that carries urine out of the body) -- most common in men., Straddle injuries (direct force that injures the area behind the scrotum), Deceleration injury (for example, a motor vehicle accident that occurs when you have a full bladder and are wearing a seatbelt) . Injury to the bladder or urethra may cause urine to leak into the abdomen, leading to infection (peritonitis). This type of injury is more common if the bladder is full."}, "Thoracic spine x-ray": {"description": "A thoracic spine x-ray is an x-ray of the twelve chest (thoracic) bones (vertebrae). The vertebrae are separated by flat pads of cartilage called disks that provide a cushion between the bones."}, "Thyroid scan": {"description": "A thyroid scan is a nuclear medicine test that uses a radioactive iodine tracer to examine the structure and function of the thyroid gland. This test is often done together with a radioactive iodine uptake test."}, "Transient ischemic attack": {"description": "A TIA is felt to be a warning sign that a true stroke may happen in the future if something is not done to prevent it.", "Symptoms": ["Change in alertness (including sleepiness, unconsciousness, and coma)", "Changes in the senses (such as hearing, vision, taste, and touch)", "Mental changes (such as confusion, memory loss, difficulty writing or reading, trouble speaking or understanding others)", "Muscle problems (such as weakness, trouble swallowing, trouble walking)", "Dizziness or loss of balance and coordination", "Lack of control over the bladder or bowels", "Nerve problems (such as numbness or tingling on one side of the body) "], "Exams and Tests": "Often, the symptoms and signs of a TIA will have gone away by the time you get to the hospital. A TIA diagnosis may be made based on your medical history alone.The health care provider will do a complete physical exam to check for heart and blood vessel problems, as well as for problems with nerves and muscles.The doctor will use a stethoscope to listen to your heart and arteries. An abnormal sound called a bruit may be heard when listening to the carotid artery in the neck or other artery. A bruit is caused by irregular blood flow.Tests will be done to rule out a stroke or other disorders that may cause the symptoms:You will almost always have a head CT scan or brain MRI. A stroke may show changes on these tests, but TIAs will not., You may have an angiogram, CT angiogram, or MR angiogram to see which blood vessel is blocked or bleeding., You may have an echocardiogram if your doctor thinks you may have a blood clot from the heart., Carotid duplex (ultrasound) can show if the carotid arteries in your neck have narrowed., You may have an EKG and heart rhythm monitoring tests to check for an irregular heartbeat. . Your doctor may do other tests to check for\u00a0high blood pressure, heart disease, diabetes, high cholesterol, and other causes of, and risk factors for TIAs or stroke.", "Causes": "A TIA is different than a stroke. After a TIA, the blockage breaks up quickly and dissolves. A TIA does not cause brain tissue to die.The loss of blood flow to an area of the brain can be caused by:A blood clot in an artery of the brain, A blood clot that travels to the brain from somewhere else in the body (for example, from the heart), An injury to blood vessels, Narrowing of a blood vessel in the brain or leading to the brain . High blood pressure is the main risk for TIAs and stroke. The other major risk factors are:Atrial fibrillation, Diabetes, Family history of stroke, High cholesterol, Increasing age, especially after age 55, Race (African Americans are more likely to die of stroke), Smoking . People who have heart disease or poor blood flow in their legs caused by narrowed arteries are also more likely to have a TIA or stroke.", "Prevention": "Follow your health care provider's instructions on how to prevent TIAs and strokes. You will likely be told to make lifestyle changes and take medicines to treat high blood pressure or high cholesterol.", "Treatment": "If you have had a TIA within the last 48 hours, you will likely be admitted to the hospital so that doctors can search for the cause and observe you.High blood pressure, heart disease, diabetes, high cholesterol, and blood disorders will be treated as needed. You will be encouraged to make lifestyle changes to reduce your risk of further symptoms. Changes include quitting smoking, exercising more, and eating healthier foods.You may receive blood thinners, such as aspirin or Coumadin, to reduce blood clotting. Some people who have blocked neck arteries may need surgery (carotid endarterectomy). If you have an\u00a0irregular heartbeat (atrial fibrillation), you will be treated to avoid future complications."}, "Tests and visits before surgery": {"description": "Many different people on your surgery team may ask you the same questions before your surgery. This is because your team needs to have as much information as they can gather in order to give you the best surgery results. Try to be patient if you are asked the same questions more than once."}, "Tinnitus": {"Prevention": "Wear ear protection in any situations where ear damage is possible (such as loud concerts or jackhammers). If you have hearing loss, avoid further damage to your hearing by avoiding excessive noise.", "description": "The noises you hear can be soft or loud. They may sound like ringing, blowing, roaring, buzzing, hissing, humming, whistling, or sizzling. You may even think you are hearing air escaping, water running, the inside of a seashell, or musical notes.", "Causes": "It is not known exactly what causes a person to \"hear\" sounds with no outside source of the noise. However, tinnitus can be a symptom of almost any ear problem, including:Ear infections, Foreign objects or wax in the ear, Hearing loss from loud noises, Meniere's disease -- an inner ear disorder that involves hearing loss and dizziness. Alcohol, caffeine, antibiotics, aspirin, or other drugs can also cause ear noises.Tinnitus may occur with hearing loss. Sometimes, it is a sign of high blood pressure, an allergy, or anemia. Rarely, tinnitus is a sign of a serious problem like a tumor or aneurysm."}, "Torticollis": {"description": "Torticollis is a condition in which the neck muscles cause the head to turn or rotate to the side.", "Possible Complications": "Complications may include:Muscle swelling due to constant tension, Nervous system symptoms due to\u00a0pressure on\u00a0nerve roots. ", "Symptoms": ["Limited range of motion of the head", "Headache", "Head tremor", "Neck pain", "Shoulder that is higher than the other", "Stiffness of the neck muscles", "Swelling of the neck muscles (possibly present at birth) "], "Exams and Tests": "Tests or procedures may be done to rule out possible causes of head and neck pain. A physical exam will show: Abnormal position of the head that makes it rotate, tilt, or lean forward or back. Many people have more than one abnormal head position., Shortened or larger neck muscles, The entire head pulls and turns to one side (in more severe cases) . Tests that may be done include:CT scan of the neck, Electromyogram (EMG) to see which muscles are most affected, MRI of the brain, Blood tests to look for medical conditions that are linked to torticollis . ", "Treatment": "Treating torticollis that is present at birth involves stretching the shortened neck muscle. Passive stretching and positioning are used in infants and small children. In passive stretching, something is used to hold the body part in a certain position. This could be a device such as a strap, a person, or something else. These treatments are often successful, especially if they are started within 3 months of birth.Surgery to correct the neck muscle may be done in the preschool years, if other treatment methods fail.Torticollis that is caused by damage to the nervous system, spine, or muscles is treated by finding the cause of the disorder and treating it. Depending on the cause, treatment may include: Applying heat, traction to the neck, and massage to help relieve head and neck pain, Stretching exercises and neck braces to help with muscle spasms, Taking medications such as the drug baclofen to reduce neck muscle contractions, Injecting botulinum toxin every 3 months, Surgery of the spine might be needed when the torticollis is due to dislocated vertebrae. In some cases, surgery involves destroying some of the nerves in the neck muscles, or using brain stimulation. . ", "Prevention": "While there is no known way to prevent this condition, early treatment may prevent it from getting worse.", "Causes": "Torticollis may be:Inherited -- due to changes in your genes, Acquired -- develops as a result of damage to the nervous system, upper spine, or muscles. If the condition occurs without a known cause, it is called idiopathic torticollis.Torticollis may develop in childhood or adulthood. Congenital torticollis (present at birth) may occur if the baby's head was in the wrong position while growing in the womb, or if the muscles or blood supply to the neck were injured."}, "Tracheostomy": {"description": "A tracheostomy is a surgical procedure to create an opening through the neck into the trachea (windpipe). A tube is usually placed through this opening to provide an airway and to remove secretions from the lungs. This tube is called a tracheostomy tube or trach tube."}, "Trichotillomania": {"description": "Trichotillomania is hair loss from repeated urges to pull or twist the hair until it breaks off. Patients are unable to stop this behavior, even as their hair becomes thinner.", "Possible Complications": "People can have complications when they eat the pulled-out hair (trichophagia). This can cause a blockage in the intestines or lead to poor nutrition.", "Symptoms": ["An uneven appearance to the hair", "Bare patches or all around (diffuse) loss of hair", "Bowel blockage (obstruction) if people eat the hair they pull out", "Constant tugging, pulling, or twisting of hair", "Denying the hair pulling", "Hair regrowth that feels like stubble in the bare spots", "Increasing sense of tension before the hair pulling", "Other self-injury behaviors", "Sense of relief, pleasure, or gratification after the hair pulling", "Feeling sad or depressed", "Anxiety", "Poor self image"], "Exams and Tests": "Your health care provider will examine your skin, hair, and scalp. A piece of tissue may be removed (biopsy) to find other causes, such as a scalp infection, and to explain the hair loss.", "Treatment": "Experts don't agree on the use of medication for treatment. However, naltrexone and selective serotonin reuptake inhibitors (SSRIs) have been shown effective in reducing some symptoms. Behavioral therapy and habit reversal may also be effective.", "Prevention": "Early detection is the best form of prevention because it leads to early treatment. Decreasing stress can help, because stress may increase compulsive behavior.", "Causes": "Trichotillomania is a type of impulsive control disorder. Its causes are not clearly understood.It may affect as much as 4% of the population. Women are four times more likely to be affected than men."}, "Transurethral resection of the prostate": {"description": "Related topics include:"}, "Tips for labor coaches": {"description": "Whether you are helping the mother breathe or giving her a backrub, you will also be a familiar face on a hectic day. Just being there counts for a lot. Here are some tips for getting prepared."}, "Trochanteric bursitis": {"Symptoms": ["Pain at the joint of the hip, which may also be felt on the outside of the thigh", "Pain that is sharp or intense at first, but may become more of an ache", "Difficulty walking", "Joint stiffness", "Swelling and warmth of the hip joint", "Catching and clicking sensation ", "Getting out of a chair or bed", "Sitting for a long time", "Walking up stairs", "Sleeping or lying on the affected side "], "Prevention": "Overuse is the most common cause of hip bursitis. To help prevent hip pain:Always warm up before exercising and cool down afterward. Stretch your quadriceps and hamstrings., Don't increase the distance, intensity, and amount of time you exercise all at the same time., Avoid running straight down hills. Walk down instead., Swim instead of running or cycling., Run on a smooth, soft surface, such as a track. Avoid running on cement., If you have flat feet, try special shoe inserts and arch supports (orthotics)., Make sure your running shoes fit well and have good cushioning. . ", "description": "Trochanteric bursitis occurs when the bursa in your hip becomes swollen and irritated. This is a common cause of hip pain.", "Causes": "Trochanteric bursitis can be caused by:Overuse or stress on the hip from exercising or standing for long periods, Hip injury, such as from a fall, Having one leg that is longer than the other, Bone spurs on the hip, Spine problems, including scoliosis and arthritis of the spine, Muscle imbalance that puts more stress around the hip muscles, Infection (rare) . Certain health problems can also cause hip bursitis, including:Rheumatoid arthritis, Gout, Pseudogout, Diabetes, Thyroid disease . Bursitis is more common in older adults. Being out of shape or overweight may put you at greater risk for hip bursitis.", "Treatment": "Many cases of hip pain go away with rest and self-care. Try these tips:Use an ice pack 3 to 4 times a day for the first 2 or 3 days., Take pain relievers such as ibuprofen (Advil, Motrin) or naproxen (Aleve, Naprosyn) to help relieve pain and swelling., Avoid activities that make the pain worse., When sleeping, do not lie on the side that has bursitis., Avoid standing for long periods of time., When standing, stand on a soft, cushioned surface. Put an equal amount of weight on each leg., Placing a pillow between your knees when lying on your side can help decrease your pain., Wear comfortable, well-cushioned shoes with a low heel., Lose weight if you are overweight., Strengthen your core muscles. . As the pain goes away, your health care provider may suggest exercises to build strength and prevent muscle atrophy. You may need physical therapy if you have trouble moving the joint.Other treatments include:Removing fluid from the bursa, Steroid injection . If none of the treatments work, your doctor may suggest surgery to remove the bursa. This is rarely needed. If you have surgery, your hip will function just fine without the inflamed bursa. A new bursa sac will grow back."}, "Tricuspid atresia": {"description": "Tricuspid atresia is a type of heart disease that is present at birth (congenital heart disease), in which the tricuspid heart valve is missing or abnormally developed. The defect blocks blood flow from the right atrium to the right ventricle.", "Possible Complications": "Irregular, fast heart rhythms (arrhythmias), Chronic diarrhea (from a disease called protein-losing enteropathy), Heart failure, Fluid in the abdomen (ascites) and in the lungs (pleural effusion), Blockage of the artificial shunt, Strokes and other\u00a0nervous system\u00a0complications, Sudden death. ", "Symptoms": [" \r\n Bluish color to the skin", "Fast breathing", "Fatigue", "Poor growth", "Shortness of breath\u00a0"], "Exams and Tests": "This condition may be discovered during routine prenatal ultrasound imaging or when the baby is examined shortly after birth.\u00a0Bluish skin\u00a0is present from birth. A heart murmur is often present at birth and may increase in loudness over several months.Tests may include the following:ECG, Echocardiogram, Chest x-ray, Cardiac catheterization, MRI of the heart \r\n . ", "Treatment": "Once the diagnosis is made, the baby\u00a0will often\u00a0be admitted to the neonatal intensive care unit (NICU).\u00a0A medicine called prostaglandin E1\u00a0may be\u00a0used to keep the ductus arteriosis open so that blood can circulate\u00a0to the lungs.The condition always requires surgery. If the heart is unable to pump enough blood out to the lungs and rest of the body, the first surgery usually occurs within the first few days of life. In this procedure, an artificial shunt is inserted to\u00a0keep blood flowing to the lungs. In some cases, this first surgery is not needed.Afterward, the baby usually goes home. The child will need to take one or more daily medicines and be closely followed by a pediatric cardiologist, who will decide when the second stage of surgery should be done.The next stage of surgery\u00a0is called the Glenn shunt or Hemifontan procedure. This procedure connects half of the veins carrying blue blood from the upper half of the body directly to the pulmonary artery. The surgery is usually done when the child is between 4\u00a0to 6 months old.During stage I and II, the child may still\u00a0look blue (cyanotic).Stage III, the final step, is called the Fontan procedure. The rest of the veins carrying blue blood from the body\u00a0are connected directly to the pulmonary artery leading to the lungs. The left ventricle now only has to pump to the body, not the lungs. This surgery is usually performed when the child is 18 months\u00a0to 3 years old. After this final step, the baby is no longer blue.", "Prevention": "There is no known way to prevent tricuspid atresia.", "Causes": "Tricuspid atresia is an uncommon form of congenital heart disease that affects about 5 in every 100,000 live births. Twenty percent of patients with this condition will also have other heart problems.Normally, blood flows from the body into the right atrium, then through the tricuspid valve to the right ventricle and on to the lungs. If the tricuspid valve does not open, the blood cannot flow from the right atrium to the right ventricle. Because of the problem with the tricuspid valve, blood ultimately cannot enter the lungs, where it must go to pick up oxygen (becomes oxygenated).Instead, the blood passes through a hole between the right and left atrium.\u00a0In the left atrium, it mixes with oxygenated blood returning from the lungs. This mix of oxygenated and de-oxygenated blood is then pumped out into the body, which causes oxygen levels in the blood to be lower than normal.The lungs receive blood either through a hole between the right and left ventricles, or through a fetal vessel called the ductus arteriosus that connects the pulmonary artery (artery to the lungs) to the aorta (main artery to the body). The ductus arteriosus is present when a baby is born, but closes by itself shortly after birth."}, "Tooth - abnormal shape": {"description": "An abnormally shaped tooth is any tooth that has an irregular shape.", "Causes": "Congenital syphilis, Cerebral palsy, Ectodermal dysplasia, anhidrotic, Incontinentia pigmenti achromians, Cleidocranial dysostosis, Ehlers-Danlos syndrome, Ellis-van Creveld syndrome. "}, "Tibial nerve dysfunction": {"description": "Tibial nerve dysfunction is a loss of movement or sensation in the foot from damage to the tibial nerve.", "Possible Complications": "Deformity of the foot (mild to severe), Movement loss in the toes (partial or complete), Repeated or unnoticed injury to the leg, Sensation loss in the toes or foot (partial or complete). ", "Symptoms": ["Sensation changes in the bottom of the foot and toes, including\r\n\r\nburning sensation, \r\n numbness, tingling, or other abnormal sensation, or pain \r\n\u00a0 \r\n ", "Weakness of foot muscles", " \r\n Weakness of the toes or ankle"], "Exams and Tests": "An examination of the legs will be done to diagnose tibial nerve dysfunction. The health care provider will also take a medical history.Signs include:Inability to curl the toes, push the foot down, or twist the ankle inward, Weakness. In severe cases, the foot muscles may become very weak and the foot may be deformed.Tests for tibial nerve dysfunction may include:EMG (a recording of electrical activity in muscles), Nerve biopsy, Nerve conduction tests (recording of electrical activity along the nerve). Other tests that may be ordered\u00a0include blood tests and imaging tests, such as ultrasound or MRI.", "Treatment": "Treatment is aimed at restoring feeling and strength to the foot and toes. In some cases, no treatment is needed, and patients will recover on their own. Severe loss of sensation may lead to toe or foot sores (ulcers) and infections.Surgery to enlarge the tarsal tunnel or transfer the nerve\u00a0helps reduce pressure on the tibial nerve and may benefit some people.Over-the-counter analgesics may be helpful for mild pain (neuralgia). Other medicines may be prescribed to help control severe pain.Physical therapy exercises may help some people maintain muscle strength.Job counseling, therapy, changes, or retraining may be recommended.", "Prevention": "Prevention is variable depending on the cause of the nerve damage.", "Causes": "Tibial nerve dysfunction is an unusual form of peripheral neuropathy. It occurs when there is damage to the tibial nerve, one of the lower branches of the sciatic nerve of the leg. The tibial nerve supplies movement and sensation to the calf and foot muscles.A problem in function with a single nerve group, such as the tibial nerve, is called mononeuropathy. The usual causes are:Direct trauma, Pressure on the nerve for a long period of time, Pressure on the nerve from nearby body structures. Entrapment creates pressure on the nerve where it passes through a narrow structure.The damage may destroy the myelin sheath that protects and insulates the nerve, or part of the nerve cell (the axon). This damage reduces or prevents the movement of impulses through the nerve.The tibial nerve is often injured by pressure from a ligament on the inner part of the ankle. Injury or disease of structures near the knee may also damage the tibial nerve. The tibial nerve may also be affected by diseases that damage many nerves, such as diabetes.In some cases, no cause can be found."}, "Types of ileostomy": {"description": "Now you have an opening called a stoma in your belly. Waste will pass through the stoma into a pouch that collects it. You will need to take care of the stoma and empty the pouch many times a day."}, "Toxins": {"description": "Related topics:"}, "Tay-Sachs - resources": {"description": "The following organizations provide information on Tay-Sachs disease:"}, "Taking care of your new hip joint": {"description": "After you fully recover from surgery, you should not downhill ski or do contact sports, such as football and soccer. You should be able to do low impact activities, such as hiking, gardening, swimming, playing tennis, and golfing."}, "Tumor": {"Symptoms": ["Chills", "Fatigue", "Fever", "Loss of appetite", "Malaise", "Night sweats", "Weight loss"], "Exams and Tests": "Your doctor or nurse might see a tumor,\u00a0such as skin cancer. But most cancers cannot be seen during an exam because they are deep inside the body.When a tumor is found, a piece of the tissue is removed and examined under a microscope. This is called a\u00a0biopsy. It is done to determine if the tumor is noncancerous (benign) or cancerous (malignant). Depending on the location of the tumor, the biopsy may be a simple procedure or a serious operation.A CT or MRI scan can determine the exact location of the tumor and how far it has spread. Another imaging test called positron emission tomography (PET) is used to find certain tumor types.Other tests that may be done\u00a0include:Blood tests, Bone marrow biopsy (most often for lymphoma or leukemia), Chest x-ray, Complete blood count (CBC), Liver function tests. ", "description": "A tumor is an abnormal growth of body tissue. Tumors can be cancerous (malignant) or noncancerous (benign).", "Causes": "In general, tumors occur when cells divide and grow excessively in the body.\u00a0Normally, the body controls cell growth and division. New cells are created to replace older ones or to perform new functions. Cells that are damaged or no longer needed die to make room for healthy replacements.If the balance of cell growth and death is disturbed, a tumor may form.Problems with the body's immune system can lead to tumors. Tobacco causes more deaths from cancer than any other environmental substance. Other\u00a0risk factors for cancer\u00a0include:Benzene and other chemicals and toxins, Drinking too much alcohol, Environmental toxins, such as certain poisonous mushrooms and a type of poison that can grow on peanut plants (aflatoxins), Excessive sunlight exposure, Genetic problems, Obesity, Radiation exposure, Viruses. Types of tumors known to be caused by viruses are:Cervical cancer (human papillomavirus), Hepatocellular carcinoma (hepatitis B and hepatitis\u00a0C viruses). Some tumors are more common in one gender than the other. Some are more common among children or the elderly. Others are related to diet, environment, and family history.", "Treatment": "Treatment varies based on:Type of tumor, Whether it is cancer , Location of the tumor. You may not need treatment if the tumor is: Noncancerous (benign)\u00a0, In\u00a0a \"safe\" area where it will not cause symptoms or problems with the way an organ works . Sometimes benign tumors may be removed for cosmetic reasons. Benign tumors of the brain may be removed because of their location or harmful effect on the surrounding normal brain tissue.If a tumor is cancer, possible treatments may\u00a0include:Chemotherapy, Radiation, Surgery, Targeted cancer therapy, Biologic therapy, Other treatment options. "}, "Tonsil and adenoid removal - discharge": {"description": "Your child had surgery to remove the adenoid glands\u00a0in the\u00a0throat. These glands are located between the airway\u00a0between the nose and the back of\u00a0the throat. Often, adenoids are removed at the same time as the tonsils (tonsillectomy)."}, "Thyroid gland removal": {"description": "The thyroid gland is part of the endocrine system. It helps your body regulate your metabolism."}, "Thoracic outlet syndrome": {"description": "Thoracic outlet syndrome is a rare condition that involves pain in the neck and shoulder, numbness and tingling of the fingers, and a weak grip. The thoracic outlet is the area between the rib cage and collar bone.", "Possible Complications": "Complications can occur with any surgery and depend on\u00a0the type of procedure and anesthesia.Risks related to this surgery include:Damage to nerves or blood vessels, causing muscle weakness, Lung collapse. ", "Symptoms": ["Pain, numbness, and tingling in the pinky and ring fingers, and the inner forearm", "Pain and tingling in the neck and shoulders (carrying something heavy may make the pain worse)", "Signs of poor circulation in the hand or forearm (a bluish color, cold hands, or a swollen arm)", "Weakness of the muscles in the hand"], "Exams and Tests": "Your doctor or nurse will examine you and ask questions about your medical history and symptoms.\u00a0When you lift something, your arm may\u00a0turn\u00a0pale. \u00a0Sometimes the following tests are done to confirm the diagnosis:Electromyography (EMG), CT angiogram, MRI, Nerve conduction velocity study, X-ray. Tests are also done to rule out other problems, such as carpal tunnel syndrome or a damaged nerve due to problems in the cervical (neck) spine.", "Treatment": "Physical therapy is often used to treat thoracic outlet syndrome. It helps: Make your shoulder muscles stronger, Improve your range of motion in the shoulder, Promote better posture. Your doctor may prescribe pain medicine. If there is nerve pressure on a vein, your doctor may give you a blood thinner to dissolve\u00a0a blood clot. This will help reduce swelling in your arm.You may need surgery if physical therapy and changes in activity do not improve your symptoms. The surgeon may make a cut either under your armpit or just above your collarbone.During surgery, the following may be done:An extra rib is removed and certain muscles are cut., A section of the first rib is removed to release pressure in the area., Bypass surgery is done to reroute blood around the compression or remove the area that is causing the symptoms.. Your doctor may also suggest other alternatives, including angioplasty , if the artery is narrowed.", "Causes": "Blood vessels and nerves coming from the spine or major blood vessels of the body pass through a narrow space near your shoulder and collarbone on the way to the arms. Sometimes, there is not enough space for the nerves to\u00a0pass by or through the collarbone (clavicle) and upper ribs.Pressure (compression) on these blood vessels or nerves can cause symptoms in the arms or hands. Problems with the nerves cause almost all cases of thoracic outlet syndrome.Pressure may happen if you have: An extra rib, above the first one, An abnormal tight band connecting the spine to the ribs. . People with this syndrome\u00a0often have injured the area in the past or overused the shoulder.People with long necks and droopy shoulders may be more likely to develop this condition because of extra pressure on the nerves and blood vessels."}, "Transjugular intrahepatic portosystemic shunt (TIPS)": {"description": "Transjugular intrahepatic portosystemic shunt (TIPS) is a procedure to create new connections between two blood vessels in your liver. You may need this procedure if you have severe liver problems."}, "Thrombocytopenia - drug induced": {"Symptoms": ["Abnormal bleeding", "Bleeding when you brush your teeth", "Easy bruising", "Pinpoint red spots on the skin (petechiae)"], "Possible Complications": "Bleeding can be life threatening if it occurs in the brain or other organs.A pregnant woman who has antibodies to platelets may pass the antibodies to the baby in the womb.", "description": "When medicines or drugs are the causes of a low platelet count, it is called drug-induced thrombocytopenia.", "Causes": "Drug-induced thrombocytopenia occurs when certain medicines destroy platelets or interfere with the body's ability to make enough of them.There are two types of drug-induced thrombocytopenia: immune and nonimmune. \r\nIf a\u00a0medicine causes your body to produce antibodies, which seek and destroy your platelets, the condition is called drug-induced immune thrombocytopenia. Heparin, a blood thinner, is the most common cause of drug-induced immune thrombocytopenia.If a medicine prevents your bone marrow from making enough platelets, the condition is called drug-induced nonimmune thrombocytopenia. Chemotherapy drugs and a seizure medication called valproic acid may lead to this problem.Other\u00a0medicines that cause drug-induced thrombocytopenia include:Furosemide, Gold, used to treat arthritis, Nonsteroidal anti-inflammatory drugs (NSAIDs), Penicillin, Quinidine, Quinine, Ranitidine, Sulfonamides, Linezolid and other antibiotics. ", "Treatment": "The first step is to stop using the\u00a0medicine that\u00a0is causing the problem.For people who have life-threatening bleeding, treatments may include:Immunoglobulin therapy (IVIG) given through a vein, Plasma exchange (plasmapheresis), Platelet transfusions, Corticosteroids. "}, "Tracheomalacia - congenital": {"description": "Congenital tracheomalacia is a weakness and floppiness of the walls of the windpipe (trachea), which is present at birth.", "Possible Complications": "Babies born with tracheomalacia may have other congenital abnormalities such as heart defects, developmental delay, or gastroesophageal reflux.Aspiration pneumonia can occur from inhaling food.", "Symptoms": ["Breathing noises that may change with position and improve during sleep", "Breathing problems that get worse with coughing, crying, feeding, or upper respiratory infections", "High-pitched breathing", "Rattling or noisy breaths"], "Exams and Tests": "A physical examination confirms the symptoms. An x-ray will be done to rule out other problems. The chest x-ray may show narrowing of the trachea when breathing in.A procedure called a larngoscopy provides a definitive diagnosis. This procedure lets the otolaryngologist (ear, nose, and throat doctor, or ENT) see the airway structure and determine the severity of the problem. Other tests that may be done include:Airway fluoroscopy, Barium swallow, Bronchoscopy -- camera down the throat to see the airways and lungs, CT scan, Lung function tests, Magnetic resonance imaging (MRI). ", "Treatment": "Most infants respond well to humidified air, careful feedings, and antibiotics for infections. Babies with tracheomalacia must be closely monitored when they have respiratory infections.Often, the symptoms of tracheomalacia improve as the infant grows.Rarely, surgery is needed.", "Causes": "Tracheomalacia in a newborn occurs when the cartilage in the windpipe (trachea) has not developed properly. Instead of being rigid, the walls of the trachea are floppy. Because the windpipe is the main airway, breathing difficulties begin soon after birth.Congenital tracheomalacia is very uncommon."}, "Transient tic disorder": {"description": "Transient tic disorder is a temporary condition in which a person makes one or many brief, repeated, movements or noises (tics). These movements or noises are involuntary (not on purpose).", "Possible Complications": "There are usually no complications. A chronic motor or vocal tic disorder can develop.", "Symptoms": ["Movements that occur again and again and do not have a rhythm", "An overwhelming urge to make the movement", "Brief and jerky movements that include, for example, blinking, clenching the fists, jerking the arms, kicking, raising the eyebrows, sticking out the tongue.\u00a0", "Clicking", "Grunting", "Hissing", "Moaning", "Sniffing", "Snorting", "Squealing", "Throat clearing"], "Exams and Tests": "The health care provider\u00a0will consider physical causes of transient tic disorder before making a diagnosis.In order to be diagnosed with transient tic disorder, the child must have had tics almost every day for at least 4 weeks, but less than a year.Other disorders such as anxiety, attention deficit disorder, uncontrollable movement (myoclonus), obsessive-compulsive disorder, and epilepsy may need to be ruled out.", "Treatment": "Doctors\u00a0recommend that family members do\u00a0not call attention to the tics at first. This is\u00a0because unwanted attention may make the tics worse. If the tics\u00a0are severe enough to cause problems\u00a0at school or work, behavioral techniques and medications may help.", "Causes": "Transient tic disorder is common in children.The cause of transient tic disorder can be physical or mental (psychological). It may be a mild form of Tourette syndrome."}, "Tarantula spider bite": {"Symptoms": ["Breathing difficulty", "Cardiovascular collapse (an extreme reaction)", "Eyelid puffiness", "Itchiness", "Low blood pressure", "Rapid heart rate", "Skin rash", "Swelling at the site of the bite", "Swelling of the lips and throat "], "description": "This is for information only, and not for use in the treatment or management of an actual poison exposure. If you have an exposure, you should call your local emergency number (such as 911) or the National Poison Control Center at 1-800-222-1222.", "Prevention": "Wear protective clothing whenever possible when travelling through terrain which is known to harbor these spiders. Do not stick your hands or feet in their nests or in their preferred habitats, namely, under logs or underbrush, or other damp, moist areas."}, "Therapeutic drug levels": {"description": "Therapeutic drug levels are lab tests to look for the presence and the amount of a drug in the blood."}, "The night before your surgery - children": {"description": "\r\nFollow the instructions from your child\u2019s doctor for the night before surgery. The directions should tell you when your child has to stop eating or drinking, and any other special instructions.\r\n"}, "Tick bite": {"Symptoms": ["Apnea (breathing stopped)", "Blisters", "Difficulty breathing", "Rash", "Severe pain at bite site (some varieties), lasting for several weeks", "Swelling at bite site (some varieties)", "Weakness", "Uncoordinated movement"], "description": "See also: Tick removal", "Prevention": "Wear protective clothing whenever possible when travelling through terrain which is known to harbor ticks. Inspect your skin and clothing after being outdoors where ticks are known to be present, and remove them as discussed above. Also inspect any household pets which have been in tick-infested areas."}, "Thyroid cancer - papillary carcinoma": {"description": "Papillary carcinoma of the thyroid is the most common cancer of the thyroid gland. The thyroid gland is located inside the front of the lower neck.", "Possible Complications": "Complications include:Accidental removal of the parathyroid gland, which helps regulate blood calcium levels, Damage to a nerve that controls the vocal cords, Spreading of cancer to lymph nodes (rare), Spreading of cancer to other sites (metastasis). ", "Symptoms": [], "Exams and Tests": "If you have a lump on your thyroid, your doctor will order blood tests and possibly an ultrasound of the thyroid gland.If the ultrasound shows that the lump is bigger than 1.0 centimeter, a special procedure called a fine needle aspiration biopsy (FNAB) will be performed. This test helps determine if the lump is cancerous.Thyroid function tests are usually normal in patients with thyroid cancer.", "Treatment": "There are three types of thyroid cancer treatment:\r\n  Surgery\r\n  , \r\n  Radioactive iodine\r\n  , \r\n  Medication\r\n  . Surgery is done to remove as much of the cancer as possible. The bigger the lump, the more of the thyroid gland must be removed. Often, the entire gland is taken out.After the surgery, most patients receive radioactive iodine, which is usually taken by mouth. This substance kills any remaining thyroid tissue. It also helps make medical images clearer, so doctors can see if there is any cancer left behind or if it comes back later.If surgery is not an option, external radiation therapy can be useful.After surgery or radioactive iodine, patients will need to take medication called levothyroxine for the rest of their life. This replaces the hormone the thyroid would normally make.Most patients who had thyroid cancer need to have a blood test every 6 to 12 months to check thyroid hormone levels. Other follow-up tests that may done after treatment for thyroid cancer include:Ultrasound of the thyroid, An imaging test called a radioactive iodine (I-131) uptake scan. ", "Causes": "About 80% of all thyroid cancers diagnosed in the United States are the papillary carcinoma type. It is more common in women than in men. It may occur in childhood, but is most often seen in adults between ages 30 and 50.The cause of this cancer is unknown. A genetic defect may be involved.Radiation increases the risk of developing thyroid cancer. Exposure may occur from:High-dose external radiation treatments to the neck, especially during childhood, used to treat childhood cancer or some non-cancerous childhood conditions, Radiation exposure from nuclear plant disasters . Radiation given through a vein (through an IV) during medical tests and treatments does not increase the risk of developing thyroid cancer."}, "Tracheomalacia - acquired": {"description": "See also: Congenital tracheomalacia", "Possible Complications": "Aspiration pneumonia can occur from breathing in food.Adults who develop tracheomalacia after being on a breathing machine often have serious lung problems.", "Symptoms": ["Breathing problems that get worse with coughing, crying, or upper respiratory infections", "Breathing noises that may change with position and improve during sleep", "High-pitched breathing", "Rattling, noisy breaths"], "Exams and Tests": "A physical examination confirms the symptoms. A chest x-ray may show narrowing of the trachea when breathing out. Even if the x-ray is normal, it is needed to rule out other problems.A procedure called a laryngoscopy is used to diagnose the condition. This procedure allows the otolaryngologist (ear, nose, and throat doctor, or ENT) to see the structure of the airway and determine how severe the problem is.Other tests that may be performed include:Airway fluoroscopy, Barium swallow, Bronchoscopy, CT scan, Lung function tests, Magnetic resonance imaging (MRI). ", "Treatment": "The condition may improve without treatment, but persons with tracheomalacia must be monitored closely when they have respiratory infections.Continuous positive airway pressure (CPAP) may be necessary for adults with respiratory distress. Rarely, surgery is needed. A stent may be needed to hold the airway.", "Causes": "Acquired tracheomalacia is very uncommon. Rarely, babies, infants, and adults may develop the condition. It occurs when normal cartilage in the wall of the windpipe begins to break down.Acquired, or secondary, tracheomalacia may result:From pressure on the airway by large blood vessels, As a complication after surgical repair of a tracheo-esophagela fistula or esophageal atresia, After having a breathing tube or tracheostomy for a long time. "}, "Tinea versicolor": {"description": "Tinea versicolor is a long-term (chronic) fungal infection of the skin.", "Symptoms": ["Have\u00a0sharp borders (edges) and fine scales", "Are often dark reddish to tan in color", "Are found on the back, underarms, upper arms, chest, and neck", "Do not\u00a0darken in the sun so may appear lighter than the surrounding healthy skin ", "Increased sweating", "Itching"], "Exams and Tests": "Your\u00a0health care provider will examine a skin scraping under a microscope to look for the fungus.", "Causes": "Tinea versicolor is fairly common. It is caused by a type of fungus called\u00a0Pityrosporum ovale. This fungus is normally found on human skin. It only causes a problem in certain settings.The condition is most common in adolescent boys and young adult men. It typically occurs in hot climates.", "Prevention": "Avoid excessive heat or sweating if you have had this condition in the past. You can also use anti-dandruff shampoo on your skin\u00a0every month to help prevent the problem.\u00a0 ", "Treatment": "The condition is treated with antifungal medicine that is either applied\u00a0to the skin or taken by mouth. Applying over-the-counter dandruff shampoo\u00a0to the skin for 10 minutes each day in the shower is another treatment option."}, "Thirst - excessive": {"description": "Excessive thirst is an abnormal feeling of always needing to drink fluids.", "Causes": "A recent salty or spicy meal, Bleeding enough to cause a\u00a0large decrease in blood volume, Diabetes, Diabetes insipidus, Medicines\u00a0such as anticholinergics, demeclocycline, diuretics, phenothiazines\u00a0\u00a0, Loss of body fluids from the bloodstream into the tissues due to conditions such as severe infections (sepsis) or burns, or\u00a0heart, liver, or kidney failure , A\u00a0mental disorder called psychogenic polydipsia. "}, "Toddler development": {"description": "PARENTING TIPS"}, "Teething": {"description": "Teething is the growth of teeth through the gums in the mouth of infants and young children."}, "Twin-to-twin transfusion syndrome": {"Symptoms": [], "Exams and Tests": "This condition is usually diagnosed by ultrasound during pregnancy.After birth, the infants will receive the following tests:Blood clotting studies, including prothrombin time (PT) and partial thromboplastin time (PTT), Comprehensive metabolic panel to determine electrolyte balance, Complete blood count, Chest x-ray. ", "description": "Twin-to-twin transfusion syndrome (TTTS) is a rare condition that occurs only in identical twins while they are in the womb.", "Causes": "TTTS occurs when the blood supply of one twin moves to the other the shared placenta. The twin that loses the blood is called the donor twin. The twin that receives the blood is called the recipient twin.Both infants may have problems depending on how much blood is passed from one to the other. The donor twin may have too little blood, and the other may have too much blood. ", "Treatment": "Treatment may require repeated amniocentesis during pregnancy. Fetal laser surgery may be done to stop the flow of blood from one twin to the other.After birth, treatment depends on the infant's symptoms. The donor twin may need a blood transfusion to treat anemia.The recipient twin may need to have the volume of body fluid reduced. This may involve an exchange transfusion.The recipient twin may also need to take medicine to prevent heart failure."}, "Trichinosis": {"description": "Trichinosis is an infection with the roundworm Trichinella spiralis.", "Possible Complications": "Possible complications include:Encephalitis (brain infection and inflammation), Heart failure, Heart rhythm problems from heart inflammation, Pneumonia . ", "Symptoms": ["Abdominal discomfort", "Cramping", "Diarrhea", "Facial swelling around the eyes", "Fever", "Muscle pain (especially muscle pain with breathing, chewing, or using large muscles)", "Muscle weakness "], "Exams and Tests": "Tests to diagnose this condition include:Complete blood count (CBC), Eosinophil count (a type of white blood cell)\u00a0, Creatine kinase level (an enzyme found in muscle cells), Muscle biopsy, Blood antibody test . ", "Treatment": "Medicines can be used to treat infections in the intestines, though mild infection does not usually need treatment. Pain medicine can help relieve muscle soreness after the larvae have invaded the muscles.", "Prevention": "Pork and meat from wild animals should be cooked until well done (no traces of pink). Freezing pork at subzero temperatures (5\u00b0F - 15\u00b0C, or colder) for 3 to 4 weeks will kill the worms. Freezing wild game meat does not always kill the worms. Smoking, salting, and drying meat are also not reliable methods of killing the worms.", "Causes": "Trichinosis is a disease caused by eating meat that has not been thoroughly cooked and contains cysts (larvae, or immature worms)\u00a0of Trichinella spiralis. Trichinella spiralis can be found in pork, bear, walrus, fox, rat, horse, and lion.Wild animals, especially carnivores (meat eaters) or omnivores (animals that eat both meat and plants), should be considered possible sources of roundworm disease. Domestic meat animals raised specifically for eating under United States Department of Agriculture (government) guidelines and inspection can be considered safe. For this reason, trichinosis\u00a0is rare in the United States, but it is a common infection worldwide.When a person eats meat from an infected animal, Trichinella cysts break open in the intestine and grow into adult roundworms. The roundworms produce other worms that move through the gut wall and into the bloodstream. The worms invade muscle tissues, including the heart and diaphragm (the breathing muscle under the lungs). They can also infect the lungs and brain. The cysts remain alive for years."}, "Troponin test": {"description": "A troponin test measures the levels troponin T or troponin I proteins in the blood. These proteins are released when the heart muscle has been damaged, such as occurs with a heart attack. The more damage there is to the heart, the greater the amount of troponin T and I there will be in the blood. "}, "Temper tantrums": {"description": "Temper tantrums are unpleasant and disruptive behaviors or emotional outbursts. They often occur in response to unmet needs or desires. Tantrums are more likely to occur in younger children or\u00a0others who cannot express their needs or control their emotions when they are frustrated."}, "Toxic megacolon": {"description": "Toxic megacolon is a life-threatening complication of other intestinal conditions. It causes widening (dilation) of the large intestine within 1 to a few days.", "Possible Complications": "Perforation of the colon, Sepsis, Shock. ", "Symptoms": ["Abdominal pain", "Abdominal distention", "Abdominal tenderness", "Fever", "Rapid heart rate", "Shock"], "Exams and Tests": "The rapid widening (dilation) of the colon makes this different from other conditions, such as chronic constipation, that can widen the colon slowly and do not cause sudden, life-threatening symptoms.A physical exam may reveal signs of septic shock. The doctor will notice tenderness in the abdomen and possible loss of bowel sounds.Tests:Abdominal x-ray, Blood electrolytes, Complete blood count. ", "Treatment": "You will get fluids and electrolytes to help prevent dehydration and shock. The process that leads to megacolon can be treated. However, this is usually not enough to reverse the megacolon.If rapid widening is allowed to continue, an opening (perforation) can form in the colon. Therefore, most cases of toxic megacolon will need surgery, such as colectomy (removal of the entire colon).You may receive antibiotics to prevent sepsis (a severe infection).", "Prevention": "Treating diseases that cause toxic megacolon, such as ulcerative colitis or Crohn's disease, can prevent this condition.", "Causes": "Toxic megacolon occurs as a complication of inflammatory bowel disease, such as ulcerative colitis and Crohn's disease, and infections of the colon. The term \"toxic\" means that this complication occurs with infection or inflammation, and is very dangerous.This is not the same as other forms of megacolon, such as pseudo-obstruction, acute colonic ileus, or congenital colonic dilation. These conditions occur without infection or inflammation."}, "Tailbone trauma": {"Symptoms": ["Bruising on the lower part of the spine", "Pain when sitting or putting pressure on the tailbone"], "Prevention": "Do NOT run on slippery surfaces, such as around a swimming pool., Dress in shoes with good tread or slip-resistant soles, especially in snow or on ice.. ", "description": "Tailbone trauma is an injury to the small bone at the lower tip of the spine.", "Causes": "Backward falls onto a hard surface, such as a slippery floor or ice, are the most common cause of this injury."}, "Total parenteral nutrition - infants": {"description": "Long-term use of TPN may lead to liver problems. "}, "Thrombocytopenia": {"description": "Thrombocytopenia is any disorder in which there is an abnormally low amount of platelets. Platelets are parts of the blood that help blood to clot. This condition is sometimes associated with abnormal bleeding.", "Possible Complications": "Severe bleeding (hemorrhage) is the main complication. Bleeding may occur in the brain or gastrointestinal tract.", "Symptoms": ["Bleeding in the mouth and gums", "Bruising", "Nosebleeds ", "Rash (pinpoint red spots called petechia)"], "Exams and Tests": "Your health care provider will perform a physical exam and ask about your medical history and symptoms. The following tests may be done:Complete blood count (CBC) , Blood clotting studies (PTT and PT) . Other tests that may help diagnose this condition include bone marrow aspiration or biopsy.", "Treatment": "Treatment depends on the cause of the condition. In some cases, a transfusion of platelets may be required to stop or prevent bleeding.", "Prevention": "Prevention depends on the specific cause.", "Causes": "Thrombocytopenia is often divided into three major causes of low platelets:Not enough platelets are made in the bone marrowIncreased breakdown of platelets in the bloodstream Increased breakdown of platelets in the spleen or liverYour bone marrow may not make enough platelets if you have any of the following conditions:Aplastic anemia, Cancer in the bone marrow, such as leukemia, Cirrhosis (liver scarring), Folate deficiency, Infections in the bone marrow (very rare), Myelodysplastic syndrome (bone marrow does not make enough blood cells or makes defective cells), Vitamin B12 deficiency. Use of certain drugs may also lead to a low production of platelets in the bone marrow. The most common example is chemotherapy treatment.The following health conditions cause increased breakdown of platelets:Disseminated intravascular coagulation (DIC), Drug-induced nonimmune thrombocytopenia, Drug-induced immune thrombocytopenia, Hypersplenism (swollen spleen), Immune thrombocytopenic purpura (ITP), Thrombotic thrombocytopenic purpura. "}, "Tuberous sclerosis": {"description": "Tuberous sclerosis is a genetic disorder that affects the skin, brain/nervous system, kidneys, and heart. The condition can also cause tumors to grow in the brain. These tumors have a tuber- or root-shaped appearance.", "Possible Complications": "Brain tumors (astrocytoma), Heart tumors (rhabdomyoma), Severe intellectual disability, Uncontrollable seizures. ", "Symptoms": ["Areas of the skin that are white (due to decreased pigment) and have either an ash leaf or confetti appearance", "Red patches on the face containing many blood vessels (adenoma sebaceum)", "Raised patches of skin with an orange-peel texture (shagreen spots), often on the back ", "Autism spectrum disorders", "Developmental delays", "Intellectual disability", "Seizures", "Pitted tooth enamel", "Rough growths under or around the fingernails and toenails", "Rubbery noncancerous tumors on or around the tongue "], "Exams and Tests": "Signs may include:Abnormal heart rhythm (arrhythmia), Calcium deposits in the brain, Noncancerous \"tubers\" in the brain, Rubbery growths on the tongue or gums, Tumor-like growth (hamartoma) on the retina, pale patches in the eye, Tumors of the brain or kidneys . Tests may include:CT scan of the head, Echocardiogram (ultrasound of the heart), MRI of the head, Ultrasound of the kidney, Ultraviolet light examination of the skin . DNA testing for the two genes that can cause this disease (TSC1 or TSC2) is available.Regular ultrasound checks of the kidneys are an important screening tool to make sure there is no tumor growth.", "Treatment": "There is no specific treatment for tuberous sclerosis. Because the disease can differ from person to person, treatment is based on the symptoms.Depending on the severity of the mental disability, the child may need special education., Some seizures are controlled with medication (vigabatrin). Other children may need surgery., Small growths (adenoma sebaceum) on the face may be removed by laser treatment. These growths tend to come back, and repeat treatments will be needed., Rhabdomyomas commonly disappear after puberty. Surgery to remove them is usually not needed., Brain tumors can be treated with medicines called mTOR inhibitors (sirolimus, everolimus)., Kidney tumors are treated with surgery, or by reducing the blood supply using special x-ray techniques. mTOR inhibitors are being studied as another treatment for kidney tumors. . ", "Prevention": "Genetic counseling is recommended for couples who have a family history of tuberous sclerosis and who want to have children. Prenatal diagnosis is available for families with a known gene mutation or history of this condition. However, tuberous sclerosis often appears as a new DNA mutation. These cases are not preventable.", "Causes": "Tuberous sclerosis is an\u00a0inherited condition. Changes (mutations) in two genes, TSC1 and TSC2, are responsible for most cases.Only one parent needs to pass on the mutation for the child to get the disease. However, most cases are due to new mutations. There usually is no family history of tuberous sclerosis.This condition is one of a group of diseases called neurocutaneous syndromes. Both the skin and central nervous system (brain and spinal cord) are involved.There are no known risk factors, other than having a parent with tuberous sclerosis. In that case, each child has a 50% chance of inheriting the disease."}, "Tonometry": {"description": "Tonometry is a test to measure the pressure inside your eyes. The test is used to screen for glaucoma."}, "Time outs": {"description": "Time out is a parenting technique to encourage children to stop doing things that you don't want them to do. When your child misbehaves, you can calmly remove your child from the activity and put them in time out. Your child usually will stop doing the behavior to avoid going into time out. Time out is mostly effective with children, ages 2 to 12 years old."}, "Thyrotoxic periodic paralysis": {"description": "Thyrotoxic periodic paralysis is a condition in which there are episodes of muscle weakness in people who have\u00a0high levels of thyroid hormone in their blood\u00a0(hyperthyroidism, thyrotoxicosis).", "Possible Complications": "Difficulty breathing, speaking, or swallowing during attacks (rare), Heart arrhythmias during attacks, Muscle weakness that gets worse over time. ", "Symptoms": ["Comes and goes", "Can last for up to several days", "Is more common in the legs than the arms", "Is most common in the shoulders and hips", "Is triggered by heavy, high-carbohydrate, high-salt meals", "Is triggered by rest after exercise", "Difficulty breathing (rare)", "Speech difficulty (rare)", "Swallowing difficulty (rare)", "Vision changes (rare)", "Weakness/paralysis ", "Excessive sweating\u00a0", "Fast heart rate", "Fatigue", "Headache", "Heat intolerance", "Increased appetite", "Insomnia", "Sensation of feeling\u00a0a strong\u00a0heartbeat (palpitations)", "Tremors of the hand", "Warm, moist skin", "Weight loss "], "Exams and Tests": "The health care provider may suspect thyrotoxic periodic paralysis based on:Abnormal thyroid hormone levels, A family history of the disorder, Low potassium levels during attacks, Symptoms that come and go in episodes . Diagnosis involves ruling out disorders associated with low potassium.The health care provider may\u00a0try to trigger an attack by giving you insulin and sugar (glucose, which reduces potassium levels) or thyroid hormone.During an attack, there may be the following signs:Decreased or no reflexes, Heart arrhythmias, Low potassium in the bloodstream (serum potassium levels are normal between attacks), Weakness, especially in the muscles of the arms and legs and occasionally in the muscles of the eyes. The muscles involved in breathing and swallowing can\u00a0very rarely\u00a0be affected, and this can be fatal. Muscle strength is normal between attacks at first. However, repeated attacks may eventually cause worsening and persistent muscle weakness. . Between attacks, the examination is normal. Or, there may be signs of hyperthyroidism, such as an enlarged thyroid.The following tests are used to diagnose hyperthyroidism:High thyroid hormone levels (T3 or T4), Low serum TSH (thyroid stimulating hormone) levels, Thyroid uptake and scan. Other test results:Abnormal electrocardiogram (ECG) during attacks, Abnormal electromyogram (EMG) during attacks, Low serum potassium during attacks, but normal between attacks . A muscle biopsy may sometimes be taken.", "Treatment": "The best treatment is to quickly reduce thyroid hormone levels. Potassium should also be given during the attack,\u00a0usually by mouth. If weakness is severe,\u00a0you may need to get potassium through a vein (intravenously). (You should only get intravenous potassium if your kidney function is normal and you are monitored in the hospital.)Weakness that involves the muscles used for breathing or swallowing is an emergency. Patients must be taken to a hospital. Dangerous heart arrhythmias may also occur during attacks.Your health care provider may recommend eating\u00a0a diet\u00a0that is\u00a0low in carbohydrates and salt to prevent attacks. Medications called beta-blockers may reduce the number and severity of attacks while your hyperthyroidism is brought under control.Acetazolamide is effective\u00a0at preventing attacks in people with familial periodic paralysis. It is usually not effective\u00a0for thyrotoxic periodic paralysis.", "Prevention": "Genetic counseling may be advised. Treating the thyroid disorder prevents attacks of weakness.", "Causes": "This is a rare condition that occurs only in people with high thyroid hormone levels (thyrotoxicosis). It is most commonly seen in Asian men.There is a similar disorder, called\u00a0hypokalemic periodic paralysis (familial periodic paralysis).\u00a0It is an inherited condition and is not related to high thyroid levels.Risk factors include a family history of periodic paralysis and hyperthyroidism."}, "Traveler's guide to avoiding infectious diseases": {"description": "Contact your health care provider when you return home if you were sick with a fever while traveling."}, "Taking warfarin (Coumadin) - what to ask your doctor ": {"description": "Below are some questions you may want to ask your doctor or nurse to help you when you take warfarin."}, "Trichomoniasis": {"description": "Trichomoniasis is a sexually transmitted infection caused by the parasite Trichomonas vaginalis.", "Possible Complications": "Long-term infection may cause changes in the tissue on the cervix. These changes may be seen on a routine Pap smear. Treatment should be started and the Pap smear repeated 3 to 6 months later.Treating trichomoniasis helps prevent it from spreading to sexual partners. Trichomoniasis is common among people with HIV.This condition has been linked to premature\u00a0delivery in pregnant women. More research about trichomoniasis in pregnancy is still needed. ", "Symptoms": ["Discomfort with intercourse", "Itching of the inner thighs", "Vaginal discharge (thin, greenish-yellow, frothy or foamy)", "Vaginal itching", "Vulvar itching or swelling of the labia", "Vaginal odor (foul or strong smell) ", "Burning after urination or ejaculation", "Itching of urethra", "Slight discharge from urethra ", "Swelling and irritation in the prostate gland (prostatitis)", "Swelling in the epididymis (epididymitis), the tube that connects the testicle with the vas deferens. The vas deferens connects the testicles to the urethra. "], "Exams and Tests": "In women, a pelvic examination shows red blotches on the vaginal wall or cervix. Examining the vaginal discharge under a microscope may show signs of inflammation or infection-causing germs in vaginal fluids. A Pap smear may also diagnose the condition.The disease can be hard to diagnose in men. Men are treated if the infection is diagnosed in any of their sexual partners. They may also be treated if they keep having symptoms of urethral burning or itching, even after getting treatment for gonorrhea and chlamydia.", "Treatment": "Antibiotics are commonly used to cure the infection. DO NOT drink alcohol while taking the medicine and for 48 hours afterwards. Doing so can cause:Severe nausea, Abdominal pain, Vomiting . Avoid sexual intercourse until you have finished treatment. Your sexual partners should be treated at the same time, even if they have no symptoms. If you have been diagnosed with a sexually transmitted infection (STI), you should be screened for other STIs. ", "Prevention": "A monogamous sexual relationship with a known healthy partner can help reduce the risk of sexually transmitted infections, including trichomoniasis.Other than total abstinence, condoms remain the best and most reliable protection against sexually transmitted infections. Condoms must be used consistently and correctly to be effective.", "Causes": "Trichomoniasis is found worldwide. In the United States, most cases occur in women between ages 16 and 35. Trichomonas vaginalis is spread through sexual contact with an infected partner, either\u00a0through penis-to-vagina intercourse or vulva-to-vulva contact. The parasite cannot survive in the mouth or rectum.The disease can affect both men and women, but the symptoms differ. The infection usually does not cause symptoms in men and goes away on its own in a few weeks."}, "Transurethral resection of the prostate - discharge ": {"description": "Your surgeon inserted a tube-like tool called a cystoscope (or endoscope) through your urethra (the tube that carries urine from the bladder out of the penis). Your surgeon used a special cutting tool to remove part of your prostate gland piece by piece."}, "Tracheoesophageal fistula and esophageal atresia repair": {"description": "Tracheoesophageal fistula and esophageal atresia repair is surgery to repair two birth defects in the esophagus and trachea. "}, "Tinea capitis": {"Symptoms": [], "Exams and Tests": "Your health care provider will look at your scalp for signs of\u00a0\u00a0tinea capitis. A special lamp called a Wood's lamp test can help diagnose a fungal scalp infection.The health care provider may swab the area and send it for a culture. It may take up to 3 weeks to get these results.Rarely, a skin biopsy of the scalp will be done.", "description": "Related skin infections may be found:", "Causes": "Fungi are germs that can live on the dead tissue of the hair, nails, and outer skin layers. Tinea capitis is caused by mold-like fungi called dermatophytes.The fungi grow well in warm, moist areas. A tinea infection is more likely if you:\u00a0Have minor skin or scalp injuries, Do not bathe or wash your hair often, Have wet skin for a long time (such as from sweating). Tinea capitis or ringworm can spread easily. It most often affects children and goes away at puberty. However, it can occur at any age.You can catch tinea capitis if you come into direct contact with an area of ringworm on someone else's body. You can also get it if\u00a0you touch items such as combs, hats, or clothing that have been used by someone with ringworm. The infection can also be spread by pets, particularly cats.", "Treatment": "The health care provider will prescribe medicine you take by mouth to treat ringworm in the scalp.Griseofulvin, terbinafine, and itraconazole are the types of medicine used to treat this condition., You will need to\u00a0take the medicine for 4 - 8 weeks.. Steps you can do at home include:Keep the area clean. , Wash with\u00a0a medicated shampoo, such as one that contains ketoconazole or selenium sulfide. Shampooing may slow or stop the spread of infection, but does not get rid of ringworm on its own.\u00a0\u00a0. Other family members and pets should be examined and treated, if necessary.Other children in the home may want to use the shampoo 2 - 3 times a week for around 6 weeks., Adults only need to wash with the shampoo if they have signs of tinea capitis or ringworm.. Once the shampoo has been started:Wash towels in warm, soapy water and dry each time they are used by someone who is infected, Soak combs and brushes for 1 hour a day in a mixture of one-half bleach and one-half water. Do this for 3 days.. No one in the home should share combs, hairbrushes, hats, towels, pillowcases, or helmets with other people."}, "Total proctocolectomy and ileal - anal pouch": {"description": "Total proctocolectomy and ileal-anal pouch surgery is the removal of the large intestine and most of the rectum. The surgery is done in one or two stages."}, "Traumatic events and children": {"description": "Learn what to watch for in your child and how to take care of your child after a traumatic event. Get professional help if your child is not recovering. "}, "Tongue biopsy": {"description": "A tongue biopsy is surgery to remove a piece of the tongue to look at under a microscope."}, "Thrombolytic therapy": {"description": "Thrombolytic therapy is the use of drugs to break up or dissolve blood clots, which are the main cause of both heart attacks and stroke."}, "Toluene and xylene poisoning": {"Symptoms": ["Blurred vision", "Burning pain", "Hearing loss", "Abdominal pain - severe", "Bloody stools", "Loss of appetite", "Nausea", "Vomiting - possibly blood", "Irregular heartbeat", "Low blood pressure", "Kidney damage", "Breathing difficulty", "Chest pain", "Cough", "Rapid, shallow breathing", "Convulsions", "Dizziness", "Drowsiness", "Exaggerated feeling of well-being (euphoria)", "Headache", "Memory loss", "Nervousness", "Staggering", "Tremors", "Unconsciousness", "Dry, cracked skin", "Pale skin"], "description": "This is for information only and not for use in the treatment or management of an actual poison exposure. If you have an exposure, you should call your local emergency number (such as 911) or the National Poison Control Center at 1-800-222-1222."}, "Tongue tie": {"description": "This makes it hard for the tip of the tongue to move freely. ", "Possible Complications": "On rare occasions, tongue tie has been linked to problems with tooth development, swallowing, or speech.", "Symptoms": ["Acting irritable or fussy, even after feeding", "Difficulty creating or keeping suction on the nipple. The infant may become tired in 1 or 2 minutes, or fall asleep before eating enough.", "Poor weight gain or weight loss", "Problems latching onto the nipple. The infant may just chew on the nipple instead. "], "Exams and Tests": "Most experts do not recommend that health care providers examine newborns for tongue tie unless there are breastfeeding problems.Most health care providers only consider tongue tie when:The mother and baby have had problems starting breastfeeding., The mother has received at least 2 to 3 days of support from a breastfeeding (lactation) specialist.. ", "Treatment": "Most breastfeeding problems can be managed easily. A person who specializes in breastfeeding (lactation consultant) can help with breastfeeding issues.Tongue tie surgery, called a frenulotomy, is rarely needed. The surgery involves cutting the tissue under the tongue. It is most often done in the doctor's office. Infection or bleeding afterwards are possible, but rare.Surgery for more severe cases is done in a hospital operating room. A surgical procedure called a z-plasty closure may be needed to prevent scar tissue from forming.", "Causes": "The tongue is connected to the bottom of the mouth by a band of tissue called the lingual frenulum. In people with tongue tie, this band is overly short and thick. The exact cause of tongue tie is not known. Your genes may play a role. The problem tends to run in some families. "}, "Transposition of the great vessels": {"description": "Transposition of the great vessels is a heart defect that occurs from birth (congenital).\u00a0The two major vessels that carry blood away from the heart -- the aorta and the pulmonary artery -- are switched (transposed).", "Possible Complications": "Coronary artery problems, Heart valve problems, Irregular heart rhythms (arrhythmias). ", "Symptoms": ["Blueness of the skin", "Clubbing of the fingers or toes", "Poor feeding", "Shortness of breath"], "Exams and Tests": "The health care provider may detect a heart murmur while listening to the chest with a stethoscope. The baby's mouth and skin will be a blue color.Tests often include the following:Cardiac catheterization, Chest x-ray, ECG, Echocardiogram (if done before birth, it is called a fetal echocardiogram), Pulse oximetry (to check blood oxygen level). ", "Treatment": "The baby will immediately receive a medicine called prostaglandin through an IV (intravenous line). This medicine helps keep a blood vessel called the the ductus arteriosus open, allowing some mixing of the two blood circulations.A procedure using a long, thin flexible tube (balloon atrial septostomy) may be needed to create a large hole in the atrial septum to allow blood to mix.A surgery called an arterial switch procedure is used to permanently correct the problem within the baby's first week of life. This surgery switches the great arteries back to the normal position and keeps the coronary arteries attached to the aorta. Prior to the development of this surgery, a surgery called an atrial switch (or Mustard procedure or Senning procedure) was used. There are still many people alive who had this surgery.", "Prevention": "Women who plan to become pregnant should be immunized against rubella if they are not already immune. Eating well, avoiding alcohol, and controlling diabetes both before and during pregnancy may be helpful.", "Causes": "The cause of most congenital heart defects is unknown.Factors in the mother that may increase the risk of this condition include:Age over 40, Alcoholism, Diabetes, Poor nutrition during pregnancy (prenatal nutrition), Rubella or other viral illness during pregnancy . Transposition of the great vessels is a cyanotic heart defect. This means there is decreased oxygen in the blood that is pumped from the heart to the rest of the body. In normal hearts, blood that returns from the body goes through the right side of the heart and pulmonary artery to the lungs to get oxygen. The blood then comes back to the left side of the heart and travels out the aorta to the body.In transposition of the great vessels, the blood goes to the lungs, picks up oxygen, returns to the heart, and then flows right back to the lungs without ever going to the body. Blood from the body returns to the heart and goes back to the body without ever picking up oxygen in the lungs.Symptoms appear at birth or very soon afterward. How bad the symptoms are depends on the type and size of additional heart defects (such as atrial septal defect, ventricular septal defect, or patent ductus arteriosus) and how much the blood can mix between the two abnormal circulations. "}, "Typhoid fever": {"description": "Typhoid fever is an infection that causes diarrhea and a rash. It is\u00a0most commonly due to a type of bacterium called Salmonella typhi (S. typhi).", "Possible Complications": "Intestinal hemorrhage (severe GI bleeding)\r\n, Intestinal perforation\r\n, Kidney failure, Peritonitis. ", "Symptoms": ["Abdominal tenderness", "Agitation", "Bloody stools", "Chills", "Confusion", "Difficulty paying attention (attention deficit)", "Delirium", "Fluctuating mood", "Hallucinations", "Nosebleeds", "Severe fatigue", "Slow, sluggish, lethargic feeling", "Weakness "], "Exams and Tests": "A complete blood count (CBC) will show a high number of white blood cells.A blood culture during the first week of the fever can show S. typhi bacteria.Other tests that can help diagnose this condition include:ELISA urine test to look for the bacteria that cause Typhoid fever, Fluorescent antibody study to look for substances that are specific to Typhoid bacteria, Platelet count (platelet count may be low), Stool culture. ", "Treatment": "Fluids and electrolytes may be given by IV (into a vein). Or you may be asked to drink uncontaminated water with electrolyte packets.Antibiotics are given to kill the bacteria. There are increasing rates of antibiotic resistance throughout the world, so your health care provider will check current recommendations before choosing an antibiotic.", "Prevention": "A vaccine is recommended for travel outside of the U.S. to places where there is typhoid fever. The Centers for Disease Control and Prevention website has information about where typhoid fever is common. Ask your health care provider if you should bring electrolyte packets in case you get sick.When traveling,\u00a0drink only boiled or bottled water and eat well-cooked food. Water treatment, waste disposal, and protecting the food supply from contamination are important public health measures. Carriers of typhoid must not be allowed to work as food handlers.", "Causes": "S. typhi\u00a0is spread through contaminated food, drink, or water. If you eat or drink something that is contaminated with the bacteria,\u00a0the bacteria enter your body. They travel into your intestines, and then into your blood. The bacteria travel through the blood to your lymph nodes, gallbladder, liver, spleen, and other parts of the body.Some persons\u00a0become carriers of S. typhi and continue to release the bacteria in their stools for years, spreading the disease.Typhoid fever is common in developing countries. Fewer than 400 cases are reported in the U.S. each year. Most cases in the U.S. are brought in from other countries where typhoid fever is common."}, "Transplant rejection": {"description": "Transplant rejection is a process in which a transplant recipient's immune system attacks the transplanted organ or tissue.\r\n ", "Possible Complications": "Certain cancers (in some people who take strong immune-suppressing drugs for a long time), Infections (because the person's immune system is suppressed by taking immune-suppressing medications), Loss of function in the transplanted organ/tissue, Side effects of medicines, which may be severe. ", "Symptoms": ["The organ's function may start to decrease", "General discomfort, uneasiness, or ill feeling", "Pain or swelling in the area of the organ (rare)", "Fever (rare)", "Flu-like symptoms, including chills, body aches, nausea, cough, and shortness of breath"], "Exams and Tests": "The doctor will examine the area over and around the transplanted organ.\u00a0The area\u00a0feel tender to you (especially with a kidney transplant).Signs that the organ is not working properly include:High blood sugar (pancreas transplant), Less urine released (kidney transplant), Shortness of breath and less ability to exercise (heart transplant), Yellow skin color and easy bleeding (liver transplant). A biopsy of the transplanted organ can confirm that it is being rejected. A routine biopsy is often performed to detect rejection early, before symptoms develop.When organ rejection is suspected, one or more of the following tests may be done before the organ biopsy:Abdominal CT scan, Chest x-ray, Heart echocardiography, Kidney arteriography, Kidney ultrasound, Lab tests of kidney or liver function. ", "Treatment": "The goal of treatment is to make sure the transplanted organ or tissue works properly, and to suppress your immune system response. Suppressing the immune response\u00a0may prevent transplant rejection.Medicines will likely be used to suppress the immune response. Dosage depends on your condition and\u00a0may be very high while the tissue is being rejected.\u00a0After you no longer have signs of rejection, the dosage will likely\u00a0be lowered.", "Prevention": "ABO blood typing and HLA (tissue antigen) typing before a transplant helps ensure a close match. You will likely need to take medicine to suppress your immune system for the rest of your life to prevent the tissue from being rejected.Being careful about taking your post-transplant medicines and being closely watched by your doctor may help prevent rejection.", "Causes": "Your body's immune system usually protects you from substances that may be harmful, such as germs, poisons, and sometimes cancer cells.These harmful substances have proteins called antigens coating their surfaces. As soon as these antigens enter the body, the immune system recognizes that they are not from that person's body and that they are \"foreign,\" and attacks them.When a person receives an organ from someone else during transplant surgery, that person's immune system may recognize that it is foreign. This is because the person's immune system detects that the antigens on the cells of the organ are different or not \"matched.\" Mismatched organs, or\u00a0organs that are not matched closely enough, can trigger a blood transfusion reaction or transplant rejection. To help prevent this reaction, doctors type, or match both the organ donor and the person who is receiving the organ. The more similar the antigens are between the donor and recipient, the less likely that the organ will be rejected.Tissue typing ensures that the organ or tissue is as similar as possible to the tissues of the recipient. The match is usually not perfect. No two people, except identical twins, have identical tissue antigens.Doctors use\u00a0medicines to suppress the recipient's immune system. The goal is to prevent the immune system from attacking the newly transplanted organ when the organ is not closely matched. If these\u00a0medicines are not used, the body will almost always launch an immune response and destroy the foreign tissue.There are some exceptions, though. Cornea transplants are rarely rejected because the cornea has no blood supply. Also, transplants from one identical twin to another are almost never rejected.There are three types of rejection:Hyperacute rejection occurs a few minutes after the transplant when the antigens are completely unmatched. The tissue must be removed right away so the recipient does not die. This type of rejection is seen when a recipient is given the wrong type of blood. For example, when a person is given type A blood when he or she is type B., Acute rejection may occur any time from the first week after the transplant to 3 months afterward.\u00a0All recipients have some amount of acute rejection., Chronic rejection can take place over many years. The body's constant immune response against the new organ slowly damages the transplanted tissues or organ.. "}, "Time out": {"description": "Children learn to avoid time out by ceasing the behaviors that have caused previous time outs or those that result in such warnings."}, "Taste - impaired": {"description": "Taste impairment means there is a problem with your sense of taste. Problems range from distorted taste to a complete loss of the sense of taste. A complete inability to taste is rare.", "Causes": "The sensation of taste often decreases after age 60. Most often, salty and sweet tastes are lost first. Bitter and sour tastes last slightly longer.\r\nCauses of impaired taste include:Bell's palsy, Common cold, Flu, Nasal infection, nasal polyps, sinusitis, Pharyngitis and strep throat, Salivary gland infections. Other causes are:Ear surgery, Heavy smoking (especially pipe smoking), Injury to the mouth, nose, or head, Mouth dryness, Medicines, such as thyroid drugs, captopril, griseofulvin, lithium, penicillamine, procarbazine, rifampin, and some drugs used to treat cancer, Swollen or inflamed gums (gingivitis) , Vitamin B12 or zinc deficiency. "}, "Tendinitis": {"description": "Tendinitis is inflammation, irritation, and swelling of a tendon. This is the fibrous structure that joins muscle to bone. In many cases, tendinosis (tendon degeneration) is also present.", "Possible Complications": "Long-term inflammation raises the risk of further injury, such as rupture, Tendinitis symptoms return. ", "Symptoms": ["Pain and tenderness along a tendon, usually near a joint", "Pain at night", "Pain that is worse with movement or activity"], "Exams and Tests": "The doctor will perform a physical exam. During the exam, the doctor will look for signs of pain and tenderness when the muscle attached to the tendon is moved in certain ways. There are specific tests for specific tendons.The tendon can be inflamed, and the skin over it\u00a0may be warm and red.", "Treatment": "The goal of treatment is to relieve pain and reduce inflammation.The doctor will recommend resting the affected tendon to help it recover. This may be\u00a0done using a splint or a removable brace. Applying heat or cold to the affected area can help.Nonsteroidal anti-inflammatory medications (NSAIDs), such as aspirin or ibuprofen, can also reduce both pain and inflammation. Steroid injections into the tendon sheath can also be very useful\u00a0for controlling pain.The doctor may also suggest physical therapy to stretch and strengthen the muscle and tendon. This can restore the tendon's ability to function properly, improve healing, and prevent future injury.In rare cases, surgery is needed to remove the inflamed tissue from around the tendon.", "Prevention": "Avoid repetitive motions and overuse of the arms and legs., Keep all your muscles strong and flexible., Warm up by exercising at a relaxed pace before doing vigorous activity. . ", "Causes": "Tendinitis can occur as a result of injury or\u00a0overuse. It also can occur with aging as the tendon loses elasticity. Body-wide (systemic) diseases, such as rheumatoid arthritis or diabetes, can also lead to tendinitis.Tendinitis can occur in any tendon. Commonly affected sites include the:Elbow, Heel (Achilles tendinitis), Shoulder, Wrist. "}, "Transplant services": {"description": "Several experts will help you prepare for the procedure, and make sure you are comfortable before, during, and after surgery."}, "Tonsillitis": {"description": "Tonsillitis is inflammation (swelling) of the tonsils.", "Possible Complications": "Complications from strep throat may be severe. They can include:Abscess in the area around the tonsils, Kidney disease caused by strep, Rheumatic fever and other heart problems . ", "Symptoms": ["Difficulty swallowing ", "Ear pain", "Fever, chills", "Headache", "Sore throat - lasts longer than 48 hours and may be severe", "Tenderness of the jaw and throat ", "Problems breathing, if the tonsils are very large", "Problems eating or drinking"], "Exams and Tests": "Your health care provider will look in the mouth and throat. The tonsils may be red and may have white spots on them., The lymph nodes in the jaw and neck may be swollen and tender to the touch. . A rapid strep test can be done in most doctor's offices. However, this test may be normal, and you can still have strep. Your doctor may send the throat swab to a laboratory for a strep culture. Test results can take a few days. ", "Treatment": "Swollen tonsils that are not painful or do not cause other problems do not need to be treated. Your health care provider may not give you antibiotics. You may be asked to come back for a checkup later.If tests show you do have strep, your doctor will give you antibiotics. It is important to finish all of your antibiotics as directed by your doctor, even if you feel better. If you do not take them all, the infection can return. The following tips may help your throat feel better: Drink cold liquids or suck on fruit-flavored frozen bars., Drink fluids, and mostly warm (not hot), bland fluids., Gargle with warm salt water., Suck on lozenges (containing benzocaine or similar ingredients) to reduce pain (these should not be used in young children because of the choking risk)., Take over-the-counter medications, such as acetaminophen (Tylenol) or ibuprofen to reduce pain and fever. Do NOT give a child aspirin. Aspirin has been linked to Reye syndrome. . Some people who have repeated infections may need surgery to remove the tonsils (tonsillectomy).", "Causes": "The tonsils are lymph nodes in the back of the mouth and top of the throat. They help to filter out bacteria and other germs to prevent infection in the body.A bacterial or viral infection can cause tonsillitis. Strep throat is a common cause. The infection may also be seen in other parts of the throat. One such infection is called pharyngitis.Tonsillitis is very common in children."}, "Talking to someone with hearing loss": {"description": "If you live or work with someone who does not hear well, follow the tips below to better communicate."}, "Testosterone": {"description": "The test described in this article measures the total amount of testosterone in the blood. Much of the testosterone in the blood is bound to a protein called sex hormone binding globulin (SHBG). Another blood test can measure the \"free\" testosterone. "}, "Taking medicine at home - create a routine": {"description": "\r\n\r\n \r\nIt can be hard to remember to take all of your medicines. Learn some tips to create a daily routine that helps you remember to take your medicines.\r\n"}, "Total proctocolectomy with ileostomy ": {"description": "Total proctocolectomy with ileostomy is surgery to remove all of the colon (large intestine) and rectum."}, "Tick paralysis": {"description": "Tick paralysis is a loss of muscle function that results from a tick bite.", "Possible Complications": "Respiratory failure. ", "Symptoms": [], "Exams and Tests": "The person will have been exposed to ticks in some way. For example, he or she may have been on a recent camping trip, live in a tick-infested area, or have dogs or other animals that can pick up ticks. Often the tick is found only after thoroughly searching the person's hair.Finding a tick embedded in the skin and noting above symptoms confirms the diagnosis. No other testing is required.", "Treatment": "Removing the tick removes the source of the neurotoxin. Recovery is rapid following the removal of the tick.", "Prevention": "Use insect repellents and protective clothing when out in tick-infested areas. Carefully check the skin after being outside and remove any ticks.As a rule, if children are discovered to have ticks, it is a good idea to write the information down and keep it for several months. Many tick-borne diseases do not show symptoms immediately, and the incident may be forgotten by the time a child becomes sick with a tick-borne disease.", "Causes": "Hard- and soft-bodied female ticks are believed to make a poison that can cause paralysis in children. Ticks attach to the skin to feed on blood. It is during this feeding process that the toxin enters the bloodstream.The paralysis is ascending -- that means it starts in the lower body and moves up. It is similar to that seen in Guillain-Barre syndrome and opposite that seen in botulism and paralytic shellfish poisoning."}, "Testicular torsion repair": {"description": "Testicular torsion repair is surgery to untangle a spermatic cord. The spermatic cord is the collection of blood vessels in the scrotum that lead to the testicles. Testicular torsion develops when the cord twists. This pulling and twisting blocks blood flow to the testicle."}, "Thyroid storm": {"Symptoms": ["Agitation", "Change in alertness (consciousness)", "Confusion", "Diarrhea", "Increased temperature", "Pounding heart (tachycardia)", "Restlessness", "Shaking", "Sweating"], "Possible Complications": "Irregular heart rhythms (arrhythmias) may occur. Heart failure and pulmonary edema can develop rapidly and lead to death.", "Exams and Tests": "The systolic (top number) blood pressure reading may be high, and the diastolic (bottom number) blood pressure may be low, Heart rate is increased. Blood tests are done to check thyroid hormones TSH and T3.", "description": "Thyroid storm is a life-threatening condition that develops in cases of untreated thyrotoxicosis (hyperthyroidism, or overactive thyroid).", "Causes": "Thyroid storm occurs in people with untreated hyperthyroidism. It is usually brought on by a major stress such as trauma, heart attack,\u00a0or infection. Thyroid storm is very rare."}, "Telangiectasia": {"description": "Telangiectasias are small, widened blood vessels on the skin. They are usually harmless, but may be associated with several diseases.", "Causes": "Causes may include:Alcohol use (related to rosacea), Aging, Genetics, Pregnancy, Sun exposure. Diseases associated with this condition include:Ataxia - telangiectasia, Bloom syndrome, Cutis marmorata telangiectatica congenita, Hereditary hemorrhagic telangiectasia (Osler-Weber-Rendu syndrome), Klippel-Trenaunay-Weber syndrome, Nevus flammeus such as port-wine stain, Rosacea, Spider angioma, Sturge-Weber disease, Xeroderma pigmentosa. "}, "Total abdominal colectomy": {"description": "Total abdominal colectomy is the removal of the large intestine from the lowest part of the small intestine (ileum) to the rectum. After it is removed, the end of the small intestine is sewn to the rectum."}, "Takayasu arteritis": {"description": "Takayasu arteritis is an inflammation of the aorta and its major branches. The aorta is the artery that carries blood from the heart to the rest of the body.", "Possible Complications": "Blood clot, Heart attack, Heart failure, Pericarditis, Pleuritis, Stroke. ", "Symptoms": ["Arm weakness or pain with use", "Chest pain", "Dizziness", "Fatigue", "Fever", "Light-headedness", "Muscle or joint pain", "Skin rash", "Night sweats", "Vision changes", "Weight loss"], "Exams and Tests": "Decreased radial pulses (at the wrist), Difference in blood pressure between the two arms, High blood pressure (hypertension) . There may also be signs of inflammation (pericarditis or pleuritis).Tests:Arteriogram, Angiogram, Complete blood count (CBC), C-reactive protein (CRP), Electrocardiogram (ECG), Erythrocyte sedimentation rate (ESR), Magnetic resonance angiography (MRA), Magnetic resonance imaging (MRI), Computed tomography (CT), Ultrasound, X-ray of the chest. ", "Treatment": "Treatment of Takayasu arteritis is difficult. However, people who have the right treatment can see positive results. It is important to identify the condition early. MEDICINESMost people are first treated with high doses of steroids. Immunosuppressive drugs, such as azathioprine, mycophenolate, methotrexate, or leflunomide are often added. Biologic agents including TNF inhibitors such as infliximab are recommended for people who do not improve with the previous treatment. In difficult cases, tocilizumab or rituximab may be helpful. SURGERYSurgery is reserved for complications caused by narrowed arteries.Surgery to open up narrowed arteries may be needed to supply blood or open up the constriction", "Causes": "The cause of Takayasu arteritis is unknown. The disease occurs mainly in children and women younger than 40. It is more common in people from of Asian or African descent.Takayasu arteritis appears to be an autoimmune condition, which means the body's immune system mistakenly attacks healthy tissue. The condition may also involve other organ systems."}, "Trisomy 13": {"description": "Trisomy 13 (also called Patau syndrome) is a genetic disorder in which a person has three copies of genetic material from chromosome 13, instead of the usual two copies. Rarely, the extra material may be attached to another chromosome (translocation).", "Possible Complications": "Complications begin almost immediately. Most infants with trisomy 13 have congenital heart disease. Complications may include:Breathing difficulty or lack of breathing (apnea), Deafness, Feeding problems, Heart failure, Seizures, Vision problems. ", "Symptoms": ["Cleft lip or palate", "Clenched hands (with outer fingers on top of the inner fingers)", "Close-set eyes -- eyes may actually fuse together into one", "Decreased muscle tone", "Extra fingers or toes (polydactyly)", "Hernias: umbilical hernia, inguinal hernia", "Hole, split, or cleft in the iris (coloboma)", "Low-set ears", "Intellectual disability, severe", "Scalp defects (missing skin)", "Seizures", "Single palmar crease", "Skeletal (limb) abnormalities", "Small eyes", "Small head (microcephaly)", "Small lower jaw (micrognathia)", "Undescended testicle (cryptorchidism)"], "Exams and Tests": "The infant may have a single umbilical artery at birth. There are often signs of congenital heart disease, such as:Abnormal placement of the heart toward the right side of the chest instead of the left, Atrial septal defect, Patent ductus arteriosus, Ventricular septal defect. Gastrointestinal x-rays or ultrasound may show rotation of the internal organs.MRI or CT scans of the head may reveal a problem with the structure of the brain. The problem is called holoprosencephaly. It is the joining together of the two sides of the brain.Chromosome studies show trisomy 13, trisomy 13 mosaicism, or partial trisomy.", "Treatment": "There is no specific treatment for trisomy 13. Treatment varies from child to child and depends on the specific symptoms.", "Prevention": "Trisomy 13 can be diagnosed before birth by amniocentesis with chromosome studies of the amniotic cells.Parents of infants with trisomy 13 that is caused by a translocation should have genetic testing and counseling, which may help them avoid having another child with the condition.", "Causes": "Trisomy 13 occurs when extra DNA from chromosome 13 appears in some or all of the body's cells.Trisomy 13 -- the presence of an extra (third) chromosome 13 in all of the cells., Trisomy 13 mosaicism -- the presence of an extra chromosome 13 in some of the cells., Partial trisomy -- the presence of a part of an extra chromosome 13 in the cells.. The extra material interferes with normal development.Trisomy 13 occurs in about 1 out of every 10,000 newborns. Most cases are not passed down through families (inherited). Instead, the events that lead to trisomy 13 occur in either the sperm or the egg that forms the fetus."}, "Thrombotic thrombocytopenic purpura": {"description": "Thrombotic thrombocytopenic purpura (TTP) is a blood disorder that causes blood clots to form in small blood vessels around the body. This leads to a low platelet count (thrombocytopenia).", "Possible Complications": "Kidney failure, Low platelet count (thrombocytopenia), Low red blood cell count (caused by the premature breakdown of red blood cells), Nervous system problems, Severe bleeding (hemorrhage), Stroke. ", "Symptoms": ["Bleeding into the skin or mucus membranes", "Purplish spots in the skin produced by small bleeding vessels near the surface of the skin (purpura)", "Confusion, speech changes \r\n ", "Easy fatigue, weakness \r\n ", "Fever", "Headache", " \r\n Pale skin color or yellowish skin color \r\n ", "Shortness of breath", "Fast heart rate (over 100 beats per minute)"], "Exams and Tests": "ADAMTS 13 activity level, Bilirubin, Blood smear, CBC, Creatinine level, Lactate dehydrogenase (LDH) level, Mucus membrane biopsy, Platelet count, Urinalysis, Von Willebrand factor electropheresis. ", "Treatment": "Plasma exchange (plasmapheresis plus infusion of donor plasma) is used to remove the antibodies that are affecting clotting from the blood. It also replace the missing enzyme.First, you will have your blood drawn as if you were donating blood., The plasma portion of the blood will be passed through a cell separator. The remaining portion of the blood will be saved., Plasma will be added to it, and the blood will be returned to you through a transfusion.. This treatment is repeated daily until blood tests show improvement.People who do not respond to this treatment or whose condition often returns may need to:Have surgery to remove their spleen, Get drugs that suppress the immune system, such as corticosteroids or rituximab. ", "Prevention": "Because the cause is unknown, there is no known way to prevent this condition.", "Causes": "This disease may be caused by problems with ann enzyme (a type of protein) that is involved in blood clotting. These changes cause clotting to occur in an abnormal way.As the platelets clump together in these clots, fewer platelets are available in the blood in other parts of the body to help with clotting., This can lead to bleeding under the skin and purple-colored spots called purpura., The blood clots prevent oxygen from reaching these parts of the body.. In some cases, the disorder is passed down through families (inherited). In these cases, people are born with naturally low levels of this enzyme. This condition also may be related to:Cancer, Chemotherapy, Hematopoietic stem cell transplantation, HIV infection, Hormone replacement therapy and estrogens, Medications (including ticlopidine, clopidogrel, guinine, and cyclosporine A). "}, "Trigeminal neuralgia": {"Symptoms": ["Very painful, sharp electric-like spasms that usually last a few seconds or minutes, but can become constant", "Pain is usually only on one side of the face, often around the eye, cheek, and lower part of the face", "Pain may be triggered by touch or sounds "], "Exams and Tests": "A brain and nervous system (neurologic) examination is usually normal.Tests that are done to look for the cause may include:Blood tests, MRI of the head, Trigeminal reflex testing . ", "description": "Trigeminal neuralgia is a nerve disorder that causes a stabbing or electric-shock-like pain in parts of the face.", "Causes": "The pain of trigeminal neuralgia comes from the trigeminal nerve. This nerve carries the feelings of touch and pain from the face, eyes, sinuses, and mouth to the brain.The condition usually affects adults, but it can affect anyone at any age. Trigeminal neuralgia may be caused by:Multiple sclerosis, Pressure on the trigeminal nerve from a swollen blood vessel or tumor . Often, no cause is found.Doctors are more likely to find a cause in a person who is younger than age 40.", "Treatment": "Your primary care physician, a neurologist, or a pain specialist may be involved in your care.Certain medicines sometimes help reduce pain and the rate of attacks. These medicines include:Anti-seizure drugs, Muscle relaxants, Tricyclic antidepressants . Some patients may need surgery to relieve pressure on the nerve. Techniques include:Cutting or destroying part of the trigeminal nerve, Destroying the trigeminal nerve with a needle or probe placed through the skin using radiofrequency ablation or an injection of glycerol, Electrostimulation, Percutaneous balloon microcompression, Removal of the tumor (when a tumor is the cause), Stereotactic radiosurgery (Gamma knife), Surgery to remove a blood vessel that is putting pressure on the trigeminal nerve (called microvascular decompression, or MVD) . "}, "Taking iron supplements": {"description": "Eating iron-rich foods is a key part of treating anemia caused by low iron levels. You may also need to take iron supplements as well to rebuild iron stores in your body. "}, "Taking medicines to treat tuberculosis": {"description": "Ask your doctor whether others with whom you work or live should be tested for TB."}, "Treacher-Collins syndrome": {"description": "Treacher-Collins syndrome is a condition that is passed down through families (hereditary) that leads to problems with the structure of the face.", "Possible Complications": "Feeding difficulty, Speaking difficulty, Communication problems, Vision problems. ", "Symptoms": ["Outer part of the ears are abnormal or almost completely missing", "Hearing loss", "Very small jaw (micrognathia)", "Very large mouth", "Defect in the lower eyelid (coloboma)", "Scalp hair that reaches to the cheeks", "Cleft palate"], "Exams and Tests": "The child usually will show normal intelligence. Examination of the infant may reveal a variety of problems, including:Abnormal eye shape, Flat cheekbones, Clefts in the face, Small jaw, Low-set ears, Abnormally formed ears, Abnormal ear canal, Hearing loss, Defects in the eye (coloboma that extends into the lower lid), Decreased eyelashes on the lower eyelid. Genetic tests can help identify gene changes linked to this condition.", "Treatment": "Hearing loss is treated to ensure better performance in school.Being followed by a plastic surgeon is very important, because children with this condition may need a series of operations to correct birth defects. Plastic surgery can correct the receding chin and other changes in face structure.", "Prevention": "Genetic counseling is recommended if you have a family history of this syndrome and wish to become pregnant.", "Causes": "Changes to one of three genes, TCOF1, POLR1C, or POLR1D, can lead to Treacher-Collins syndrome. The condition can be passed down through families (inherited), but most of the time there is not another affected family member.This condition may vary in severity from generation to generation and from person to person."}, "Tooth formation - delayed or absent": {"description": "Delayed or absent tooth formation; Teeth - delayed or absent formation", "Causes": "Specific diseases can affect tooth shape, tooth color, time of appearance, or tooth absence. Delayed or absent tooth formation can result from many different conditions, including:Apert syndrome, Cleidocranial dysostosis, Down syndrome, Ectodermal dysplasia, Ellis-van Creveld syndrome, Hypothyroidism, Hypoparathyroidism, Incontinentia pigmenti achromians, Progeria. "}, "Tenesmus": {"description": "Tenesmus is the feeling that you need to pass stools, even though your bowels are already empty. It may involve straining, pain, and cramping.", "Causes": "The condition may be caused by:Anorectal abscess, Colorectal cancer or tumors, Crohn's disease, Infection of the colon (infectious colitis), Inflammation of the colon or rectum from radiation (radiation proctitis or colitis), Inflammatory bowel disease (IBD), Movement (motility) disorder of the intestines, Ulcerative colitis. "}, "Thromboangiitis obliterans": {"description": "Thromboangiitis obliterans is a rare disease in which blood vessels of the hands and feet become blocked.", "Possible Complications": "Complications include:Tissue death (gangrene), Amputation of fingers or toes, Loss of blood flow in the limb of the affected fingers or toes . ", "Symptoms": ["Fingers or toes that appear pale, red, or bluish and feel cold to the touch.", "Sudden severe pain in the hands and feet. The pain may feel like a burning or tingling.", "Pain in the hands and feet that most often occurs when at rest. The pain may be worse when the hands and feet get cold or during emotional stress.", "Pain in the legs, ankles, or feet when walking (intermittent claudication). The pain is often located in the arch of the foot.", "Skin changes or small painful ulcers on the\u00a0fingers or toes. "], "Exams and Tests": "The following tests may show blockage of blood vessels in the affected hands or feet:Ultrasound of the extremity, called plethysmography, Doppler ultrasound of the extremity. Blood tests for other causes of inflamed blood vessels (vasculitis) and blocked (occlusion of) blood vessels may be done. These causes include diabetes, scleroderma, and atherosclerosis. There are no blood tests that diagnose thromboangiitis obliterans. A heart echocardiogram may be done to look for sources of blood clots. In rare cases when the diagnosis is unclear, a biopsy of the blood vessel is done.", "Treatment": "There is no cure for thromboangiitis obliterans. The goal of treatment is to control symptoms and prevent the disease from getting worse.Stopping tobacco use of any kind is key to controlling the disease. Smoking cessation treatments are strongly recommended. It is also important to avoid cold temperatures and other conditions that reduce blood flow in the hands and feet.Applying warmth and doing gentle exercises can help increase circulation.Aspirin and medicines that open the blood vessels (vasodilators) may help. In very bad cases, surgery to cut the nerves to the area (surgical sympathectomy) can help control pain.It may become necessary to amputate the fingers or toes if the area becomes very infected and tissue dies.", "Prevention": "People with a history of Raynaud disease or blue, painful fingers or toes, especially with ulcers, should not use any form of tobacco.", "Causes": "Thromboangiitis obliterans (Buerger disease) is caused by small blood vessels that become inflamed and swollen. The blood vessels then narrow or get blocked by blood clots (thrombosis). Blood vessels of the hands and feet are mostly affected. Arteries are more affected than veins. Average age when symptoms begin is around 35. Women and older adults are affected less often.This condition mostly affects young men ages 20\u00a0to 45 who are heavy smokers or chew tobacco.\u00a0Female smokers in Western countries may also be affected. Many people with this problem have poor dental health, most likely due to tobacco use. "}, "Tension headache": {"description": "A tension headache is the most common type of headache. It is pain or discomfort in the head, scalp, or neck, and is usually associated with muscle tightness in these areas.", "Symptoms": ["Dull, pressure-like (not throbbing)", "A tight band or vise on the head", "All over (not just in one point or one side)", "Worse in the scalp, temples, or back of the neck, and possibly in the shoulders "], "Exams and Tests": "If your headache is mild to moderate, without other symptoms, and responds to home treatment within a few hours, you may not need further examination or testing. With a tension headache, there are usually no problems with the nervous system. But tender points (trigger points) in the muscles are often found in the neck and shoulder areas.", "Causes": "Tension headaches occur when neck and scalp muscles become tense, or contract. The muscle contractions can be a response to stress, depression, a head injury, and anxiety.They may occur at any age, but are most common in adults and adolescents.If a headache occurs two or more times a week for several months or longer, the condition is considered chronic. Chronic daily headaches can result from the under- or over-treatment of a primary headache. Rebound headaches are headaches that keep coming back. They may occur when pain medicines are overused.Any activity that causes the head to be held in one position for a long time without moving can cause a headache. Such activities include typing or other computer work, fine work with the hands, and using a microscope. Sleeping in a cold room or sleeping with the neck in an abnormal position may also trigger a tension headache.Other triggers of tension headaches include:Alcohol use, Caffeine (too much or withdrawal), Colds, the flu, or a\u00a0sinus infection, Dental problems such as jaw clenching or teeth grinding, Eye strain, Excessive smoking, Fatigue or overexertion\u00a0 . Tension headaches can occur when you also have a migraine. Tension headaches are not associated with brain diseases.", "Prevention": "Learn and practice stress management. Some people find relaxation exercises or meditation helpful. Biofeedback may help you improve the effect\u00a0of doing relaxation exercises, and may be helpful for chronic tension headache.Tips to prevent tension headaches:Keep warm if the headache is associated with cold, Use a different pillow or change sleeping positions, Practice good posture when reading, working, or doing other activities, Exercise the neck and shoulders frequently when working on computers, or doing other close work, Get plenty of sleep and rest. Massaging sore muscles may also help.", "Treatment": "The goal is to treat your headache symptoms right away, and to prevent headaches by avoiding or changing your triggers. A key step in doing this involves learning to manage your tension headaches at home by:Keeping a headache diary to help you identify your headache triggers so that you and your doctor can make changes in your lifestyle to reduce the number of headaches you get, Learning what to do to relieve a headache when it starts, Learning how to take your headache medicines the correct way . Medicines that may relieve a tension headache include:Over-the-counter pain medicines\u00a0such as aspirin, ibuprofen, or acetaminophen, Narcotic pain relievers, Muscle relaxants . Be aware that: Taking medicines more than 3 days a week may lead to rebound headaches. These are headaches that keep coming back due to overuse of pain medicine., Taking too much acetaminophen can damage your liver. , Too much ibuprofen or aspirin can irritate your stomach.. If these medicines do not help, talk to your doctor about prescription medicines.Other treatments that you can discuss with your doctor include relaxation or stress-management training, biofeedback, cognitive behavioral therapy, acupuncture, or botulinum toxin type A (Botox \u00ae)."}, "Tests for H pylori": {"description": "Helicobacter pylori (H. pylori) is the bacterium (germ) responsible for that causes most stomach and duodenal ulcers\u00a0and many cases of stomach inflammation (chronic gastritis)."}, "Thrush - children and adults": {"description": "Thrush is a yeast infection of the tongue and lining of the mouth. ", "Possible Complications": "If your immune system is weak, Candida can spread throughout your body, causing a serious infection.This infection might affect your:Brain (meningitis), Esophagus (esophagitis), Eyes (endophthalmitis), Heart (endocarditis), Joints (arthritis). ", "Symptoms": ["White, velvety sores in the mouth and on the tongue", "Some bleeding when you brush your teeth or scrape the sores", "Pain when swallowing"], "Exams and Tests": "Your doctor or dentist can usually diagnose thrush by looking at your mouth and tongue. The sores are easy to recognize.To confirm you have thrush, your doctor may:Take a sample of a mouth sore by gently scraping it, Examine mouth scrapings under a microscope . In severe cases, thrush can grow in your esophagus as well. The esophagus is the tube that connects your mouth to your stomach. If this occurs, your doctor may:Take a throat culture to see what germs are causing your thrush, Examine your esophagus and stomach with a flexible, lighted scope with a camera on the end . ", "Treatment": "If you get mild thrush after taking antibiotics, eat yogurt or take over-the-counter acidophilus pills. This may help restore a healthy balance of germs in your mouth.For a more severe case of thrush, your doctor may prescribe:Antifungal mouthwash (nystatin), Lozenges (clotrimazole) , Antifungal medicines taken as a pill or syrup -\u00a0These medicines include fluconazole (Diflucan) or itraconazole (Sporanox).. ", "Prevention": "If you get thrush often, your doctor may recommend taking antifungal medication on a regular basis to keep thrush from coming back.If you have diabetes, you can help prevent thrush by keeping good control of your blood sugar levels.", "Causes": "Certain germs normally live in our bodies. This includes bacteria and fungi. While most germs are harmless, some can cause infection. Thrush occurs in children and adults when too much of a fungus called Candida grows in your mouth. A small amount of this fungus normally lives in your mouth. It is usually kept in check by your immune system and other germs that also live in your mouth.When your immune system is weak or when normal bacteria die, too much of the fungus can grow. You are more likely to get thrush if:You are in poor health., You are very old. Young babies are also more likely to develop thrush., You have HIV or AIDS., You are receiving chemotherapy or drugs that weaken the immune system., You are taking steroid medicine, including some inhalers for asthma and COPD., You have diabetes and your blood sugar is high. When your blood sugar is high, some of the extra sugar is found in your saliva and acts\u00a0as food for Candida., You take antibiotics. Antibiotics kill some of the healthy bacteria that keep Candida from growing too much., Your dentures don't fit well. . Candida can also cause yeast infections in the vagina. "}, "Tongue problems": {"description": "Tongue problems include pain, swelling, or a change in how the tongue looks.", "Causes": "Minor infections or irritations are the most common cause of tongue soreness. Injury, such as biting the tongue, can cause painful sores. Heavy smoking can irritate the tongue and make it painful.A viral ulcer on the tongue or elsewhere in the mouth is common. This is called a canker sore and can appear for no known reason. Possible causes of tongue pain include:Anemia, Cancer, Dentures that irritate the tongue, Oral herpes (ulcers), Neuralgia, Pain from teeth and gums, Pain from the heart. Possible causes of tongue tremor:Neurological disorder, Overactive thyroid. Possible causes of white tongue:Local irritation, Smoking and alcohol use. Possible causes of smooth tongue:Anemia, Vitamin B12 deficiency. Possible causes of red (ranging from pink to reddish-purple) tongue:Folic acid and vitamin B12 deficiency, Pellagra, Pernicious anemia, Plummer-Vinson syndrome, Sprue. Possible causes of tongue swelling:Acromegaly, Allergic reaction to food or medicine, Amyloidosis, Angioedema, Beckwith syndrome, Cancer of the tongue, Congenital micrognathia, Down syndrome, Hypothyroidism, Infection, Leukemia, Lymphangioma, Neurofibromatosis, Pellagra, Pernicious anemia, Strep infection, Tumor of the pituitary gland. Possible causes of a hairy tongue:AIDS, Antibiotic therapy, Drinking coffee, Dyes in drugs and food, Chronic medical conditions, Overuse of mouthwashes containing oxidizing or astringent ingredients, Radiation of the head and neck, Tobacco use. "}, "Transient tachypnea - newborn": {"Symptoms": ["Bluish skin color (cyanosis)", "Rapid breathing, which may occur with noises such as grunting", "Flaring nostrils or movements between the ribs or breastbone known as retractions"], "Exams and Tests": "The mother\u2019s pregnancy and labor history are important to make the diagnosis.Tests performed on the baby may include:Blood count and blood culture to rule out infection, Chest x-ray to rule out other causes of breathing problems, Continuous monitoring of the baby's oxygen levels, breathing, and heart rate. The diagnosis of transient tachypnea is most often made after the baby is monitored for 1 or 2 days.", "description": "Transient tachypnea is a respiratory disorder seen shortly after delivery in full-term or late preterm babies.", "Causes": "As the baby grows in the womb, the lungs make a special fluid. This fluid fills the developing baby's lungs and helps them grow. When the baby is born at term, chemicals released during labor tell the lungs to stop making this special fluid. The baby's lungs start removing or reabsorbing it.The first few breaths a baby takes after delivery fill the lungs with air and help to clear most of the remaining lung fluid.Leftover fluid in the lungs causes the baby to breathe rapidly. It is harder for the small air sacs of the lungs to stay open.Transient tachypnea is more likely to occur in babies who were:Born before 38 weeks gestation, Delivered by C-section, especially if labor has not already started, Born to a mother with diabetes. ", "Treatment": "Your baby will be given oxygen to keep the blood oxygen level stable. Your baby will often need the most oxygen within a few hours after birth. The baby's oxygen needs will begin to decrease after that. Most infants with transient tachypnea improve in less than 12 - 24 hours.Very rapid breathing can cause the baby to feed poorly. Fluids and nutrients will be given through a vein until your baby improves. Your baby may also receive antibiotics until the health care provider is sure there is no infection. Rarely, babies with transient tachypnea will have lung problems that last for as long as a week or so."}, "Turning patients over in bed": {"description": "Turning a patient is a good time to check the skin for redness and sores."}, "Trachoma": {"description": "Trachoma is a bacterial infection of the eye.", "Possible Complications": "If the eyelids become very irritated, the eyelashes may turn in and rub against the cornea. This can cause eye ulcers, additional scars, vision loss, and possibly, blindness.", "Symptoms": ["Cloudy cornea", "Discharge from the eye", "Swelling of lymph nodes just in front of the ears", "Swollen eyelids", "Turned-in eyelashes "], "Exams and Tests": "The health care provider will do an eye exam to look for scarring on the inside of the upper eye lid, redness of the white part of the eyes, and new blood vessel growth into the cornea.Lab tests are needed to identify the bacteria and make an accurate diagnosis.", "Treatment": "Antibiotics can prevent long-term complications if used early in the infection. In certain cases, eyelid surgery may be needed to prevent long-term scarring, which can lead to blindness if not corrected.", "Prevention": "Spread of the infection can be limited by washing your hands and face often, keeping clothes clean, and not sharing items such as towels.", "Causes": "Trachoma is caused by infection with the bacteria Chlamydia trachomatis. The condition occurs around the world. It is most often seen in rural areas of developing countries. Children are often affected, but the scarring caused by the infection may not be noticed until later in life. The condition is rare in the United States. However, It is more likely to occur in crowded or unclean living conditions. Trachoma is spread through direct contact with infected eye, nose, or throat fluids. It can also be passed by contact with contaminated objects, such as towels or clothes. Certain flies can also spread the bacteria."}, "Testicular self-exam": {"description": "Testicular self-exam is an examination of the testicles that you do on yourself."}, "Td (tetanus and diphtheria) vaccine - what you need to know": {"description": "Content source: National Center for Immunization and Respiratory Diseases"}, "Toddler test or procedure preparation": {"description": "Helping your young child prepare for a medical test or procedure can reduce anxiety, increase cooperation, and help your child develop coping skills."}, "Testosterone therapy for men": {"description": "Testosterone therapy uses the male hormone testosterone to treat symptoms of low testosterone levels (hypogonadism), including:"}, "Total parenteral nutrition": {"description": "You will also have regular blood tests to make sure the TPN is giving you the right nutrition."}, "Tendon repair": {"description": "Tendon repair is surgery to repair damaged or torn tendons."}, "Types of health care providers": {"description": "See the following articles for detailed information on specific types of health care providers:"}, "Toxic nodular goiter": {"description": "Toxic nodular goiter involves an enlarged thyroid gland. The gland\u00a0contains\u00a0areas that have increased in size and formed nodules. One or more of these nodules produce too much thyroid hormone.", "Possible Complications": "Heart complications:Congestive heart failure, Irregular heartbeat (atrial fibrillation) , Rapid heart rate. Other complications:Bone loss leading to osteoporosis. Thyroid crisis or storm is an acute worsening of hyperthyroidism symptoms. It may occur with infection or stress. Thyroid crisis may cause:Abdominal pain, Decreased mental alertness, Fever. People with this condition need to go to the hospital right away.Complications of having a very large goiter may include difficulty breathing or swallowing.\u00a0These complications are\u00a0due to pressure on the airway passage (trachea) or esophagus, which lies behind the thyroid.", "Symptoms": ["Fatigue", "Frequent bowel movements", "Heat intolerance", "Increased appetite", "Increased sweating", "Irregular menstrual period (in women)", "Muscle cramps", "Nervousness", "Restlessness", "Weight loss "], "Exams and Tests": "A physical examination will show one or many nodules in the thyroid. There may be a rapid heart rate.Other tests that may be done:Serum thyroid hormone levels (T3, T4) , Serum TSH (thyroid stimulating hormone) , Thyroid uptake and\u00a0scan, Thyroid ultrasound. ", "Treatment": "Treatments may\u00a0include any of the following:Antithyroid drugs , Radioactive iodine, Surgery. Beta-blockers (propranolol) can control some of the symptoms of hyperthyroidism until thyroid hormone levels in the body are under control.", "Prevention": "To prevent toxic nodular goiter, treat hyperthyroidism and simple goiter as your health care provider recommends.", "Causes": "Toxic nodular goiter\u00a0grows from an existing simple goiter. It occurs most often in the elderly. Risk factors include being female and over 60 years old. This disorder is almost never seen in children. Most patients who develop it have had a goiter with nodules for many years.Sometimes patients with toxic multinodular goiter will develop high thyroid levels for the first time after they receive a large amount of iodine through a vein (intravenously) or by mouth. The iodine may be used as contrast for a CT scan or heart catheterization. Taking medicines that contain iodine, such as amiodarone, may also lead to the disorder."}, "Toxic shock syndrome": {"description": "Toxic shock syndrome is a serious disease that involves fever, shock, and problems with several body organs.", "Possible Complications": "Organ damage including kidney, heart, and liver failure, Shock, Death. ", "Symptoms": ["Confusion", "Diarrhea", "General ill-feeling", "Headaches", "High fever, sometimes accompanied by chills", "Low blood pressure", "Muscle aches", "Nausea and vomiting", "Organ failure (usually kidneys and liver)", "Redness of eyes, mouth, throat", "Seizures", "Widespread red rash that looks like a sunburn -- skin peeling occurs 1 or 2 weeks after the rash, particularly on the palms of the hand or bottom of the feet "], "Exams and Tests": "No single test can diagnose toxic shock syndrome.The health care provider will look for the following factors:Fever, Low blood pressure, Rash that peels after 1 - 2 weeks, Problems with the function of at least three organs . In some cases, blood cultures may be positive for growth of S. aureus.", "Treatment": "Treatment includes:Removal of materials, such as tampons, vaginal sponges, or nasal packing, Drainage of infection sites (such as a surgical wound) . The goal of treatment is to maintain important body functions. This may include:Antibiotics for any infection (may be given through an IV), Dialysis (if severe kidney problems are present), Fluids through a vein (IV), Medicines to control blood pressure, Intravenous gamma globulin in severe cases, Staying in the hospital intensive care unit (ICU) for monitoring . ", "Prevention": "You can lower your risk of menstrual toxic shock syndrome by:Avoiding highly absorbent tampons, Changing tampons frequently, Only using tampons once\u00a0in awhile during menstruation . ", "Causes": "Toxic shock syndrome is caused by a toxin produced by some types of Staphylococcus bacteria. A similar problem, called toxic shock-like syndrome (TSLS), can be caused by Streptococcal bacteria. Not all staph or strep infections cause toxic shock syndrome.The earliest cases of toxic shock syndrome involved women who used tampons during their periods (menstruation). However, today less than half of cases are linked to tampon use. Toxic shock syndrome can also occur with skin infections, burns, and after surgery. The condition can also affect children, postmenopausal women, and men.Risk factors include:Recent childbirth, Infection with Staphylococcus aureus (S. aureus), commonly called a Staph infection, Foreign bodies or packings (such as those used to stop nosebleeds) inside\u00a0the body, Menstrual period, Recent surgery, Tampon use (particularly if you leave one in for a long time), Wound infection after surgery . "}, "Traveling with breathing problems": {"description": "Also talk to your doctor if you plan to travel in a place at a high altitude (such as Colorado or Utah)."}, "The night before your surgery": {"description": "Taking care of a few last-minute details can help make your surgery successful. Depending on the type of surgery you're having, follow any further advice from your doctor or nurse."}, "Tenosynovitis": {"description": "Tenosynovitis is inflammation of the lining of the sheath that surrounds a tendon (the cord that joins muscle to bone).", "Possible Complications": "If tenosynovitis is not treated, the tendon may become permanently restricted or it may tear (rupture). The affected joint can become stiff.Infection in the tendon may spread to other places in the body, which could be serious and threaten the affected limb.", "Symptoms": ["Difficulty moving a joint", "Joint swelling in the affected area", "Pain and tenderness around a joint, especially in the hand, wrist, foot, or ankle", "Pain when moving a joint", "Redness along the length of the tendon "], "Exams and Tests": "A physical examination shows swelling over the involved tendon. The health care provider may touch or stretch the tendon, or have you move the muscle where it is attached to see\u00a0whether you experience pain.", "Treatment": "The goal of treatment is to relieve pain and reduce inflammation. Rest or keeping the affected tendons still is essential for recovery.You may want to use a splint or removable brace to help keep the tendons still. Applying heat or cold to the affected area should help reduce pain and inflammation.Nonsteroidal anti-inflammatory\u00a0drugs (NSAIDs) such as ibuprofen can relieve pain and reduce inflammation. Local injections of corticosteroids may be useful as well. Some patients need surgery to remove the inflammation surrounding the tendon, but this is not common.Tenosynovitis caused by infection needs immediate treatment. Your\u00a0health care provider will prescribe antibiotics. In some severe cases, emergency surgery may be needed to release the pus around the tendon.If there is no infection, a steroid injection may be used to decrease inflammation along the tendon sheath.After you have recovered, do strengthening exercises using the muscles around the affected tendon to help prevent the injury from coming back.", "Prevention": "Avoiding repetitive movements and overuse of tendons may help prevent tenosynovitis.Use the appropriate wound care techniques to clean cuts to the hand, wrist, and feet.", "Causes": "The synovium is a lining of the protective sheath that covers tendons. Tenosynovitis is inflammation of this sheath. The cause of the inflammation may be unknown, or it may result from:Diseases that cause inflammation, Infection, Injury, Overuse, Strain. The wrists, hands, and feet are commonly affected, because the tendons are long across those joints. But, the condition may occur with any tendon sheath.An infected cut to the hands or wrists that causes tenosynovitis may be an emergency requiring surgery."}, "Taking medicines - what to ask your doctor": {"description": "Medications - taking"}, "Tracheostomy tube - eating": {"description": "Most people with a tracheostomy tube will be able to eat normally. However, it may feel different when you swallow foods or liquids."}, "Total iron binding capacity": {"description": "Total iron binding capacity (TIBC) is a blood test to see if you have too much or too little iron in the blood. Iron moves through the blood attached to a protein called transferrin. This test helps your doctor know how well that protein can carry iron in the blood."}, "Thrombophlebitis": {"description": "Thrombophlebitis is swelling (inflammation) of a vein caused by a blood clot.", "Possible Complications": "Superficial thrombophlebitis rarely causes complications.Complications of deep vein thrombosis include a\u00a0blood clot in the lungs (pulmonary embolism) or chronic pain and swelling in the leg.", "Symptoms": ["Inflammation (swelling) in the part of the body affected", "Pain in the part of the body affected", "Skin redness (not always present)", "Warmth and tenderness over the vein"], "Exams and Tests": "The health care provider can usually diagnose the condition based on how the affected area looks. You may need to have your pulse, blood pressure, temperature, skin condition, and circulation frequently checked to make sure you don't have complications.If the cause cannot be easily identified, one or more of the following tests may be done:Blood coagulation studies, Doppler ultrasound, Venography. ", "Treatment": "In general, treatment may include support stockings and wraps to reduce discomfort, as well as medications such as:Analgesics (painkillers), Antibiotics (if infection is present), Anticoagulants (blood thinners) to prevent new clots from forming, Nonsteroidal anti-inflammatory drugs (NSAIDS) such as ibuprofen to reduce pain and inflammation, Thrombolytics to dissolve an existing clot. You may be told to do the following:Keep pressure off the area to reduce pain and decrease the risk of further damage, Raise the affected area to reduce swelling. Surgical removal, stripping, or bypass of the vein is rarely needed, but may be recommended in some situations.For more specific recommendations, see the particular condition (superficial thrombophlebitis or deep venous thrombosis).", "Prevention": "Routine changing of intravenous (IV) lines helps to prevent thrombophlebitis related to IVs.If you are taking a long car or plane trip, walk or stretch your legs once in a while and drink plenty of liquids. Wearing support hose may help.If you are hospitalized, your health care provider may prescribe medicine to prevent deep venous thrombosis.", "Causes": "The following increase your chances for thrombophlebitis:Being hospitalized for a major surgery or with a major illness, Disorders that make you more likely to develop blood clots, Sitting for a long period of time (such as on a long airplane trip). There are two main types of thrombophlebitis:Deep venous thrombosis (affects deeper, larger veins), Superficial thrombophlebitis (affects veins near the skin surface). "}, "TORCH screen": {"description": "Sometimes the test is spelled TORCHS, where the extra \"S\" stands for syphilis."}, "Thoracic CT": {"description": "Thoracic CT (computed tomography) is an imaging method that uses x-rays to create cross-sectional pictures of the chest and upper abdomen."}, "Tailbone trauma - aftercare": {"description": "A group of three to five small bones called the coccyx is at the base of your spine. When you have a tailbone injury, you have bruised or fractured one of these bones."}, "Traction": {"description": "Traction is also used to keep a group of muscles (such as the neck muscles) stretched to reduce muscle spasms. This is called cervical traction."}, "Tooth abscess": {"description": "A tooth abscess is a collection of infected material (pus) in the center of a tooth. It is due to bacterial infection. ", "Possible Complications": "Loss of the tooth, Blood infection (sepsis), Spread of infection to soft tissue (facial cellulitis, Ludwig's angina), Spread of infection to the jaw bone (osteomyelitis of the jaw), Spread of infection to other areas of the body resulting in brain abscess, endocarditis, pneumonia, or other complications. ", "Symptoms": ["Bitter taste in the mouth", "Breath odor", "General discomfort, uneasiness, or ill feeling", "Fever", "Pain when chewing", "Sensitivity of the teeth to hot or cold", "Swelling of the gum over the infected tooth, that may look like a pimple", "Swollen glands of the neck", "Swollen area of the upper or lower jaw -- a very serious symptom "], "Exams and Tests": "The dentist will closely look at your teeth, mouth, and gums. You may have pain when the dentist taps the tooth. Biting or closing the mouth tightly also increases the pain. The gums may be swollen and red and may drain thick material.Dental x-rays and other tests can help your dentist determine which tooth or teeth\u00a0are causing the problem.", "Treatment": "The goals of treatment are to cure the infection, save the tooth, and prevent complications.Antibiotics may be given to fight the infection. Warm salt-water rinses may help ease the pain. Over-the-counter pain relievers may relieve the toothache and fever.Do NOT place aspirin directly over the tooth or gums. This increases irritation of the tissues and can result in mouth ulcers.A root canal may be recommended in an attempt to save the tooth.If there is a severe infection, the tooth may be removed, or surgery may be needed to drain the abscess. Some people may need to be admitted to the hospital.", "Prevention": "Prompt treatment of dental caries reduces the risk of tooth abscess. Broken or chipped teeth should be examined\u00a0right away\u00a0by the dentist.", "Causes": "A tooth abscess is a complication of tooth decay. It may also occur when a tooth is broken or chipped. Openings in the tooth enamel allow bacteria to infect the center of the tooth (the pulp). Infection may spread from the root of the tooth to the bones supporting the tooth.Infection results in a collection of pus and tissue swelling within the tooth. This causes a painful toothache. The toothache may stop if the pulp of the tooth dies unless an abscess develops. The infection can remain active and continue to spread causing more pain and destroying tissue. "}, "Turbinate surgery": {"description": "Allergies or other nasal problems can cause the turbinates to swell and block airflow. Surgery can be done to fix blocked airways and improve your\u00a0breathing."}, "Tapeworm - beef or pork": {"description": "Tapeworm is an intestinal infection with the tapeworm parasite found in beef or pork.", "Possible Complications": "Rarely, worms can cause a blockage in the intestine.If pork tapeworm larvae move out of the intestine, they can cause local growths and damage tissues such as the brain, eye, or heart. This condition is called cysticercosis. Infection of the brain can cause seizures and other nervous system problems.", "Symptoms": [], "Exams and Tests": "CBC, including differential count, Stool exam for eggs of T. solium or T. saginata, or bodies of the parasite. ", "Treatment": "Tapeworms are treated with medications taken by mouth, usually in a single dose. The drug of choice for tapeworm infections is praziquantal. Niclosamide can also be used.", "Prevention": "In the U.S., laws on feeding practices and the inspection of domestic food animals have largely eliminated tapeworms.Avoiding raw meat and cooking meat well enough (to greater than 140 degrees F for 5 minutes) will prevent tapeworm infection. Freezing meats to -4 degrees F for 24 hours also kills tapeworm eggs. Good hygiene and hand washing after using the toilet will prevent self-infection in a person who is already infected with tapeworms.", "Causes": "Tapeworm infection is caused by eating the raw or undercooked meat of infected animals. Cattle usually carry Taenia saginata (T. saginata). Pigs carry Taenia solium (T. solium).In the human intestine, the young form of the tapeworm from the infected meat (larva) develops into the adult tapeworm. A tapeworm can grow to longer than 12 feet and can live for years.Tapeworms have many segments. Each segment is able to produce eggs. Eggs are spread alone or in groups, and can pass out with the stool or through the anus.Adults and children with pork tapeworm can infect themselves if they have poor hygiene. They can ingest tapeworm eggs they pick up on their hands while wiping or scratching their anus or the skin around it.Those who are infected can expose other people to T. solium eggs, usually through food handling."}, "Toothpaste overdose": {"Symptoms": ["Convulsions", "Diarrhea", "Difficulty breathing", "Drooling", "Heart attack", "Salty or soapy taste in the mouth", "Slow heart rate", "Shock", "Tremors", "Vomiting", "Weakness"], "description": "This is for information only and not for use in the treatment or management of an actual poison exposure. If you have an exposure, you should call your local emergency number (such as 911) or the National Poison Control Center at 1-800-222-1222."}, "Thrush in newborns": {"description": "Thrush is a yeast infection of the tongue and mouth. This common infection can be passed between a mother and baby during breastfeeding.", "Symptoms": ["White, velvety sores in the mouth and on the tongue", "Wiping the sores may cause bleeding", "Redness in the mouth", "Diaper rash", "Mood changes", "Refusing to nurse because of soreness", "Deep-pink, cracked, and sore nipples", "Tenderness and pain during and after nursing "], "Exams and Tests": "Your pediatrician can usually diagnose thrush by looking at your baby's mouth and tongue. The sores are easy to recognize.", "Causes": "\r\n \r\nCertain germs normally live in our bodies. While most germs are harmless, some can cause infection. Thrush occurs when too much of a yeast called Candida albicans grows in a baby's mouth. Germs called bacteria and fungi naturally grow in our bodies. Our immune system helps keep these germs in check. But babies don't have fully formed immune systems. That makes it easier for too much yeast (a type of fungus) to grow. Thrush often occurs when mother or baby has taken antibiotics. Antibiotics treat infections from bacteria. They can also kill \"good\" bacteria, and this allows yeast to grow.The yeast thrives in warm, moist areas. The baby's mouth and the mother's nipples are perfect places for a yeast infection. Babies can also get a yeast infection on the diaper area at the same time. The yeast gets in the baby's stool and can cause a diaper rash.", "Prevention": "\r\n \r\nYou may not be able to prevent thrush, but these steps may help:If you bottle feed your baby, clean and sterilize all equipment, including nipples, Clean and sterilize pacifiers and other toys that go in baby's mouth, Change diapers often to help prevent yeast from causing diaper rash, Be sure to treat your nipples if you have a yeast infection. ", "Treatment": "Your baby might not need any treatment. Thrush often goes away on its own in a few days.Your pediatrician may prescribe antifungal medicine to treat thrush. You paint this medicine on your baby's mouth and tongue.If you have a yeast infection on your nipples, your doctor may recommend an over-the-counter or prescription antifungal cream. You put this on your nipples to treat the infection. If both you and your baby have the infection, you both need to be treated at the same time. Otherwise, you can pass the infection back and forth."}, "Tracheitis": {"description": "Tracheitis is a bacterial infection of the windpipe (trachea).", "Possible Complications": "Airway obstruction -- can lead to death, Toxic shock syndrome -- if caused by the bacteria Staphylococcus. ", "Symptoms": ["Deep cough (similar to that caused by croup)", "Difficulty breathing", "High fever", "High-pitched breathing sound (stridor)"], "Exams and Tests": "The health care provider will perform a physical exam and listen to the child's lungs. The muscles between the ribs may pull in as the child tries to breathe. This is called intercostal retractions.Tests that may be done to diagnose this condition include:Blood oxygen level, Nasopharyngeal culture to look for bacteria, Tracheal culture to look for bacteria, X-ray of the trachea. ", "Treatment": "The child often needs to have a tube placed into the airways to help with breathing. This is called an endotracheal tube.The child will receive antibiotics through a vein. The health care team will closely monitor the child's breathing and use oxygen, if needed.", "Causes": "Bacterial tracheitis is most often caused by the bacteria Staphylococcus aureus. It often follows a recent viral upper respiratory infection. It affects mostly young children, possibly because their small trachea is easily blocked by swelling. "}, "Translocation": {"description": "Genetic translocations can cause serious disorders, including a type of chronic myelogenous leukemia."}, "Tinea corporis": {"description": "\u00a0\r\n \r\n \r\n", "Possible Complications": "Skin infection from scratching too much\r\n , Skin disorders such as pyoderma or dermatophytid. ", "Symptoms": [], "Exams and Tests": "Your health care provider can often diagnose tinea corporis by looking at your skin.\u00a0You may also need the following tests:Examination of skin scraping from the rash under\u00a0a microscope using a KOH (potassium hydroxide) test, Skin biopsy. ", "Treatment": "Keep\u00a0your skin clean and dry.Use creams that treat fungus infections. Creams that contain miconazole, clotrimazole, ketoconazole, terbenifine, or oxiconazole are often effective in controlling ringworm., You can buy some of these creams over-the-counter or your doctor may give you a prescription.. To use this medicine:Wash and dry the area first., Apply the cream, beginning just outside the area of the rash and moving toward the center. Be sure to wash and dry your hands afterward., Use the cream twice a day for 7 to 10 days., Do not use a bandage over ringworm.. Rarely,\u00a0you may need medicine you take by mouth if your infection is very bad.\u00a0\r\n A\u00a0child with ringworm can return to school once treatment has started.To prevent the infection from spreading:Wash all towels in warm, soapy water and then dry them., Use a new towel and washcloth every time., Clean sinks, bathtubs, and bathroom floors well after using., Wear clean clothes every day and do not share clothes.. Infected pets should also be treated.", "Causes": "Fungi are germs that can live on the dead tissue of the hair, nails, and outer skin layers. Tinea corporis is caused by mold-like fungi called dermatophytes.Tinea corporis is common in children but can occur in people of all ages.Fungi do well in warm, moist areas. A tinea infection is more likely if you: Have wet skin for a long time\u00a0(such as from sweating), Have minor skin and nail injuries, Do not bathe or wash your hair often, Come in close contact with other people (such as in sports like wrestling). Tinea corporis can spread easily.You can catch it if you\u00a0come into direct contact with an area of ringworm on someone's body. You can also get it by touching items that have the fungi on them,\u00a0such as:Clothing, Combs, Pool surfaces, Shower floors and walls. Ringworm can also be spread by pets. (Cats are common carriers.)"}, "Testes": {"description": "Related topics:"}, "Taking care of your new knee joint": {"description": "In time, you should be able to return to your previous level of activity. But even then, you will need to move carefully so that you do not injure your new knee replacement. Be sure to get your home ready for when you return, so you can move more easily and prevent falls."}, "Toxicology screen": {"description": "A toxicology screen refers to various tests to determine the type and approximate amount of legal and illegal drugs a person has taken."}, "Transvaginal ultrasound": {"description": "Transvaginal means across or through the vagina. The ultrasound probe will be placed inside the vagina."}, "Testicular failure": {"description": "Testicular failure\u00a0occurs when the testicles cannot produce sperm or male hormones.", "Possible Complications": "Testicular failure that begins before puberty will stop normal body growth. It can prevent adult male characteristics (such as deep voice and beard) from developing.", "Symptoms": ["Decrease in height", "Enlarged breasts (gynecomastia)", "Infertility", "Lack of muscle mass", "Lack of sex drive (libido)", "Loss of armpit and pubic hair", "Slow development or lack of secondary male sex characteristics (hair growth, scrotum enlargement, penis enlargement, voice changes)"], "Exams and Tests": "A physical exam may show:Genitals that do not clearly look either male or female (usually found during infancy), Abnormally small, firm\u00a0testicles, Tumor or\u00a0an abnormal mass in the testicle or the scrotum. Other tests may show low bone mineral density and fractures. Blood tests may show a\u00a0low level of testosterone and high levels of prolactin, FSH, and LH.Testicular failure and low testosterone level may be hard to diagnose in older men because testosterone levels normally decrease slowly with age.", "Treatment": "Male hormone supplements may treat some forms of testicular failure. Men who take testosterone replacement therapy need to be carefully monitored by a doctor. Testosterone may cause the following:Excess growth of the prostate gland, Abnormal increase in red blood cells, Changes in blood cholesterol, Changes in sleep and mood. Avoiding the\u00a0medicine or activity that is causing the problem may bring testicle function back to normal.", "Prevention": "Avoid higher-risk activities if possible.", "Causes": "Testicular failure is uncommon. Causes include:Certain drugs, including glucocorticoids, ketoconazole, and opioid pain medications, Diseases that affect the testicle, including hemochromatosis, mumps, orchitis, and testicular cancer, Diseases that affect the testicle, including mumps, orchitis, and testicular cancer, Injury or trauma to the testicles, Testicular torsion\u00a0and varicocele. The following can increase the risk\u00a0of testicular failure:Activities that cause constant, low-level injury to the scrotum, such as riding a motorcycle or bicycle, Frequent and heavy use of marijuana, Undescended testicles at birth. "}, "Thirst - absent": {"description": "Absence of thirst is a lack of the urge to drink fluids, even when the body is low on water or has an excess amount of salt.", "Causes": "As people age, they are less likely to notice their thirst and may not drink fluids when needed.Absence of thirst may be due to:Birth defects of the brain, Bronchial tumor that causes syndrome of inappropriate antidiuretic hormone secretion\u00a0(SIADH), Hydrocephalus, Injury or tumor of part of the brain called the hypothalamus, Stroke. "}, "Tooth - abnormal colors": {"description": "Abnormal tooth color is any color other than white to yellowish-white.", "Causes": "Antibiotic tetracycline use before age 8, Eating or drinking items that temporarily stain the teeth, such as tea or coffee, Genetic defects that affect the tooth enamel, such as dentinogenesis and amelogenesis, High fever at an age when teeth are forming, Poor oral care, Porphyria, Severe neonatal jaundice, Too much fluoride from environmental sources (natural high water fluoride levels) or overuse of fluoride rinses, toothpaste, and fluoride supplements . "}, "Temperature measurement": {"description": "The measurement of body temperature can help detect illness. It can also monitor whether or not treatment is working. A high temperature is a fever."}, "Throat or larynx cancer": {"description": "Throat cancer is cancer of the vocal cords, voice box (larynx), or other areas of the throat.", "Possible Complications": "Airway obstruction, Difficulty swallowing, Disfigurement of the neck or face, Hardening of the skin of the neck, Loss of voice and speaking ability, Spread of the cancer to other body areas (metastasis). ", "Symptoms": ["Abnormal (high-pitched) breathing sounds", "Cough", "Coughing up blood", "Difficulty swallowing", "Hoarseness that does not get better in 1 to 2 weeks", "Neck or ear pain", "Sore throat that does not get better in 1 to 2 weeks, even with antibiotics", "Swelling or lumps in the neck", "Weight loss not due to dieting "], "Exams and Tests": "The doctor will perform a physical exam. This may show a lump on the outside of the neck.The doctor may look in your throat or nose using a flexible tube with a small camera at the end. Other tests that may ordered include:Biopsy of suspected tumor, Chest x-ray, CT scan of chest, CT scan of head and neck, MRI of the head or neck, PET scan. ", "Treatment": "The goal of treatment is to completely remove the cancer and prevent it from spreading to other parts of the body.When the tumor is small, either surgery or radiation therapy alone can be used to remove the tumor.When the tumor is larger or has spread to lymph nodes in the neck, a combination of radiation and chemotherapy is often used to save the voice box (vocal cords). If this is not possible, the voice box is removed. This surgery is called laryngectomy.", "Prevention": "Do not smoke or use other tobacco. Limit or avoid alcohol use.", "Causes": "People who smoke or use tobacco are at risk of developing throat cancer. Drinking too much alcohol over a long time also increases risk. Smoking and drinking alcohol combined lead to an increased risk of throat cancer.Most throat cancers develop in adults older than 50. Men are 10 times more likely than women to develop throat cancers.Watch this video about:Cancer of the throat or larynx"}, "Thumb sucking": {"description": "Ask your child's dentist or health care provider to talk to him about stopping and to explain the reasons to stop. Also, ask your child's health care providers about: "}, "Tibia": {"description": "The tibia is the larger of two long bones in the lower leg (between the knee and ankle). It is sometimes called the shin bone."}, "Total anomalous pulmonary venous return": {"description": "Total anomalous pulmonary venous return is a heart disease that is present at birth (congenital heart disease) in which the four veins that take blood from the lungs to the heart do not attach normally to the left atrium (left upper chamber of the heart). Instead, they attach to another blood vessel or the wrong part of the heart. \r\n", "Possible Complications": "\r\n  Breathing difficulties\r\n  , \r\n  Heart failure\r\n  , Irregular, fast heart rhythms (arrhythmias), Lung infections, Pulmonary hypertension. ", "Symptoms": ["Bluish color of the skin (cyanosis)", "Frequent respiratory infections", "Lethargy ", "Poor feeding", "Poor growth", "Rapid breathing"], "Exams and Tests": "Cardiac catheterization can confirm the diagnosis by showing that the blood vessels are abnormally attached, ECG shows enlargement of the ventricles (ventricular hypertrophy), Echocardiogram may show that the pulmonary vessels are attached, MRI of the heart can show the connections between the pulmonary vessels, \r\n  X-ray of the chest shows a normal to small heart with fluid in the lungs. ", "Treatment": "Surgery to repair the problem is needed as soon as possible. In surgery, the pulmonary veins are connected to the left atrium and the defect between the right and left atrium is closed.", "Prevention": "There is no known way to prevent TAPVR.", "Causes": "The cause of total anomalous pulmonary venous return (TAPVR) is unknown.In normal circulation, blood is sent from the right ventricle to pick up oxygen in the lungs. It then returns through the pulmonary (lung) veins to the left side of the heart, which sends blood out through the aorta and around the body.In TAPVR, oxygen-rich blood returns from the lungs to the right atrium or to a vein flowing into the right atrium, instead of the left side of heart. In other words, blood simply circles to and from the lungs and never gets out to the body.For the infant to live, an atrial septal defect (ASD) or patent foramen ovale (passage between the left and right atria) must exist to allow oxygenated blood to flow to the left side of the heart and the rest of the body.How severe this condition is depends on whether the pulmonary veins are blocked or obstructed as they drain. Obstructed TAPVR causes symptoms early in life and can be deadly very quickly if it is not found and corrected with surgery."}, "Tryptophan": {"description": "Tryptophan is an amino acid needed for normal growth in infants and for nitrogen balance in adults. It is an essential amino acid, which means your body cannot produce it -- you must get it from your diet."}, "Trisodium phosphate poisoning": {"Symptoms": ["Breathing difficulty (from inhalation)", "Coughing", "Throat swelling (which may also cause breathing difficulty)", "Blood in the stool", "Burns of the esophagus (food pipe) and stomach", "Diarrhea", "Severe abdominal pain", "Vomiting, possibly bloody", "Drooling", "Severe pain in the throat", "Severe pain or burning in the nose, eyes, ears, lips, or tongue", "Vision loss", "Low blood pressure -- develops rapidly", "Collapse", "Severe change in blood acid level", "Shock", "Burns", "Hives", "Holes in the skin or underlying tissue", "Skin irritation"], "description": "This is for information only and not for use in the treatment or management of an actual poison exposure. If you have an exposure, you should call your local emergency number (such as 911) or a local poison control center at 1-800-222-1222.", "Prevention": "Keep all poisons in their original and/or childproof container, with labels visible, and out of the reach of children."}, "Tympanometry": {"description": "Tympanometry is a test used to detect problems in the middle ear."}, "T3 test": {"description": "A laboratory test can be done to measure the amount of T3 in your blood."}, "Tubal ligation": {"description": "Tubal ligation is surgery to close a woman's Fallopian tubes. It is sometimes called \"tying the tubes.\") The Fallopian tubes connect the ovaries to the uterus. A woman who has this surgery can no longer get pregnant. This means she is \"sterile.\""}, "Triglyceride level": {"description": "A test for high blood cholesterol levels is a related measurement."}, "Thyroid gland removal - discharge": {"description": "A speech pathologist may have shown you exercises to make your vocal cords stronger. A dietitian may have helped you plan meals for the first few days after your surgery."}, "Tensilon test": {"description": "The Tensilon test is a method to help diagnose myasthenia gravis."}, "The day of surgery for your child": {"description": "The doctor\u2019s office will let you know what time you should arrive on the day of surgery. Expect that the time may be early in the morning.\u00a0"}, "Tonsil removal - what to ask your doctor ": {"description": "Below are some questions you may want to ask your child\u2019s doctor or nurse to care for your child after surgery."}, "Turpentine oil poisoning": {"Symptoms": ["Blood in urine", "Kidney failure (no urine produced)", "Loss of vision", "Severe pain in the throat", "Severe pain or burning in the nose, eyes, ears, lips, or tongue", "Blood in the stool", "Burns of the food pipe (esophagus)", "Severe abdominal pain", "Vomiting", "Vomiting blood", "Collapse", "Low blood pressure that develops rapidly", "Breathing difficulty (from breathing in poison)", "Severe cough or choking", "Throat swelling (which may also cause breathing difficulty)", "Bluish skin color", "Burns", "Irritation"], "description": "This is for information only and not for use in the treatment or management of an actual poison exposure. If you have an exposure, you should call your local emergency number (such as 911) or the National Poison Control Center at 1-800-222-1222."}, "Tar remover poisoning": {"Symptoms": ["Breathing difficulty", "Throat swelling", "Severe pain or burning in the throat, nose, eyes, ears, lips, or tongue", "Vision loss", "Collapse", "Low blood pressure", "Abdominal pain - severe", "Blood in the stools", "Burns of the esophagus (food pipe)", "Nausea", "Vomiting (may be bloody)", "Convulsions", "Depression", "Dizziness", "Drowsiness", "Feeling of being drunk (euphoria)", "Headache", "Loss of alertness (unconsciousness)", "Seizures", "Staggering", "Weakness", "Burns", "Irritation", "Necrosis (holes) in the skin or underlying tissues"], "description": "This is for information only and not for use in the treatment or management of an actual poison exposure. If you have an exposure, you should call your local emergency number (such as 911) or the National Poison Control Center at 1-800-222-1222."}, "Trench mouth": {"description": "Trench mouth is a painful bacterial infection that involves swelling (inflammation) and ulcers in the gums (gingivae).", "Possible Complications": "Dehydration, Loss of teeth, Pain, Periodontitis, Spread of infection. ", "Symptoms": ["Bad breath", "Crater-like ulcers between the teeth", "Fever", "Foul taste in the mouth", "Gums appear reddened and swollen", "Grayish film on the gums", "Painful gums", "Profuse gum bleeding in response to any pressure or irritation"], "Exams and Tests": "The health care provider will look at your mouth for signs of trench mouth, including:Crater-like ulcers filled with plaque and food debris, Destruction of gum tissue around the teeth, Inflamed gums . There may be a gray film caused by broken down (decomposed) gum tissue. In some cases, there may be fever and swollen lymph nodes of the head and neck.Dental x-rays or x-rays of the face may be taken to determine how severe the infection is and how much tissue has been destroyed.This disease may also be tested for by\u00a0using a throat swab culture.", "Treatment": "The goals of treatment are to cure the infection and relieve symptoms. Your health care provider may prescribe antibiotics if you have a fever.Good oral hygiene is vital to the treatment of trench mouth. Brush and floss your teeth thoroughly, at least twice a day, and preferably after each meal and at bedtime.Salt water rinses (1/2 teaspoon of salt in 1 cup of water) may soothe sore gums. Hydrogen peroxide, used to rinse the gums, is often recommended to remove dead or dying gum tissue. Chlorhexidine rinse will help with gum inflammation. Over-the-counter pain relievers (analgesics) may reduce your discomfort. Soothing rinses or coating agents may reduce pain, especially before eating. You may apply lidocaine to the gums for severe pain.You may be asked to visit a dentist or dental hygienist to have your teeth professionally cleaned and to have the plaque removed, once your gums feel less tender. You may need frequent dental cleaning and examinations until the disorder is cleared.To prevent the condition from coming back, your health care provider may give you instructions on how to:Maintain good general health, including proper nutrition and exercise, Maintain good oral hygiene, Reduce stress, Stop smoking. Avoid irritants such as smoking and hot or spicy foods.", "Prevention": "Preventive measures include:Good general health, Good nutrition, Good oral hygiene, including thorough tooth brushing and flossing, Learning ways to cope with stress, Regular professional dental cleaning and exams, Stopping smoking. ", "Causes": "Trench mouth is a painful form of gum swelling (gingivitis). The term \"trench mouth\" comes from World War I, when the disorder was common among soldiers.The mouth normally contains a balance of different bacteria. Trench mouth occurs when there is an overgrowth of normal mouth bacteria. The gums become infected and develop painful ulcers. Viruses may be involved in allowing the bacteria to grow too much.Risks include the following:Emotional stress, Poor oral hygiene, Poor nutrition, Smoking, Throat, tooth, or mouth infections . This disorder is rare. When it does occur, trench mouth most often affects persons ages 15 - 35."}, "Testicle lump": {"Prevention": "Starting in puberty, men at risk for testicular cancer may be taught to examine their testicles on a regular basis. This includes men with:A family history of testicular cancer, A past tumor of the testicle, An undescended testicle, even if the testicle on the other side has descended. If you have a lump in your testicle, tell your health care provider immediately. A lump on the testicle may be the first sign of testicular cancer. Many men with testicular cancer have been mistakenly given another diagnosis, so return to your health care provider if you have a persistent testicular lump.", "description": "A testicle lump is swelling or a growth (mass) in one or both testicles.", "Causes": "Possible causes of a painful testicle include:A cyst-like lump in the scrotum that contains fluid and dead sperm cells (spermatocele), Epididymitis,  \r\n Infection of the scrotal sac \r\n , Injury or trauma, Mumps, Orchitis (testicular infection), Testicular torsion, Testicular cancer, Varicocele. Possible causes if the testicle is not painful:Hydrocele, Loop of bowel from a hernia, Spermatocele, Testicular cancer, Varicocele. "}, "Taking care of your back at home": {"description": "Other measures to prevent back pain include:"}, "Taking narcotics for back pain": {"description": "Narcotics work by attaching themselves to pain receptors in your brain. Pain receptors receive chemical signals sent to your brain and help create the sensation of pain. When narcotics attach to pain receptors, the drug can block the feeling of pain. Even though narcotics can block the pain, they cannot cure the cause of your pain."}, "Testicular cancer": {"description": "Testicular cancer is cancer that starts in the testicles, the male reproductive glands located in the scrotum.\u00a0", "Possible Complications": "Testicular cancer may spread to other parts of the body. The most common sites include the:Abdomen, Lungs, Retroperitoneal area (the area near the kidneys behind the other organs in the belly area), Spine. Complications of surgery can include:Bleeding and infection after surgery, Infertility (if both testicles are removed). If you think you may want to have children in the future, ask your doctor about methods to save your sperm for use at a later date.", "Symptoms": ["Discomfort or pain in the testicle, or a feeling of heaviness in the scrotum", "Pain in the back or lower abdomen", "Enlarged testicle or a change in the way it feels", "Excess\u00a0amount of breast tissue (gynecomastia), however\u00a0this can occur normally in adolescent\u00a0boys who do not have testicular cancer", "Lump or swelling in either testicle"], "Exams and Tests": "A physical examination typically\u00a0reveals a firm lump (mass) in one of the testicles. When the health care provider holds a flashlight up to the scrotum, the light does not pass through the lump.Other tests include:Abdominal and pelvic CT scan, Blood tests for tumor markers: alpha fetoprotein (AFP), human chorionic gonadotrophin (beta HCG), and lactic dehydrogenase (LDH), Chest x-ray, Ultrasound of the scrotum. ", "Treatment": "\r\nTreatment depends on the:Type of testicular tumor, Stage of the tumor. Once cancer is found, the first step is to determine the type of cancer cell by examining it under a microscope. The cells can be seminoma, nonseminoma, or both.The next step is to determine how far the cancer has spread to other parts of the body. This is called \"staging.\"Stage I cancer has not spread beyond the testicle., Stage II cancer has spread to lymph nodes in the abdomen., Stage III cancer has spread beyond the lymph nodes (it could be as far as the liver, lungs, or brain).. Three types of treatment can be used.Surgical treatment removes the testicle (orchiectomy) and may also remove nearby lymph nodes (lymphadenectomy). This is usually performed in the case of both seminoma and nonseminomas., Radiation therapy using high-dose x-rays or other high-energy rays may be used after surgery to prevent the tumor from returning. Radiation therapy is usually only used for treating seminomas., Chemotherapy uses drugs to kill cancer cells. This treatment has greatly improved survival for patients with both seminomas and nonseminomas.. ", "Prevention": "Performing a testicular self-examination (TSE) each month may help detect testicular cancer at an early stage, before it spreads. Finding testicular cancer early is important to successful treatment and survival.", "Causes": "The exact cause of testicular cancer is unknown.\u00a0 Factors that may increase a man's risk of developing testicular cancer increases if he has:\u00a0Abnormal testicle development, Exposure to certain chemicals, Family history of testicular cancer, HIV infection, History of testicular cancer, History of an\u00a0undescended testicle\r\n (one or both testicles fail to move into the scrotum before birth), Klinefelter syndrome. Testicular cancer is the most common cancer in men between the ages of 15 and 35. It can occur in older men, and\u00a0in rare cases,\u00a0in younger boys.White men\u00a0are more likely than African American and Asian American men to develop this type of cancer.\u00a0\u00a0There is no link between vasectomy and testicular cancer.\r\nThere are two main types of testicular cancer, seminomas and nonseminomas. These cancers grow from germ cells, the cells that make sperm.Seminoma: This is a slow-growing form of testicular cancer usually found in men in their 30s and 40s. The cancer is usually just in the testes, but it can spread to the lymph nodes. Seminomas are very sensitive to radiation therapy.Nonseminoma: This more common type of testicular cancer tends to grow more quickly than seminomas.Nonseminoma tumors are often made up of more than one type of cell, and are identified according to these different cell types:Choriocarcinoma (rare), Embryonal carcinoma, Teratoma, Yolk sac tumor. A stromal tumor is a rare type of testicular tumor. They are usually not cancerous. The two main types of stromal tumors are Leydig cell tumors and Sertoli cell tumors. Stromal tumors usually occur during childhood."}, "Tracheal rupture": {"description": "A tracheal or bronchial rupture is a tear or break in the windpipe (trachea) or bronchial tubes, the major airways leading to the lungs. A tear can also occur in the tissue lining the windpipe.", "Possible Complications": "Major complications after surgery for this condition include:Infection, Long-term need of a ventilator, Narrowing of the airways, Scarring. ", "Symptoms": ["Cough up blood", "Develop bubbles of air that can be felt underneath the skin of the chest, neck, arms, and trunk", "Have difficulty breathing"], "Exams and Tests": "Chest CT scan, Chest x-ray, Fiberoptic bronchoscopy. ", "Treatment": "People who have had a trauma will need to have their injuries treated. Injuries to the trachea often need to be repaired during surgery. Injuries to the smaller bronchi can sometimes be treated without surgery. A collapsed lung is treated with a chest tube connected to suction, which re-expands the lung.For patients who have breathed a foreign body into the airways, rigid or fiberoptic bronchoscopy may be used to take out the object.Antibiotics are used in patients with an infection in the part of the lung around the injury.", "Causes": "The injury may be caused by:Infections, Sores (ulcerations) due to foreign objects, Trauma, such as a gunshot wound or automobile accident. Injuries to the trachea or bronchi also may occur during medical procedures (for example, fiberoptic bronchoscopy and placement of a breathing tube). However, this is very uncommon."}, "Tetanus": {"description": "Tetanus is an\u00a0infection of the nervous system with a type of bacteria that is potentially deadly, called Clostridium tetani (C. tetani).", "Possible Complications": "Airway obstruction, Respiratory arrest, Heart failure, Pneumonia, Fractures\r\n  , Brain damage due to lack of oxygen during spasms. ", "Symptoms": ["Drooling", "Excessive sweating", "Fever", "Hand or foot spasms", "Irritability", " \r\n Swallowing difficulty \r\n ", "Uncontrolled urination or defecation "], "Exams and Tests": "Your doctor will perform a physical exam and ask about your medical history. No specific lab test is available to diagnose tetanus.Tests may be used to rule out meningitis, rabies, strychnine poisoning, and other diseases with similar symptoms.", "Treatment": "Treatment may include:Antibiotics, Bedrest with a calm environment (dim light, reduced noise, and stable temperature), Medicine to reverse the poison (tetanus immune globulin), Muscle relaxers, such as diazepam, Sedatives, Surgery to clean the wound and remove the source of the poison (debridement). Breathing support with oxygen, a breathing tube, and a breathing machine may be necessary.", "Prevention": "IMMUNIZATIONTetanus is completely preventable by being immunized (vaccinated). Immunization usually protects against tetanus infection\u00a0for 10 years.In the United States, immunizations begin in infancy with the DTaP series of shots. The DTaP vaccine is a 3-in-1 vaccine that protects against diphtheria, pertussis, and tetanus.Td vaccine or Tdap vaccine is used to maintain immunity in those age\u00a07 and older. Tdap vaccine should be given once,\u00a0before age 65, as a substitute for Td for those who have not had Tdap. Td boosters are recommended every 10 years starting at age 19.Older teenagers and adults who get injuries, especially puncture-type wounds, should\u00a0get a tetanus\u00a0booster if it has been\u00a0more than 10 years since the last booster.If you have been injured outside or in any way that makes contact with soil likely, contact your health care provider\u00a0about your risk\u00a0of getting\u00a0tetanus infection. Injuries and wounds should be thoroughly cleaned right away. If the tissue of the wound is dying, a doctor will need to remove the tissue.You may have heard that you can get tetanus if you are injured by a rusty nail. This is true only if the nail is dirty and has the tetanus bacteria on it. It is the dirt on the nail, not the rust, that carries the risk\u00a0of tetanus.", "Causes": "Spores of the bacteria C. tetani are found in the soil, and in animal feces and teeth. In the spore form, C. tetani can remain inactive in the soil. But it can remain infectious for more than 40 years.You can get tetanus infection when the spores enter your body through an injury or wound. The spores release bacteria that spread in the body and make a poison called tetanospasmin (also known as tetanus toxin). This poison blocks nerve signals from your spinal cord to your muscles, causing severe muscle spasms. The spasms can be so powerful that they tear the muscles or cause fractures of the spine.The time between infection and the first sign of symptoms is about 7 to 21 days. Most cases of tetanus in the United States occur in those who have not been properly vaccinated against the disease."}, "Tay-Sachs disease": {"description": "Tay-Sachs disease is a life-threatening disease of the nervous system passed down through families.", "Possible Complications": "Symptoms appear during the first 3 to 10 months of life and progress to spasticity, seizures, and loss of all voluntary movements.", "Symptoms": ["Deafness", "Decreased eye contact, blindness", "Decreased muscle tone (loss of muscle strength)", "Delayed mental and social skills", "Dementia", "Increased startle reaction", "Irritability", "Listlessness", "Loss of motor skills", "Paralysis or loss of muscle function", "Seizures", "Slow growth"], "Exams and Tests": "The doctor or nurse will\u00a0examine the baby and ask questions about your family history. Tests that may be done are:Enzyme exam of blood or body tissue for hexosaminidase levels, Eye exam (reveals a cherry-red spot in the macula). ", "Treatment": "There is no treatment for Tay-Sachs disease itself, only ways to make the patient more comfortable.", "Prevention": "There is no known way to prevent this disorder. Genetic testing can detect if you are a carrier of the gene for this disorder. If you or your partner are from an at-risk population, it is recommended that you undergo testing before starting a family. Testing the amniotic fluid can diagnose Tay-Sachs disease in the womb.", "Causes": "Tay-Sachs disease occurs when the body lacks hexosaminidase A, a protein that helps break down a chemical found in nerve tissue called gangliosides. Without this protein, gangliosides, particularly ganglioside GM2, build up in cells, especially nerve cells in the brain.Tay-Sachs disease is caused by a defective gene on chromosome 15. When both parents carry the defective Tay-Sachs gene, a child has a 25% chance of developing the disease. The child must receive two copies of the defective gene -- one from each parent -- in order to become sick. If only one parent passes the defective gene to the child, the child is called a carrier. He or she won't be sick, but will have the potential to pass the disease to his or her own children.Anyone can be a carrier of Tay-Sachs, but the disease is most common among the Ashkenazi Jewish population. About 1 in every 27 members of the Ashkenazi Jewish population carries the Tay-Sachs gene.Tay-Sachs has been classified into infantile, juvenile, and adult forms, depending on the symptoms and when they first appear. Most people with Tay-Sachs have the infantile form. In this form, the nerve damage usually begins while the baby is still in the womb. Symptoms usually appear when the child is 3 to 6 months old. The disease tends to get worse very quickly, and the child usually dies by age 4 or 5.Late-onset Tay-Sachs disease, which affects adults, is very rare."}, "T-cell count": {"description": "A T-cell count measures the number of T cells in the blood. Your doctor may order this test if you have signs of a weak immune system such as due to having HIV/AIDs."}, "Testicular biopsy": {"description": "Testicular biopsy is surgery to remove a piece of tissue from the testicles for examination under a microscope."}, "Types of hormone therapy": {"description": "Hormone therapy (HT) uses one or more hormones to treat symptoms of menopause. HT uses estrogen, progestin (a type of progesterone), or both. Sometimes testosterone is also added. "}, "Total protein": {"description": "Proteins are important parts of all cells and tissues."}, "Testicle pain": {"description": "Testicle pain is discomfort in one or both testicles. The pain can spread into the lower abdomen.", "Causes": "The testicles are very sensitive. Even a minor injury can cause pain. Abdominal pain may occur before testicle pain in some conditions.Common causes of testicle pain include:Injury, Infection or swelling of the sperm ducts (epididymitis) or testicles (orchitis)., Twisting of the testicles that can cut off the blood supply (testicular torsion). It is most common in young men between 10 and 20 years old. It is a medical emergency that needs to be treated as soon as possible. If surgery is performed within 6 hours, most testicles can be saved.. Mild pain may be caused by fluid collection in the scrotum, such as:Enlarged veins in the scrotum (varicocele), Cyst in the epididymis that often contains dead sperm cells (spermatocele), Fluid surrounding the testicle (hydrocele), Pain in the testicles may also be caused by a hernia or kidney stone., Testicular cancer is almost always painless. But any testicle lump should be checked out by your health care provider, whether or not there is pain.. "}, "Thoracic spine CT scan": {"description": "A computed tomography (CT) scan of the thoracic spine is an imaging method that uses x-rays to rapidly create detailed pictures of the middle back (thoracic spine)."}, "Tracheostomy care": {"description": "DO NOT\u00a0do strenuous activity or hard exercise for 6 weeks after surgery. After your surgery, you may not be able to speak. Ask your doctor for a referral to a speech therapist to help you learn to talk with your tracheostomy. This is usually possible once your condition improves."}, "TSH test": {"description": "A TSH test measures the amount of thyroid stimulating hormone (TSH) in your blood. TSH is produced by the pituitary gland. It tells the thyroid gland to make and release thyroid hormones into the blood."}, "Tracheostomy tube - speaking": {"description": "However, you can learn how to speak with a tracheostomy tube. It just takes practice. There are even speaking devices that can help you. "}, "Tennis elbow": {"Symptoms": ["Elbow pain that gets worse over time", "Pain\u00a0that radiates\u00a0from the outside of the elbow to the forearm and back of the hand when grasping or twisting", "Weak grasp "], "Exams and Tests": "Your doctor or nurse will examine you.\u00a0\u00a0The exam may show: Pain or tenderness when the tendon is gently pressed near where it attaches to the upper arm bone, over the outside of the elbow, Pain near the elbow when the wrist is bent backwards. X-rays may be done. ", "description": "\r\nTennis elbow is soreness or pain on the outside (lateral) side of the upper arm near the elbow.", "Causes": "The part of the muscle that attaches to a bone is called a tendon. Some of the muscles in your forearm attach to the bone on the outside of your elbow.When you use these muscles over and over again, small tears develop in the tendon. Over time, this leads to irritation and pain where the tendon is attached to the bone.This injury is common in people who play a lot of tennis or other racquet sports, hence the name \"tennis elbow.\" Backhand is the most common stroke to cause symptoms.But\u00a0any activity that involves repetitive twisting of the wrist (like using a screwdriver) can lead to this condition. Painters, plumbers, construction workers, cooks, and butchers are all more likely to develop tennis elbow.This condition may also be due to constant computer keyboard and mouse use.", "Treatment": "The first step is to rest your arm for 2 or 3 weeks and avoid the activity that causes your symptoms. You may also want to:Put ice on the outside of your elbow 2 to 3 times a day., Take nonsteroidal anti-inflammatory drugs (NSAIDs),\u00a0such as ibuprofen, naproxen, or aspirin.. If your tennis elbow is due to sports activity, you may want to:Ask your health care provider about any changes you can make\u00a0to your technique., Check\u00a0the sports equipment you are using to see if any changes may help. If you play tennis, changing\u00a0the grip size of the racket may help. , Think about how often you play, and whether you should cut back.. If your symptoms are related to working on a computer, ask your manager about changing your workstation or your chair, desk, and computer setup.\u00a0\u00a0A physical therapist can show you exercises to stretch and strengthen the muscles of your forearm.You can buy a special brace for tennis elbow at most drugstores. It wraps around the upper part of your forearm and takes some of the pressure off the muscles.Your doctor may also inject cortisone and a numbing medicine around the area where the tendon attaches to the bone. This may help decrease the swelling and pain.If the pain continues after 6 to\u00a012 months of rest and treatment, surgery may be recommended. Talk with your orthopedic surgeon about the risks and whether surgery might help."}, "Toxoplasma test": {"description": "The toxoplasma test looks for antibodies in the blood to a parasite called Toxoplasma gondii. The parasite causes an infection called toxoplasmosis.\u00a0The infection is\u00a0a danger to a developing baby if a pregnant woman gets it. It is also dangerous in people with AIDS."}}